Texas, session 892, HB4.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF TEXAS: ARTICLE I SECTION 1.  (a) The members of the United States House of Representatives from the State of Texas are elected from the districts described by Article II of this Act. (b)  One member is elected from each district established by this Act. ARTICLE II SECTION 1.  District 1 is composed of Cass, Cherokee, Gregg, Harrison, Marion, Nacogdoches, Panola, Rusk, Sabine, San Augustine, Shelby and Smith Counties; and Bowie County tracts 010100, 010400, 010500, 010600, 010700, 010800, 010903, 010904, 010905, 010906, 011001, 011002, 011101, 011102, 011201, 011402 and 011403; and that part of Bowie County tract 011202 included in block group 1 and blocks 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019 and 2020; and that part of Bowie County tract 011301 included in block group 4 and blocks 2020, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025 and 2029; and that part of Bowie County tract 011302 included in blocks 1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1039, 2203, 2204, 2205, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019 and 3020; and that part of Bowie County tract 011404 included in block groups 2 and 3 and blocks 1003, 1004, 1006, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1049, 1050, 1051, 1052, 1053, 1054, 1055, 1059, 1060, 1062, 1063, 1064, 1065, 1066, 1067, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4013, 4014, 4015, 4016, 4017, 4018, 4020, 4021, 4022, 4023, 4024, 4025, 4026, 4027, 4028, 4029, 4030, 4031, 4032, 4033 and 4034; and that part of Bowie County tract 011700 included in blocks 1059, 1060, 1061, 1062 and 1063. SECTION 2.  District 2 is composed of Harris County tracts 241001, 241002, 241101, 241201, 241202, 241301, 241302, 241400, 250403, 250404, 250405, 250406, 250407, 250500, 250701, 250702, 250801, 250802, 250901, 250902, 251000, 251200, 251300, 251401, 251402, 251501, 251503, 251504, 251505, 251600, 532503, 534101, 534102, 534201, 534204, 534205, 551501, 551601, 551602, 551703, 551705, 552501, 552502, 552602, 552603, 552604, 552701, 552702, 552801, 552802, 552901, 552902, 553001, 553002, 553401, 553403, 553404, 553405, 553500, 553601, 553602, 555001, 555002, 555101 and 555102; and that part of Harris County tract 241103 included in block 1009; and that part of Harris County tract 241501 included in blocks 2000, 2001, 2002, 2012, 2013, 2014 and 2015; and that part of Harris County tract 250101 included in block group 1 and blocks 3000, 3028 and 3029; and that part of Harris County tract 250102 included in block group 1; and that part of Harris County tract 250305 included in blocks 1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023 and 1024; and that part of Harris County tract 250306 included in block group 2 and blocks 1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006 and 1007; and that part of Harris County tract 250408 included in blocks 1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1047, 1048, 1049 and 1050; and that part of Harris County tract 250601 included in block group 2 and blocks 1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008 and 1009; and that part of Harris County tract 250602 included in block group 2 and blocks 1008, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027 and 1028; and that part of Harris County tract 251100 included in block groups 1, 2, 3 and 4 and blocks 5000, 5001, 5002, 5003, 5004, 5005, 5006, 5007, 5008, 5009, 5010, 5011, 5012, 5013, 5014, 5015, 5016, 5017, 5032, 5033, 5034, 5035 and 5036; and that part of Harris County tract 251701 included in block group 3 and blocks 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2018, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028 and 2029; and that part of Harris County tract 251702 included in blocks 1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2041, 2042, 2043, 2044, 2045, 2046, 2047, 2048, 2049, 2050, 2051, 2053, 2056, 2057, 2058 and 2059; and that part of Harris County tract 251903 included in blocks 2001 and 2002; and that part of Harris County tract 252001 included in block group 2 and blocks 1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1015, 1016, 1017 and 1018; and that part of Harris County tract 252002 included in blocks 1002, 1003, 2005, 2006 and 2007; and that part of Harris County tract 252003 included in blocks 1003, 1005, 2000, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2037, 2038, 2039, 2040, 2041, 2042, 2043, 2044, 2045, 2046, 2047, 2048, 2049, 2050, 2051, 2055, 2056, 2057, 2058 and 2059; and that part of Harris County tract 532502 included in blocks 2000, 2001, 2003, 2004 and 2005; and that part of Harris County tract 532504 included in block group 1 and blocks 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009 and 2010; and that part of Harris County tract 534001 included in blocks 1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1013, 1019, 1020, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2015, 2016, 2017 and 2018; and that part of Harris County tract 534002 included in blocks 1026, 1027, 1028 and 1029; and that part of Harris County tract 534203 included in blocks 1000, 1001, 1002 and 1013; and that part of Harris County tract 550700 included in block 1014; and that part of Harris County tract 551202 included in block 1018; and that part of Harris County tract 551400 included in block groups 1 and 3 and blocks 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4013, 4014, 4015, 4016, 4017, 4018, 4019, 4020, 4021, 4022, 4023, 4024, 4025, 4026, 4027, 4028, 4029 and 4031; and that part of Harris County tract 551502 included in block group 2 and blocks 1000, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032 and 1033; and that part of Harris County tract 551800 included in blocks 2000, 2001, 2002, 2020, 2021 and 2022; and that part of Harris County tract 555200 included in block groups 2, 3 and 4 and blocks 1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1008, 1009, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1018 and 1019; and that part of Harris County tract 555301 included in blocks 1000, 1001, 1002, 1003 and 1004; and that part of Harris County tract 555303 included in block group 3 and blocks 1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011 and 1012; and that part of Harris County tract 555305 included in block group 2 and blocks 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3024, 3025, 3026, 3027, 3028, 3029, 3030, 3031, 3032, 3033, 3034, 3035, 3036, 3037, 3038, 3039, 3040, 3041, 3042, 3043, 3044, 3045, 3046, 3047, 3048, 3049, 3050, 3051, 3052, 3054, 3055, 3056, 3057, 3058 and 3059; and Montgomery County tracts 690501, 690503, 690603, 690604, 690605, 690606, 690607, 690608, 690609, 690610, 690701, 690702, 690800, 690900, 691000, 691100, 691201, 691202, 691301, 691302, 691401, 691402, 691403, 691500, 691601, 691602, 691700, 691801, 691802, 691900, 692003, 692004, 692005, 692006, 692007, 692008, 692009, 692010, 692101, 692102, 692103, 692301, 692302, 692303, 692304, 692401, 692402, 692501, 692502, 692603, 692604, 692605, 692702, 692802, 692803, 692804 and 692900; and that part of Montgomery County tract 690502 included in block groups 1 and 3 and blocks 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008 and 2009; and that part of Montgomery County tract 692201 included in block group 3 and blocks 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 2004 and 2005; and that part of Montgomery County tract 692202 included in block groups 4 and 5; and that part of Montgomery County tract 692601 included in block groups 2 and 3 and blocks 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010 and 1011; and that part of Montgomery County tract 692701 included in block group 2 and blocks 1000, 1001, 1002 and 1004. SECTION 3.  District 3 is composed of Delta, Franklin, Hopkins, Morris and Titus Counties; and Collin County tracts 030101, 030102, 030201, 030202, 030204, 030205, 030206, 030207, 030301, 030515, 030516, 030517, 030529, 030531, 030534, 030535, 030539, 030540, 030541, 030542, 030543, 030544, 030545, 030546, 030547, 030548, 030549, 030550, 030604, 030605, 030606, 030607, 030608, 030609, 030701, 030702, 030801, 030802, 030901, 030902, 030903, 031003, 031005, 031006, 031007, 031008, 031101, 031102, 031201, 031202, 031308, 031314, 031318, 031319, 031320, 031321, 031322, 031323, 031324, 031325, 031326, 031327, 031328, 031329, 031330, 031331, 031332, 031335, 031336, 031408, 031411, 031412, 031413, 031414, 031415, 031417, 031418, 031419, 031420, 031421, 031422, 031423, 031424, 031425, 031504, 031507, 031508, 031510, 031511, 031512, 031632, 031902, 032003, 032008, 032010, 032012, 032013, 032014 and 032015; and that part of Collin County tract 030307 included in blocks 2021, 2022, 2023, 2064, 2065, 2066, 2084, 2085, 2086, 2087, 2088, 2089, 2090, 2091, 2092, 2093, 2094, 2095, 2096, 2097, 2098, 2099, 2100, 2101, 2102, 2103, 2104, 2105, 2106, 2107, 2108, 2109, 2110, 2111, 2112, 2113, 2114, 2115, 2116, 2117, 2118, 2119, 2120, 2121, 2122, 2123, 2124, 2125, 2126, 2127, 2128, 2129, 2130, 2131, 2132, 2133, 2134, 2135, 2136, 2137, 2138, 2139, 2140, 2141, 2142, 2143 and 5054; and that part of Collin County tract 030524 included in block group 2 and blocks 1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4006, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4013, 4014, 4015, 4016, 4017, 4018 and 4019; and that part of Collin County tract 030525 included in block groups 1 and 3 and blocks 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2011, 2012 and 2013; and that part of Collin County tract 030536 included in blocks 1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013 and 3014; and that part of Collin County tract 030537 included in block groups 3 and 4 and blocks 1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 2000, 2001, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011 and 2012; and that part of Collin County tract 030538 included in block group 1 and block 3001; and that part of Collin County tract 031333 included in block group 1 and blocks 2000, 2001 and 2008; and that part of Collin County tract 031334 included in blocks 1000, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 2015 and 2016; and that part of Collin County tract 031416 included in block group 3 and blocks 1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 2000, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034 and 2035; and that part of Collin County tract 031509 included in block group 2 and blocks 1000, 1001, 1002, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022 and 1023; and that part of Collin County tract 031611 included in block groups 1 and 3 and blocks 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2015, 2016, 2017 and 2018; and that part of Collin County tract 031628 included in block 4010; and that part of Collin County tract 031630 included in block groups 1 and 3 and blocks 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010 and 2011; and that part of Collin County tract 031631 included in block groups 1 and 3 and blocks 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011 and 2013; and that part of Collin County tract 031635 included in block group 4 and blocks 2001, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020 and 3021; and that part of Collin County tract 031901 included in blocks 1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034 and 1041; and that part of Collin County tract 032016 included in block group 2 and block 1018; and Hunt County tracts 960100, 960200, 960300, 960400, 960500, 960600, 960800, 960900, 961000, 961200 and 961402; and that part of Hunt County tract 960700 included in block group 3 and blocks 1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1049, 1050, 1051, 1052, 1053, 1054, 1055, 1056, 1057, 1058, 1059, 1060, 1061, 1062, 1063, 1064, 1065, 1066, 1067, 1068, 1069, 1070, 1071, 1072, 1073, 1074, 1075, 1076, 1077, 1078, 1079, 1080, 1081, 1083, 1084, 1085, 1086, 1087, 1092, 1093, 1094, 1095, 1096, 1097, 1099, 1101, 1102, 1106 and 2000; and that part of Hunt County tract 961101 included in block group 2 and blocks 1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1011 and 1012; and that part of Hunt County tract 961102 included in block groups 1 and 2 and blocks 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3024, 3025 and 3041; and that part of Hunt County tract 961300 included in block groups 2, 3 and 4 and blocks 1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1023 and 1024; and that part of Hunt County tract 961401 included in blocks 1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1056, 1057, 1063, 1066, 1067, 1068, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2037, 2038, 2039, 2040, 2041, 2042, 2043, 2044, 2045, 2046, 2047, 2048, 2049, 2050, 2051, 2052, 2053, 2054, 2055, 2065, 2066, 2067, 2068, 2069, 2070, 2071, 2072, 2073, 2074, 2075, 2076, 2077, 2078, 2079, 2080, 2081, 2082, 2083, 2088, 2089, 2090, 2091, 2092, 2093, 2094, 2095, 2096, 2097, 2098, 2099, 2103, 2104, 2105, 2106, 2107, 2108, 2109, 2110, 2111, 2112, 2113, 2114, 2115, 2116, 2117, 2131, 2132, 2133, 2134, 2135 and 2136. SECTION 4.  District 4 is composed of Fannin, Grayson, Lamar and Red River Counties; and Bowie County tracts 011501, 011502, 011601 and 011602; and that part of Bowie County tract 011202 included in block 2010; and that part of Bowie County tract 011301 included in block groups 1 and 3 and blocks 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2021, 2026, 2027 and 2028; and that part of Bowie County tract 011302 included in blocks 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1032, 1033, 1037, 1038, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2037, 2038, 2039, 2040, 2041, 2042, 2043, 2044, 2045, 2046, 2047, 2048, 2049, 2050, 2051, 2052, 2053, 2054, 2055, 2056, 2057, 2058, 2059, 2060, 2061, 2062, 2063, 2064, 2065, 2066, 2067, 2068, 2069, 2070, 2071, 2072, 2073, 2074, 2075, 2076, 2077, 2078, 2079, 2080, 2081, 2082, 2083, 2084, 2085, 2086, 2087, 2088, 2089, 2090, 2091, 2092, 2093, 2094, 2095, 2096, 2097, 2098, 2099, 2100, 2101, 2102, 2103, 2104, 2105, 2106, 2107, 2108, 2109, 2110, 2111, 2112, 2113, 2114, 2115, 2116, 2117, 2118, 2119, 2120, 2121, 2122, 2123, 2124, 2125, 2126, 2127, 2128, 2129, 2130, 2131, 2132, 2133, 2134, 2135, 2136, 2137, 2138, 2139, 2140, 2141, 2142, 2143, 2144, 2145, 2146, 2147, 2148, 2149, 2150, 2151, 2152, 2153, 2154, 2155, 2156, 2157, 2158, 2159, 2160, 2161, 2162, 2163, 2164, 2165, 2166, 2167, 2168, 2169, 2170, 2171, 2172, 2173, 2174, 2175, 2176, 2177, 2178, 2179, 2180, 2181, 2182, 2183, 2184, 2185, 2186, 2187, 2188, 2189, 2190, 2191, 2192, 2193, 2194, 2195, 2196, 2197, 2198, 2199, 2200, 2201, 2202, 2206, 2207, 2208, 2209, 2210, 2211, 2212, 2213, 2214, 2215, 2216, 2217, 2218, 2219, 2220, 2221, 2222, 2223, 2224, 2225, 2226, 2227, 2228, 2229, 2230, 2231, 2232, 2233, 2234, 2235, 2236, 2237, 2238, 2239, 2240, 2241, 2242, 2243, 2244, 2245, 2246, 2247, 2248, 2249, 2250, 2251, 3008, 3009, 3010 and 3021; and that part of Bowie County tract 011404 included in blocks 1000, 1001, 1002, 1005, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1056, 1057, 1058, 1061, 4010, 4011, 4012 and 4019; and that part of Bowie County tract 011700 included in block group 2 and blocks 1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1049, 1050, 1051, 1052, 1053, 1054, 1055, 1056, 1057, 1058, 1064, 1065, 1066, 1067, 1068, 1069, 1070, 1071, 1072, 1073, 1074, 1075, 1076, 1077, 1078, 1079, 1080, 1081, 1082, 1083, 1084, 1085, 1086, 1087 and 1088; and Collin County tracts 030302, 030303, 030304, 030306, 030403, 030404, 030405, 030406, 030407, 030409, 030410, 030504, 030505, 030506, 030507, 030509, 030510, 030511, 030512, 030518, 030519, 030520, 030521, 030532, 030533, 031613, 031621, 031622, 031623, 031624, 031625, 031626, 031627, 031629, 031633, 031634, 031636, 031639, 031641, 031642, 031643, 031645, 031646, 031647, 031649, 031654, 031655, 031657, 031659, 031660, 031661, 031662, 031663, 031664, 031665, 031666, 031667, 031668, 031669, 031670, 031671, 031672, 031673, 031674, 031675, 031676, 031677, 031678, 031679, 031680, 031681, 031682, 031704, 031706, 031708, 031709, 031711, 031713, 031715, 031716, 031717, 031718, 031719, 031720, 031721, 031722, 031723, 031724, 031808 and 031812; and that part of Collin County tract 030307 included in block groups 1, 3 and 4 and blocks 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2037, 2038, 2039, 2040, 2041, 2042, 2043, 2044, 2045, 2046, 2047, 2048, 2049, 2050, 2051, 2052, 2053, 2054, 2055, 2056, 2057, 2058, 2059, 2060, 2061, 2062, 2063, 2067, 2068, 2069, 2070, 2071, 2072, 2073, 2074, 2075, 2076, 2077, 2078, 2079, 2080, 2081, 2082, 2083, 5000, 5001, 5002, 5003, 5004, 5005, 5006, 5007, 5008, 5009, 5010, 5011, 5012, 5013, 5014, 5015, 5016, 5017, 5018, 5019, 5020, 5021, 5022, 5023, 5024, 5025, 5026, 5027, 5028, 5029, 5030, 5031, 5032, 5033, 5034, 5035, 5036, 5037, 5038, 5039, 5040, 5041, 5042, 5043, 5044, 5045, 5046, 5047, 5048, 5049, 5050, 5051, 5052 and 5053; and that part of Collin County tract 030524 included in blocks 1008, 3000, 4005, 4007 and 4008; and that part of Collin County tract 030525 included in block 2010; and that part of Collin County tract 030536 included in block group 2 and blocks 1004 and 3000; and that part of Collin County tract 030537 included in blocks 1005, 1006, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017 and 2018; and that part of Collin County tract 030538 included in block group 2 and blocks 3000, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3024, 3025, 3026, 3027, 3028 and 3029; and that part of Collin County tract 031416 included in blocks 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1015, 2001, 2027, 2028 and 2029; and that part of Collin County tract 031509 included in blocks 1003, 1004, 1010 and 1017; and that part of Collin County tract 031611 included in blocks 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2013 and 2014; and that part of Collin County tract 031628 included in block groups 1, 2 and 3 and blocks 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4011 and 4012; and that part of Collin County tract 031630 included in block 2005; and that part of Collin County tract 031631 included in blocks 2012, 2014, 2015 and 2016; and that part of Collin County tract 031635 included in block group 1 and blocks 2000, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007 and 3011; and that part of Collin County tract 031807 included in block groups 2 and 3 and blocks 1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1021, 1022, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4013, 4014, 4015, 4016, 4017, 4018, 4019, 4020, 4021, 4022, 4023, 4024, 4025, 4026, 4027, 4028, 4029, 4030, 4031, 4032, 4033, 4034 and 4035; and that part of Collin County tract 031809 included in blocks 1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1013, 1014, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005 and 2006; and that part of Collin County tract 031811 included in block group 1 and blocks 2000, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006 and 2007; and Denton County tracts 020109, 020110, 020111, 021526, 021528, 021538, 021539, 021540, 021800 and 021900; and that part of Denton County tract 020112 included in block 2003; and that part of Denton County tract 020128 included in block groups 2 and 3 and blocks 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4013, 4014, 4015, 4017, 4018, 4019, 4020, 4021, 4022, 4023, 4025, 4026, 4027, 4028, 4029, 5000 and 5001; and that part of Denton County tract 020133 included in blocks 3000 and 3001; and that part of Denton County tract 020134 included in blocks 1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2030, 2031 and 2032; and that part of Denton County tract 021521 included in blocks 2005 and 2027; and that part of Denton County tract 021522 included in blocks 1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1049, 1050, 1054, 1055, 1056, 1061, 1062, 1063, 1064, 1065, 1066, 1067, 1068, 1069 and 1070; and that part of Denton County tract 021529 included in block group 2 and blocks 1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1027, 1028 and 1029; and that part of Denton County tract 021533 included in blocks 1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1034, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3024, 3025, 3026, 3027, 3028, 3029 and 3032; and that part of Denton County tract 021534 included in blocks 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2037, 2038, 2039, 2044, 2045, 2046, 2047 and 3009; and that part of Denton County tract 021535 included in block group 1 and blocks 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2037, 2038, 2039, 2040, 2041, 2042, 2043, 2044, 2045, 2046, 2047, 2048, 2051 and 2052; and that part of Denton County tract 021536 included in blocks 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045 and 1046; and that part of Denton County tract 021537 included in block 1022; and that part of Denton County tract 021626 included in blocks 1000, 1001, 1003, 1004 and 1005. SECTION 5.  District 5 is composed of Anderson, Henderson, Kaufman and Van Zandt Counties; and Dallas County tracts 007809, 007815, 007819, 007821, 007822, 007824, 007826, 007827, 007830, 007831, 007832, 007833, 007835, 007902, 007909, 007910, 007912, 007915, 007916, 008000, 013005, 013008, 013009, 013012, 013013, 017006, 017307, 017308, 017309, 017310, 017311, 017312, 017313, 017400, 017500, 017602, 017606, 017703, 017704, 017705, 017706, 017808, 017811, 017812, 017814, 017815, 017816, 017817, 017818, 017819, 017820, 018002, 018110, 018111, 018126, 018127, 018128, 018129, 018130, 018132, 018133, 018134, 018135, 018137, 018138, 018141, 018142, 018145, 018146, 018147, 018148, 018158, 018159, 018205, 018206, 018300, 018401, 018402, 018403, 018501 and 018600; and that part of Dallas County tract 000100 included in block group 3 and blocks 1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 2004, 2005, 2006 and 2007; and that part of Dallas County tract 000201 included in block groups 1 and 2 and blocks 3000, 3001, 3002, 3004, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009 and 3010; and that part of Dallas County tract 000202 included in block group 2 and blocks 3001, 3002, 3003 and 3004; and that part of Dallas County tract 007801 included in blocks 1000, 1013 and 1014; and that part of Dallas County tract 007805 included in blocks 2009, 2018, 2019 and 2020; and that part of Dallas County tract 007812 included in block group 2; and that part of Dallas County tract 007823 included in blocks 1003, 1004, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020 and 1021; and that part of Dallas County tract 007825 included in block groups 2, 3 and 4 and blocks 1000, 1001, 1002, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014 and 1015; and that part of Dallas County tract 007834 included in blocks 2003, 2004 and 2005; and that part of Dallas County tract 007903 included in block group 1; and that part of Dallas County tract 008101 included in block 2006; and that part of Dallas County tract 011902 included in blocks 2000, 2001, 2002 and 2003; and that part of Dallas County tract 012207 included in blocks 4000, 4001, 4003, 4019, 4020 and 4022; and that part of Dallas County tract 012302 included in blocks 5023, 5025 and 5026; and that part of Dallas County tract 012501 included in blocks 1000, 1001, 1010 and 1011; and that part of Dallas County tract 012601 included in blocks 1000, 1001, 1004, 3000 and 3003; and that part of Dallas County tract 012604 included in blocks 1000, 1001, 2000, 3017, 3018 and 3019; and that part of Dallas County tract 012701 included in blocks 1000 and 1001; and that part of Dallas County tract 012900 included in blocks 2009, 2010 and 2021; and that part of Dallas County tract 013010 included in blocks 1000, 1001, 1002 and 1003; and that part of Dallas County tract 013011 included in blocks 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015 and 3016; and that part of Dallas County tract 013106 included in blocks 1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009 and 1010; and that part of Dallas County tract 013107 included in block groups 2, 3 and 4 and blocks 1000 and 1003; and that part of Dallas County tract 017005 included in blocks 1000, 1018, 2001, 2002, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2028, 2029 and 2030; and that part of Dallas County tract 017007 included in block group 1 and blocks 2000, 2001, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013 and 2014; and that part of Dallas County tract 017008 included in block groups 2 and 3 and blocks 1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1015, 1016, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045 and 1046; and that part of Dallas County tract 017009 included in block 2002; and that part of Dallas County tract 017010 included in blocks 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031 and 1032; and that part of Dallas County tract 017201 included in blocks 3000 and 3001; and that part of Dallas County tract 017203 included in blocks 1000, 1006 and 1007; and that part of Dallas County tract 017314 included in block groups 1 and 3 and blocks 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2015, 2016, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4014, 4015, 4016, 4017, 4020, 4021, 4022 and 4023; and that part of Dallas County tract 017604 included in blocks 1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2010, 2011, 2015, 2016, 2017 and 2018; and that part of Dallas County tract 017805 included in block groups 2 and 3 and blocks 1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1015, 1016, 1017, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4009, 4011, 4012, 4013, 4014, 4015, 4016, 4017, 4018, 4019, 4020, 4023, 4024, 4025, 4026, 4027, 4028, 4029 and 4030; and that part of Dallas County tract 017806 included in block groups 2 and 3 and blocks 1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1017, 1018, 1019 and 1020; and that part of Dallas County tract 017900 included in block group 2 and blocks 1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3023, 3024, 3025, 3026 and 3027; and that part of Dallas County tract 018001 included in block groups 1, 2 and 4 and blocks 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3020 and 3021; and that part of Dallas County tract 018203 included in block groups 1 and 2 and blocks 3000, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3024, 3025, 3026, 3027, 3028, 3029, 3030, 3031, 3032, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4013, 4014, 4015, 4016, 4017, 4018, 4019, 4020, 4021 and 4022; and that part of Dallas County tract 018204 included in block groups 2 and 3 and blocks 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1021, 1022, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040 and 1041; and that part of Dallas County tract 018506 included in block group 2 and blocks 1000, 1002, 1003, 1004, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3023, 3024, 3025, 3026, 3027, 3028, 3029, 3030, 3031, 3032, 3033, 3034, 3035, 3036, 3037, 3038, 3039, 3040, 3041, 3042, 3043, 3044, 3045, 3046, 3047, 3048, 3049, 3050, 3051, 3052, 3053, 3054, 3055, 3056, 3057, 3058, 3059, 3060, 3061, 3062, 3063, 3064, 3065, 3066, 3067, 3068, 3069, 3070, 3071, 3072, 3073, 3074, 3075, 3076, 3077, 3078, 3079, 3080, 3081 and 3082; and that part of Dallas County tract 018700 included in block groups 1 and 3 and blocks 2000, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034 and 2035. SECTION 6.  District 6 is composed of Ellis and Navarro Counties; and Dallas County tracts 014139, 014140, 014145, 014146, 014147, 014148, 014153, 014154, 014158, 014161, 014203, 014204, 014205, 014207, 014208, 014306, 014308, 014309, 014310, 014313, 014314, 014315, 014316, 014317, 014318, 014319, 014320, 014405, 014406, 014407, 014408, 014409, 014410, 014501, 014502, 014601, 014602, 014603, 014701, 014704, 014903, 015001, 015002, 015101, 015102, 015202, 015205, 015206, 015207, 015208, 015303, 015304, 015305, 015306, 015405 and 015406; and that part of Dallas County tract 014159 included in blocks 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2008, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2037, 2038, 2039, 2041, 2042, 2043, 2044, 2045, 2046, 2047, 2048, 2049, 2050, 2051, 2052, 2053, 2054, 2055, 2056, 2057, 2058, 2059, 2060, 2061, 2062, 2063, 2064, 2065, 2066, 2067, 2068 and 2069; and that part of Dallas County tract 014160 included in blocks 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027 and 1028; and that part of Dallas County tract 014209 included in blocks 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013 and 1014; and that part of Dallas County tract 015600 included in blocks 3000, 3001 and 3002; and that part of Dallas County tract 015700 included in blocks 1000 and 1001; and that part of Dallas County tract 020100 included in block group 2 and blocks 1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1049, 1050, 1051, 1052, 1054, 1055, 1056, 1057, 1058, 1059, 1060, 1061, 1062, 1063, 1064, 1065, 1066, 1067, 1068, 1069, 1070, 1071, 1072, 1073, 1074, 1075 and 1076; and that part of Dallas County tract 021200 included in blocks 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006 and 3007; and that part of Dallas County tract 980000 included in blocks 1036, 1041, 1044, 1048, 1049, 1050, 1053, 1054, 1055, 1056, 1057, 1058, 1059, 1060, 1061, 1062, 1063, 1064, 1075, 1077, 1078, 1079, 1081, 1082, 1083, 1084, 1085 and 1086; and Johnson County tracts 130211, 130219, 130220, 130221, 130222, 130303, 130405, 130406, 130411, 130412, 130413, 130414, 130415, 130416, 130417, 130418, 130419 and 130501; and that part of Johnson County tract 130210 included in block groups 2 and 3 and blocks 1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1051, 1052, 1053, 1054, 1055, 1056, 1058, 1059, 1060 and 1061; and that part of Johnson County tract 130304 included in block groups 2 and 3 and blocks 1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032 and 1033; and that part of Johnson County tract 130502 included in blocks 1000, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1049, 1050 and 1053; and that part of Johnson County tract 130603 included in blocks 1004, 1005 and 1011; and that part of Johnson County tract 130800 included in blocks 2131, 2132, 2159, 2160, 2161, 2162 and 2163; and that part of Johnson County tract 130900 included in block group 1 and blocks 2000, 2001, 2002, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2037, 2038, 2039, 2040, 2041, 2042, 2043, 2044, 2045, 2046, 2047, 2048, 2049, 2050, 2051, 2052, 2053, 2054, 2055, 2056, 2057, 2058, 2059, 2060, 2061, 2062, 2063, 2064, 2065 and 2066; and Tarrant County tracts 111304, 111306, 111307, 111308, 111309, 111311, 111312, 111317, 111318, 111402, 111405, 111406, 111407, 111408, 111409, 111410, 111411, 111506, 111526, 111529, 111530, 111531, 111532, 111533, 111534, 111545, 111546, 111551, 111552, 111553, 113004, 121608, 121610, 122100, 122300, 122402, 122500, 122600 and 122702; and that part of Tarrant County tract 106004 included in block 1000; and that part of Tarrant County tract 111102 included in blocks 1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007 and 1051; and that part of Tarrant County tract 111203 included in block group 1 and block 3018; and that part of Tarrant County tract 111204 included in block group 2 and blocks 1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1009, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3026, 3027, 3028, 3029, 3030, 3031, 3032 and 3033; and that part of Tarrant County tract 111314 included in blocks 2008, 2009, 2010, 2017, 2018 and 2019; and that part of Tarrant County tract 111319 included in block group 2 and blocks 1000, 1001, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013 and 1014; and that part of Tarrant County tract 111505 included in block group 2 and blocks 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1027, 1028 and 1029; and that part of Tarrant County tract 113003 included in blocks 1051, 1052, 1053, 1055, 1056, 1057, 1058, 1059, 1060, 1069, 1070, 1071, 1072, 1073, 1074, 1075, 1076, 1077, 1078, 1079, 1080, 1081, 1082, 1083, 1084, 1085, 1086, 1087, 1088 and 1090; and that part of Tarrant County tract 113005 included in blocks 1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1049, 1050, 1051, 1052, 1053, 1054, 1055, 1056, 1057, 1058, 1059, 1060, 1061, 1062, 1063, 1064, 1065, 1066, 1067, 1068, 1069, 1070, 1071, 1072, 1073, 1074, 1075, 1076, 1077, 1078, 1079, 1080, 1081, 1082, 1083, 1084, 1085, 1086, 1087, 1088, 1089, 1090, 1091, 1092, 1093, 1094, 1095, 1096, 1097, 1098, 1099, 1100, 1101, 1102, 1103, 1104, 1105, 1106, 1107, 1108, 1109, 1110, 1111, 1112, 1113, 1114, 1115, 1116, 1117, 1118, 1119, 1120, 1121, 1122, 1123, 1124, 1125, 1126, 1127, 1128, 1129, 1130, 1131, 1132, 1133, 1134, 1135, 1136, 1137, 1138, 1139, 1140, 1141, 1142, 1143, 1144, 1145, 1146, 1147, 1148, 1149, 1150, 1151, 1152, 1153, 1154, 1155, 1156, 1157, 1158, 1160, 1161, 1162, 1163, 1164, 1165, 1166, 1169, 1170, 1173 and 1175; and that part of Tarrant County tract 113109 included in blocks 2000, 2001, 2003 and 2015; and that part of Tarrant County tract 113115 included in blocks 3000 and 3001; and that part of Tarrant County tract 113116 included in blocks 1000, 1001 and 1002; and that part of Tarrant County tract 121605 included in blocks 3026, 3027, 3028, 3029 and 3030; and that part of Tarrant County tract 121606 included in block group 1 and blocks 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2021, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2037, 2038, 2039, 2043, 2044, 2045, 2046, 2047, 2050, 2051, 2052, 2053, 2054, 2055, 2056, 2057, 2058, 2059, 2060, 2061, 2062, 2063, 2064 and 2065; and that part of Tarrant County tract 121609 included in block group 3 and blocks 1032, 1034, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004 and 2005; and that part of Tarrant County tract 121611 included in block groups 1 and 2 and blocks 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4013, 4016, 4017, 4018 and 4019; and that part of Tarrant County tract 121702 included in blocks 2020, 2022, 3002, 3008, 3014, 3016, 3017, 3018, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4013, 4021, 4022, 4023, 4024, 4025, 4026, 4027, 4028, 4029, 4030, 4031 and 4032; and that part of Tarrant County tract 122200 included in blocks 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2037, 2038, 2039, 2040, 2041, 2042, 2043, 2044 and 2045; and that part of Tarrant County tract 122401 included in block group 2 and blocks 1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1018, 1019 and 1020. SECTION 7.  District 7 is composed of Fort Bend County tracts 672303, 672401, 672500, 672602, 672603, 672604, 672701, 672702, 672703, 672902, 672904, 672905, 672906, 672907, 673802, 673903, 673904, 674604 and 674701; and that part of Fort Bend County tract 671900 included in block 1000; and that part of Fort Bend County tract 672004 included in block group 2; and that part of Fort Bend County tract 672100 included in block 1018; and that part of Fort Bend County tract 672201 included in block 2016; and that part of Fort Bend County tract 672305 included in block group 1; and that part of Fort Bend County tract 672402 included in blocks 1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015 and 1016; and that part of Fort Bend County tract 672801 included in block group 2 and blocks 1000 and 1001; and that part of Fort Bend County tract 672802 included in block group 1 and blocks 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011 and 2012; and that part of Fort Bend County tract 672901 included in block group 1 and blocks 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2037, 2038, 2039, 2040, 2041, 2042, 2043, 2044, 2045, 2046, 2047, 2048, 2049, 2050, 2051, 2063, 2064, 2067, 2071, 2072, 2073, 2074, 2075, 2076, 2077, 2078, 2080 and 2081; and that part of Fort Bend County tract 672903 included in blocks 1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1011, 1012, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3024, 3025, 3026, 3027, 3028, 3029, 3030, 3031, 3032, 3033, 3034, 3035, 3036, 3037, 3038, 3039, 3040, 3041, 3042, 3047, 3048, 3049, 3050, 3051, 3052, 3053, 3054, 3055 and 3056; and that part of Fort Bend County tract 673007 included in blocks 1036, 1037 and 1038; and that part of Fort Bend County tract 673700 included in blocks 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026 and 1027; and that part of Fort Bend County tract 673801 included in block group 1 and blocks 2000, 2001, 2002, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 3007, 3008, 3040 and 3042; and that part of Fort Bend County tract 673902 included in block groups 2 and 3; and that part of Fort Bend County tract 674401 included in blocks 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1028, 2006, 2007, 3006, 3007 and 3008; and that part of Fort Bend County tract 674702 included in block group 1 and blocks 4046, 4047, 4048, 4049, 4050, 4059 and 4060; and that part of Fort Bend County tract 675502 included in blocks 1000, 1001, 1002 and 1040; and Harris County tracts 410201, 410202, 410300, 410401, 410402, 410501, 410703, 410704, 410705, 410706, 410801, 410802, 410900, 411001, 411002, 411003, 411503, 411504, 411506, 411507, 411700, 411801, 411802, 411901, 411902, 412000, 412201, 412300, 412400, 412500, 412600, 412700, 412800, 412901, 413000, 413100, 413203, 413204, 413205, 413206, 420800, 420900, 421000, 421101, 421103, 421104, 421203, 421204, 421205, 421206, 421301, 421302, 421401, 421402, 421403, 421501, 421502, 421601, 421602, 421700, 421801, 421802, 422601, 422602, 422701, 422702, 422800, 422900, 423001, 423002, 431102, 431401, 431403, 431404, 431801, 431803, 431901, 431902, 432003, 432004, 432005, 432006, 432101, 432200, 432301, 432302, 432303, 432401, 432402, 432501, 432502, 432703, 432704, 432705, 432706, 432803, 432804, 432805, 432806, 432901, 432903, 432904, 433003, 433004, 433005, 433006, 433007, 433100, 433201, 433202, 433300, 433400, 433503, 433504, 433505, 433506, 433507, 451902, 452002, 452101, 452102, 452103, 452202, 452203, 452204, 452300, 452401, 452402, 452802, 452900, 453001, 453002, 453100, 453201, 453202, 453403, 453501, 453502, 453601, 453603, 453604, 453701, 453702, 453800, 453901, 453902, 510100, 510201, 510202, 510301, 510302, 510400, 510500, 510601, 510602, 510701, 510702, 510801, 510803, 510901, 510902, 511001, 511003, 511004, 511100, 511201, 511202, 511301, 511302, 511400, 511501, 511502, 511600 and 980300; and that part of Harris County tract 210400 included in block group 2 and blocks 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1021, 1022, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1049, 1050, 1051, 1052, 1053, 1054, 1055, 1056, 1057, 1058, 1059, 1060, 1061, 1066, 1067, 1068, 1069, 1070, 1071, 1072, 1073, 1074 and 1075; and that part of Harris County tract 210500 included in blocks 1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2036, 2037, 2038, 2039, 2040, 2041, 2042, 2043, 2044, 2045, 2046, 2053, 2054, 2055, 2062, 2063, 2064, 2065, 2066, 2067, 2072, 2073, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3024, 3025, 3026, 3027, 3028, 3029, 3030, 3031, 3032, 3033, 3034, 3035, 3036, 3037, 3038, 3039, 3040, 3041, 3042, 3043, 3044, 3045, 3046 and 3047; and that part of Harris County tract 212300 included in block groups 2 and 5 and blocks 3068, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4013 and 4021; and that part of Harris County tract 410502 included in block group 1 and blocks 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022 and 3023; and that part of Harris County tract 410601 included in blocks 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1052, 1057, 1058 and 1060; and that part of Harris County tract 410602 included in blocks 2021, 2022 and 2025; and that part of Harris County tract 411100 included in blocks 1000, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017 and 3018; and that part of Harris County tract 411200 included in block 1004; and that part of Harris County tract 411400 included in blocks 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013 and 3014; and that part of Harris County tract 411505 included in block group 1 and blocks 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013 and 2014; and that part of Harris County tract 412202 included in block groups 2 and 3 and blocks 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019 and 1020; and that part of Harris County tract 431101 included in block groups 2, 3 and 4; and that part of Harris County tract 431804 included in blocks 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008 and 1009; and that part of Harris County tract 432600 included in blocks 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023 and 2024; and that part of Harris County tract 452501 included in block group 1 and blocks 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2037, 2038, 2039, 2041, 2042, 2043 and 2047; and that part of Harris County tract 452801 included in block groups 2 and 3 and blocks 1000, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011 and 1012; and that part of Harris County tract 453404 included in block groups 2 and 3; and that part of Harris County tract 454000 included in blocks 2025, 2026 and 2027; and that part of Harris County tract 510802 included in block group 2 and blocks 1000, 1001, 1002, 1004, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1049, 1050, 1051, 1052, 1053, 1054, 1055, 1058, 1059 and 1060; and that part of Harris County tract 520501 included in blocks 1047, 1048, 1049, 1050, 1051 and 1052; and that part of Harris County tract 530102 included in block 2019. SECTION 8.  District 8 is composed of Waller County; and Harris County tracts 450500, 450801, 450803, 450804, 450900, 451003, 451004, 451005, 451006, 451100, 451401, 451404, 451405, 451406, 451407, 451501, 451502, 451603, 451604, 451605, 451606, 451700, 451800, 451903, 451904, 452001, 452502, 452601, 452602, 452701, 452702, 452703, 454100, 454200, 454302, 454303, 454304, 454305, 540502, 540503, 540504, 540601, 541301, 541302, 541401, 541402, 541403, 541404, 541500, 541603, 541604, 541701, 541702, 541703, 541801, 541802, 541901, 541902, 542001, 542002, 542103, 542104, 542105, 542106, 542107, 542108, 542201, 542203, 542304, 543008, 543009, 543010, 543011 and 543100; and that part of Harris County tract 450402 included in blocks 1001, 1002, 1005 and 1006; and that part of Harris County tract 450600 included in block group 4; and that part of Harris County tract 451301 included in block groups 1, 2 and 3 and blocks 4003, 4004, 4005, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4013, 4014, 4015, 4016, 4017 and 4018; and that part of Harris County tract 451302 included in blocks 1008, 1009, 1014 and 1015; and that part of Harris County tract 452501 included in blocks 2008, 2040, 2044, 2045, 2046, 2048 and 2049; and that part of Harris County tract 452801 included in blocks 1001 and 1002; and that part of Harris County tract 454000 included in block group 1 and blocks 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023 and 2024; and that part of Harris County tract 454400 included in blocks 1000, 1001, 1003, 1004, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1030, 1031, 1040, 1041 and 1042; and that part of Harris County tract 454505 included in blocks 1000 and 1001; and that part of Harris County tract 540602 included in block groups 1, 2 and 4 and blocks 3005, 3006, 3007, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015 and 3016; and that part of Harris County tract 541204 included in block group 1 and blocks 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 3001, 3002, 3003 and 3004; and that part of Harris County tract 541206 included in blocks 1000, 1001, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 2005, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2018 and 2019; and that part of Harris County tract 542003 included in block 2000; and that part of Harris County tract 542004 included in block group 1; and that part of Harris County tract 542202 included in block group 1 and blocks 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035 and 2036; and that part of Harris County tract 542305 included in blocks 1000, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009 and 1013; and that part of Harris County tract 543005 included in block group 2 and blocks 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1049, 1050, 1051, 1052, 1053, 1054, 1055, 1056, 1058, 1059 and 1060; and that part of Harris County tract 543006 included in blocks 1044, 1050, 1051, 1052, 1053, 1054, 1055, 1056, 1057, 1058, 1059, 1060, 1061, 1062, 1063, 1064, 1065, 1066, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2036, 2037, 2038 and 2039; and that part of Harris County tract 543202 included in blocks 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2011, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2037, 2038, 2039, 2040, 2041 and 2047; and that part of Harris County tract 556000 included in block groups 1 and 5; and Montgomery County tracts 690101, 690102, 690203, 690204, 690205, 690206, 690207, 690300, 690403, 690404, 690405, 690406, 690407, 690408, 693001, 693002, 693102, 693103, 693104, 693201, 693202, 693301, 693302, 693303, 693304, 693401, 693402, 693501, 693502, 693503, 693600, 693701, 693702, 693703, 693800, 693901, 693902, 693903, 693904, 694001, 694002, 694103, 694104, 694105, 694106, 694107, 694203, 694204, 694205, 694206, 694207, 694208, 694209, 694210, 694303, 694304, 694305, 694306, 694307, 694308, 694309, 694401, 694402, 694403, 694501, 694502, 694503, 694601, 694602, 694603 and 694700; and that part of Montgomery County tract 690502 included in block 2004; and that part of Montgomery County tract 692201 included in blocks 1000, 1001, 1002, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009 and 2010; and that part of Montgomery County tract 692202 included in block groups 1, 2 and 3; and that part of Montgomery County tract 692601 included in block 1000; and that part of Montgomery County tract 692701 included in blocks 1003, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012 and 1013; and Walker County tracts 790200, 790600 and 790700; and that part of Walker County tract 790101 included in block 1127; and that part of Walker County tract 790102 included in blocks 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018 and 2019; and that part of Walker County tract 790103 included in blocks 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3024, 3025, 3026, 3027, 3028, 3029, 3030, 3031, 3032, 3033, 3034, 3035, 3036, 3037, 3038, 3039, 3040, 3041, 3042, 3043, 3044 and 3052; and that part of Walker County tract 790302 included in blocks 1000, 2000, 2052, 2053, 3039, 3040, 3041, 3047, 3048, 3049, 3050, 3051, 3052, 3053, 3054, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4013, 4014, 4015, 4016, 4017, 4019, 4020, 4021, 4022, 4023, 4024, 4025, 4026, 4027, 4028, 4029, 4030, 4031, 4032, 4033, 4034, 4035, 4036, 4037, 4038, 4039, 4040, 4041, 4042, 4043, 4044, 4045, 4046, 4047, 4048, 4049, 4050, 4051, 4052, 4053, 4054, 4055, 4056, 4057, 4058, 4059, 4060 and 4061; and that part of Walker County tract 790500 included in blocks 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2043, 2044, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3023, 3024, 3025, 3026, 3027 and 3033; and that part of Walker County tract 790800 included in block group 1. SECTION 9.  District 9 is composed of Liberty County; and Harris County tracts 211501, 211900, 232402, 232403, 232404, 232405, 232500, 232600, 232701, 232703, 232704, 232801, 232802, 232901, 232902, 233001, 233002, 233003, 233101, 233103, 233104, 233105, 233200, 233300, 233501, 233502, 233702, 233703, 251800, 251902, 251904, 252100, 252201, 252202, 252303, 252304, 252305, 252306, 252400, 252500, 252601, 252602, 252700, 252800, 252901, 252902, 253000, 253101, 253102, 253202, 253300, 253501, 253502, 253601, 253602, 253700, 254200, 254300, 254400, 254800, 310700, 310800, 311001, 311002, 311100, 311200, 311300, 311400, 311501, 311502, 311600, 311701, 311702, 311800, 320100, 320201, 320202, 320500, 320800, 320901, 320902, 321001, 321002, 321301, 321302, 321401, 321402, 321500, 321600, 321700, 321800, 321900, 322000, 322100, 322200, 322600, 322701, 322702, 322800, 322900, 323000, 323100, 323200, 323300, 323400, 323500, 323601, 323602, 323701, 323702, 323801, 323802, 323900, 324101, 324102, 324200, 332700, 332800, 332900, 333000, 342001, 342002, 342100, 342200, 342300, 342400, 342500, 342700, 342801, 342802, 342900, 343301 and 343302; and that part of Harris County tract 211502 included in block group 2 and blocks 1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1049, 1050, 1051 and 1052; and that part of Harris County tract 211600 included in blocks 1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1022, 1023, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2037 and 2041; and that part of Harris County tract 212400 included in block groups 1 and 3 and blocks 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2049, 2050, 2056, 2057, 2058, 2059, 2060, 2061, 2064, 2065, 2073 and 2074; and that part of Harris County tract 212500 included in blocks 1014, 1015, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1049, 1050, 1051, 1052, 1053, 1054, 1055, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3024, 3025, 3026, 3027, 3028, 3029, 3030, 3031, 3032, 3033, 3034, 3035, 3036, 3037, 3038, 3039, 3045 and 3046; and that part of Harris County tract 233400 included in block group 1 and blocks 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2014, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033 and 2034; and that part of Harris County tract 233701 included in block group 2 and blocks 1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1049, 1050, 1051, 1052, 1053, 1054, 1055, 1056, 1057, 1058, 1059, 1060, 1061, 1062, 1063, 1064, 1065, 1066, 1067 and 1068; and that part of Harris County tract 251701 included in blocks 1000, 1001, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 2000, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2019, 2020, 2021 and 2022; and that part of Harris County tract 251702 included in blocks 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2036, 2037, 2038, 2039, 2040, 2052, 2054 and 2055; and that part of Harris County tract 251903 included in block groups 1 and 3 and blocks 2000, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016 and 2017; and that part of Harris County tract 252002 included in blocks 1000, 1001, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2037, 2038, 2039, 2040, 2045, 2046, 2047, 2048, 2049, 2050, 2051, 2052, 2053, 2054, 2055, 2056, 2057, 2058, 2059, 2060, 2061, 2062 and 2063; and that part of Harris County tract 252003 included in block group 3 and blocks 1000, 1001, 1002, 1004, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 2001, 2052, 2053 and 2054; and that part of Harris County tract 253201 included in block group 1 and blocks 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2011, 2012, 2013, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007 and 3008; and that part of Harris County tract 253800 included in block group 1 and blocks 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012 and 4013; and that part of Harris County tract 254000 included in blocks 2009, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014 and 2019; and that part of Harris County tract 254100 included in block groups 2, 3 and 4 and blocks 1009, 1010, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018 and 1019; and that part of Harris County tract 254600 included in block group 1 and blocks 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2034, 2035, 2036, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3024, 3025, 3026, 3027, 3028, 3029, 3030, 3031, 3032, 3033, 3034, 3035, 3036, 3037, 3038, 3039, 3040, 3041, 3042, 3043, 3044, 3049 and 3050; and that part of Harris County tract 254700 included in blocks 1008, 1009, 1010, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015 and 1016; and that part of Harris County tract 310900 included in block groups 1, 2, 3 and 5 and blocks 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4013, 4014, 4015, 4016, 4018, 4019, 4020 and 4021; and that part of Harris County tract 311900 included in block group 1 and blocks 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030 and 2031; and that part of Harris County tract 313400 included in blocks 2000 and 2001; and that part of Harris County tract 320601 included in block group 1 and blocks 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015 and 2016; and that part of Harris County tract 320602 included in block groups 2 and 3 and blocks 1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014 and 1015; and that part of Harris County tract 320700 included in block groups 2 and 3 and blocks 1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1026, 1027, 1028 and 1029; and that part of Harris County tract 321200 included in block group 2 and blocks 1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007 and 1008; and that part of Harris County tract 324000 included in block groups 1 and 2 and blocks 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3010, 3011, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020 and 3022; and that part of Harris County tract 332200 included in blocks 1000, 1003 and 2000; and that part of Harris County tract 332600 included in block group 1; and that part of Harris County tract 343000 included in block group 1 and blocks 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2022, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3025, 3026, 3027, 3028, 3029, 3030, 3031, 3032, 3033 and 3034; and that part of Harris County tract 343100 included in block group 3 and blocks 1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029 and 2031; and that part of Harris County tract 343200 included in block group 1 and blocks 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2024, 2025 and 2026; and that part of Harris County tract 343601 included in blocks 1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1049, 1050, 1051, 1052, 1053, 1054, 1055, 1056, 1057, 1058, 1059, 1060, 1061, 1062, 1063, 1064, 1065, 1066, 1067, 1068, 1069, 1070, 1071, 1072, 1073, 1074, 1075, 1076, 1077, 1078, 1079, 1080, 1081, 1082, 1083, 1084, 1085, 1086, 1087, 1088, 1089, 1090, 1091, 1092, 1093, 1102, 1104, 1105, 1106, 1107, 1108, 1109, 1110, 1111, 1112, 1113, 1114, 1115, 1116, 1117, 1118, 1119, 1120, 1121, 1123, 1124, 1125, 1126, 1127, 1133, 1134, 1135, 1136, 1137, 1138, 1139, 1140, 1141, 1142, 1143, 1144, 1145, 1151, 1152, 1161, 1162, 1163, 1164, 1165, 1166, 1167, 1168, 1169, 1170, 1171, 1172, 1173, 1174, 1175, 1176, 1177, 1178, 1179, 1180, 1181, 1182, 1183, 1184, 1185, 1186, 1187, 1188, 1189, 1190, 1191, 1192, 1193, 1194, 1195, 1196, 1197, 1198, 1199, 1200, 1201, 1202, 1205 and 1206; and that part of Harris County tract 343700 included in blocks 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 3030, 3031, 3032, 3033, 3034, 3035, 3036, 3037, 3038, 3039, 3040, 3051, 3052, 3053, 3069 and 3070. SECTION 10.  District 10 is composed of Brazos, Burleson, Grimes, Houston, Lee, Leon, Madison, Polk, San Jacinto and Trinity Counties; and that part of Bastrop County tract 950102 included in blocks 1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1035, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1049, 1051, 1052 and 3000; and that part of Bastrop County tract 950201 included in blocks 2000, 3000, 3001 and 3002; and that part of Bastrop County tract 950202 included in blocks 1000, 1004 and 1005; and Travis County tracts 001102, 001602, 001604, 001910, 001912, 001913, 001914, 001916, 001918, 001919, 001921, 002500, 030500, 031400, 031500, 032900, 033100, 033600, 033900, 034000, 034900, 035000, 035100, 035200, 035300, 035400, 036200, 036400, 036500, 036600, 036900, 037000, 037300, 037400, 037600, 042900 and 044200; and that part of Travis County tract 000700 included in blocks 1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1061, 1062, 1063, 1064, 1065, 1066, 1067, 1068, 1070, 1072, 1073, 1074, 1075, 1076, 1077 and 1078; and that part of Travis County tract 001101 included in block group 1 and blocks 2000, 2001, 2002, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2037, 2038, 2039, 2040, 2041, 2042, 2043 and 2044; and that part of Travis County tract 001103 included in block group 2 and blocks 1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009 and 1012; and that part of Travis County tract 001200 included in block groups 1 and 4 and blocks 2004, 2005, 2009, 2010, 2015, 2016, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3010, 3011, 5000, 5001, 5002, 5003, 5004, 5005, 5006, 5007, 5008, 5009, 5010, 5011, 5012, 5013, 5014, 5015, 5016 and 5017; and that part of Travis County tract 001309 included in blocks 1000 and 1001; and that part of Travis County tract 001311 included in blocks 1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005 and 1006; and that part of Travis County tract 001401 included in block 2002; and that part of Travis County tract 001402 included in blocks 1000 and 1002; and that part of Travis County tract 001603 included in blocks 5001, 5002, 5003, 5004, 5005, 5006, 5007, 5008, 5009, 5010, 5011, 5012, 5013, 5014, 5015, 5016, 5017, 5018, 5019, 5020, 5021, 5022, 5023, 5024, 5025, 5026, 5027, 5028 and 5029; and that part of Travis County tract 001605 included in blocks 1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021 and 1022; and that part of Travis County tract 001911 included in blocks 1000, 1009, 2000, 3005, 3012, 3013, 3014 and 3017; and that part of Travis County tract 001915 included in blocks 1003, 1004, 1010, 1011, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1028, 1046, 1047 and 1048; and that part of Travis County tract 001917 included in block groups 1 and 3 and blocks 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011 and 2012; and that part of Travis County tract 001920 included in block group 3 and blocks 1000, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021 and 2022; and that part of Travis County tract 030700 included in block 3017; and that part of Travis County tract 030800 included in blocks 1006, 1007 and 4001; and that part of Travis County tract 031600 included in block group 1 and blocks 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010 and 2011; and that part of Travis County tract 032500 included in blocks 1000 and 3001; and that part of Travis County tract 032600 included in block group 3 and blocks 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034 and 2037; and that part of Travis County tract 032700 included in blocks 1023, 1024, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1036, 2006, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2021, 2022 and 2023; and that part of Travis County tract 032800 included in blocks 1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1012 and 1013; and that part of Travis County tract 033000 included in block group 3 and blocks 2016 and 2017; and that part of Travis County tract 034100 included in block group 3 and blocks 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011 and 1012; and that part of Travis County tract 034200 included in block groups 1, 2 and 4 and blocks 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006 and 3009; and that part of Travis County tract 034400 included in blocks 1001 and 2015; and that part of Travis County tract 034600 included in block groups 2 and 3 and blocks 1003, 1004, 1007, 1008 and 1009; and that part of Travis County tract 035600 included in block group 1 and blocks 2026, 2027, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2037, 2038, 2039, 2040, 2041, 2043, 2044, 2045, 2046, 2047, 2048, 2049, 2050, 2051, 2052, 2053, 2054, 2055 and 2056; and that part of Travis County tract 035700 included in block 1006; and that part of Travis County tract 035800 included in block group 2 and blocks 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1023, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1049 and 1050; and that part of Travis County tract 035900 included in blocks 1017, 1018, 1019, 1024, 1025 and 1027; and that part of Travis County tract 036300 included in blocks 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1030, 1031 and 1032; and that part of Travis County tract 037500 included in blocks 1000, 1001, 1002, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1049, 1050, 1051, 1052, 1053, 1054, 1055, 1056, 1057, 1058, 1059, 1060, 1061, 1062, 1063, 1064, 1065, 1066, 1067, 1068, 1069, 1070, 1071, 1072, 1073, 1074, 1075 and 1076; and that part of Travis County tract 041300 included in blocks 1000, 1005, 2000 and 2001; and that part of Travis County tract 042000 included in blocks 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1021, 1023, 1024, 1031, 1032, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014 and 2015; and that part of Travis County tract 042400 included in blocks 1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3016, 3019 and 3027; and that part of Travis County tract 042500 included in blocks 1023, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040 and 1041; and that part of Travis County tract 043000 included in block groups 2 and 3 and blocks 1005, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019 and 1024; and that part of Travis County tract 043500 included in block 1008; and that part of Travis County tract 043900 included in block 1000; and that part of Travis County tract 044300 included in block groups 2 and 3 and blocks 1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029 and 1030; and that part of Travis County tract 044600 included in blocks 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2037, 2038, 2039, 2040, 2041, 2042, 2043, 2044, 2045, 2046, 2047, 2048, 2049 and 2050; and that part of Travis County tract 044700 included in blocks 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032 and 1033; and that part of Travis County tract 044800 included in blocks 1026, 1027, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1049, 1050, 1051, 1052, 1053, 1054, 1055, 1056 and 1057; and that part of Travis County tract 044900 included in blocks 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2032, 2035, 2036, 2037, 2038 and 2047; and that part of Travis County tract 045100 included in blocks 2000 and 2002; and that part of Travis County tract 045800 included in blocks 1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1071, 1073, 1074, 1075, 1076, 1077, 1079, 1080, 1081, 1082 and 1089; and that part of Travis County tract 045900 included in block 1007; and Walker County tracts 790301, 790401 and 790402; and that part of Walker County tract 790101 included in block groups 2 and 3 and blocks 1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1049, 1050, 1051, 1052, 1053, 1054, 1055, 1056, 1057, 1058, 1059, 1060, 1061, 1062, 1063, 1064, 1065, 1066, 1067, 1068, 1069, 1070, 1071, 1072, 1073, 1074, 1075, 1076, 1077, 1078, 1079, 1080, 1081, 1082, 1083, 1084, 1085, 1086, 1087, 1088, 1089, 1090, 1091, 1092, 1093, 1094, 1095, 1096, 1097, 1098, 1099, 1100, 1101, 1102, 1103, 1104, 1105, 1106, 1107, 1108, 1109, 1110, 1111, 1112, 1113, 1114, 1115, 1116, 1117, 1118, 1119, 1120, 1121, 1122, 1123, 1124, 1125, 1126, 1128, 1129, 1130, 1131, 1132, 1133, 1134, 1135, 1136, 1137, 1138, 1139, 1140, 1141, 1142, 1143, 1144, 1145, 1146, 1147, 1148, 1149, 1150, 1151, 1152, 1153, 1154, 1155, 1156, 1157, 1158, 1159, 1160, 1161, 1162, 1163, 1164, 1165, 1166, 1167 and 1168; and that part of Walker County tract 790102 included in block group 1 and blocks 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004 and 2005; and that part of Walker County tract 790103 included in block groups 1 and 2 and blocks 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3045, 3046, 3047, 3048, 3049, 3050, 3051 and 3053; and that part of Walker County tract 790302 included in blocks 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2037, 2038, 2039, 2040, 2041, 2042, 2043, 2044, 2045, 2046, 2047, 2048, 2049, 2050, 2051, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3024, 3025, 3026, 3027, 3028, 3029, 3030, 3031, 3032, 3033, 3034, 3035, 3036, 3037, 3038, 3042, 3043, 3044, 3045, 3046, 3055, 3056, 3057, 3058, 3059, 3060, 3061, 3062 and 4018; and that part of Walker County tract 790500 included in block groups 1 and 4 and blocks 2000, 2001, 2002, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2037, 2038, 2039, 2040, 2041, 2042, 2045, 2046, 2047, 3004, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3021, 3022, 3028, 3029, 3030, 3031, 3032, 3034, 3035, 3036, 3037, 3038, 3039, 3040, 3041 and 3042; and that part of Walker County tract 790800 included in block groups 2, 3, 4 and 5. SECTION 11.  District 11 is composed of Brown, Coke, Coleman, Concho, Ector, Glasscock, Irion, Kimble, Llano, McCulloch, Mason, Menard, Midland, Runnels, San Saba, Sterling and Tom Green Counties; and Burnet County tracts 960801 and 960802; and that part of Burnet County tract 960402 included in blocks 2072, 2084, 2085, 2087 and 2088; and that part of Burnet County tract 960701 included in blocks 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1099, 2066, 2067, 2068, 2069, 2070 and 2071; and that part of Burnet County tract 960803 included in block group 1 and blocks 2012, 2013, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2026, 2027, 2044, 2045, 2046, 2047, 2048, 2049, 2050, 2051, 2052, 2053, 2056, 2057, 2058, 2059, 2060, 2061, 2062, 2063, 2064, 2065, 2066, 2067, 2068, 2069, 2070, 2071, 2072, 2073, 2074, 2075, 2076, 2077, 2078, 2079, 2080, 2081, 2082, 2083, 2084, 2085, 2086, 2087, 2088, 2089, 2090, 2091, 2092, 2093, 2094 and 2095; and Travis County tracts 033700, 033800, 034300, 034500, 035500, 036000, 036100, 042300, 042600, 042700, 042800, 044100, 044400, 044500, 045500, 045600, 045700, 046000, 046100, 046200, 046300, 046400, 046500, 046600, 046700, 046800, 046900 and 047000; and that part of Travis County tract 032600 included in blocks 1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1017, 1018, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2024 and 2025; and that part of Travis County tract 032700 included in blocks 1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1033, 1034, 1035, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011 and 2020; and that part of Travis County tract 034100 included in block group 2 and blocks 1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1013 and 1014; and that part of Travis County tract 034200 included in blocks 3007 and 3008; and that part of Travis County tract 034400 included in blocks 1000, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2016, 2017 and 2018; and that part of Travis County tract 034600 included in blocks 1000, 1001, 1002, 1005 and 1006; and that part of Travis County tract 035600 included in blocks 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2042, 2057 and 2058; and that part of Travis County tract 035700 included in block groups 2 and 3 and blocks 1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004 and 1005; and that part of Travis County tract 035800 included in blocks 1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1022, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030 and 1051; and that part of Travis County tract 035900 included in block groups 2 and 3 and blocks 1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023 and 1026; and that part of Travis County tract 036300 included in blocks 1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029 and 1033; and that part of Travis County tract 037500 included in block 1003; and that part of Travis County tract 042000 included in block 1000; and that part of Travis County tract 042500 included in block groups 2 and 3 and blocks 1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029 and 1033; and that part of Travis County tract 043000 included in blocks 1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1006, 1007, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031 and 1032; and that part of Travis County tract 044600 included in blocks 1000, 1001, 1009, 2000, 2001 and 2002; and that part of Travis County tract 044700 included in blocks 1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004 and 1005; and that part of Travis County tract 044800 included in blocks 1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1028, 1029 and 1030; and that part of Travis County tract 044900 included in blocks 1000, 1001 and 1002; and Williamson County tracts 020511, 020512, 020513, 020710 and 020713; and that part of Williamson County tract 020405 included in blocks 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4013, 4014, 4015, 4016, 4017, 4018, 4019, 4020, 4021, 4022, 4023 and 4024; and that part of Williamson County tract 020406 included in block group 3 and blocks 2006, 2007 and 2008; and that part of Williamson County tract 020410 included in block groups 2 and 3 and blocks 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006 and 1007; and that part of Williamson County tract 020411 included in block groups 2 and 3 and blocks 1000, 1001, 1003, 1004, 1022, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033 and 1035; and that part of Williamson County tract 020503 included in blocks 4029, 4030, 4033, 4034, 4035, 4036, 4037, 4042, 4043, 4044 and 4045; and that part of Williamson County tract 020701 included in blocks 1045, 1046, 1057, 1066, 1067, 1076 and 1077; and that part of Williamson County tract 020709 included in block groups 2 and 3 and blocks 1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1006, 1007, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013 and 1014; and that part of Williamson County tract 020712 included in block group 2. SECTION 12.  District 12 is composed of Parker County tracts 140101, 140102, 140201, 140202, 140300, 140403, 140408, 140409, 140410, 140411, 140412, 140413, 140414, 140415, 140416, 140502, 140503, 140504 and 140708; and that part of Parker County tract 140601 included in block groups 2, 3 and 4 and blocks 1000, 1001, 1035 and 1048; and that part of Parker County tract 140603 included in blocks 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017 and 3018; and that part of Parker County tract 140604 included in blocks 1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004 and 1005; and that part of Parker County tract 140707 included in blocks 2030, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2039, 2040, 2041, 2042, 2043, 2044, 2045, 2046, 2047, 2048, 2049, 2050, 2051, 2052, 2053, 2054, 2055, 2056, 2057, 2058, 2059, 2060, 2061, 2062, 2063, 2064, 2065, 2066, 2067, 2068, 2069, 2070, 2071, 2072 and 2073; and that part of Parker County tract 140709 included in block group 2 and blocks 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1049, 1050, 1051, 1052, 1053, 1054, 1056, 1057, 1058, 1059, 1060, 1061, 1062 and 1063; and that part of Parker County tract 140710 included in blocks 1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2025, 2026, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2036, 2040, 2043, 2044, 2045, 2046, 2047, 2048, 2049, 2050, 2051, 2052, 2053, 2054, 2055, 2057, 2058, 2063, 2066, 2069, 2075, 2076, 2077, 2079, 2093 and 2108; and that part of Parker County tract 140711 included in block groups 1 and 2 and blocks 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3024, 3025, 3026, 3027, 3028, 3029, 3030, 3031, 3032, 3033, 3034, 3035, 3036, 3037, 3038, 3044, 3045, 3046, 3047, 3052, 3053, 3054, 3055 and 3056; and that part of Parker County tract 140712 included in blocks 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1049, 1050, 1051, 1052, 1053, 1054, 1055, 1056, 1057, 1058, 1060 and 1064; and that part of Parker County tract 140714 included in blocks 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2021, 2022, 2042 and 2043; and Tarrant County tracts 100101, 100102, 100201, 100202, 100300, 100401, 100402, 100503, 100504, 100505, 100506, 100601, 100602, 100700, 100800, 100900, 101700, 102000, 102101, 102102, 102201, 102202, 102301, 102302, 102401, 102402, 102500, 102601, 102602, 102700, 103800, 104100, 104202, 104203, 104204, 104301, 104302, 104400, 104502, 104503, 104505, 104701, 104802, 104803, 104804, 104900, 105007, 105008, 105009, 105201, 105203, 105204, 105206, 105207, 105403, 105404, 105405, 105407, 105408, 105505, 105513, 105514, 105517, 105518, 105519, 105520, 105600, 105901, 106600, 106700, 110102, 110103, 110202, 110204, 110205, 110301, 110302, 110401, 110402, 110500, 110600, 110703, 110704, 110705, 110706, 110805, 110806, 110807, 110808, 110809, 110901, 110903, 110905, 110906, 110907, 113930, 113931, 113932, 114003, 114006, 114009, 114010, 114011, 114012, 114013, 114014, 114015, 114105, 114106, 114107, 114108, 114109, 114110, 114111, 114112, 114113, 114203, 114204, 114205, 114206, 114207, 123001, 123002, 123100, 123200, 123301, 123302, 123500, 123600 and 123700; and that part of Tarrant County tract 101201 included in blocks 1058, 1059, 1060, 1061, 1062, 1063, 1064, 1065, 1066, 1067, 1068, 1069, 1070, 1078, 1079, 1080, 1081, 1082, 1083, 1084, 1085, 1087, 1088, 1089, 1090, 1091, 1092, 1094, 1095, 1096, 1097, 1098, 1099, 1100, 1101, 1102, 1103, 1104, 1105, 1107, 1108, 1109 and 1110; and that part of Tarrant County tract 101202 included in block groups 2 and 3 and blocks 1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028 and 1029; and that part of Tarrant County tract 104504 included in block group 1 and blocks 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029 and 2031; and that part of Tarrant County tract 104702 included in block groups 1 and 3 and blocks 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023 and 2025; and that part of Tarrant County tract 105800 included in block group 2; and that part of Tarrant County tract 105902 included in block group 2; and that part of Tarrant County tract 110206 included in blocks 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019 and 2020; and that part of Tarrant County tract 111010 included in block group 3 and blocks 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2037, 2038, 2040, 2046, 2047, 2048, 2049 and 2050; and that part of Tarrant County tract 111018 included in blocks 1009, 1010 and 1011; and that part of Tarrant County tract 111031 included in blocks 1002, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1022, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021 and 2022; and that part of Tarrant County tract 113206 included in blocks 4010, 4011 and 4012; and that part of Tarrant County tract 113302 included in blocks 3019, 3039 and 3040; and that part of Tarrant County tract 113811 included in blocks 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2014, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2038, 2039 and 2042; and that part of Tarrant County tract 113917 included in blocks 1007, 1010, 4012, 4013, 4018 and 4020; and that part of Tarrant County tract 113918 included in block 1026; and that part of Tarrant County tract 113940 included in blocks 1017 and 1018; and that part of Tarrant County tract 113941 included in blocks 1022, 1023 and 1024. SECTION 13.  District 13 is composed of Archer, Armstrong, Baylor, Briscoe, Carson, Childress, Clay, Collingsworth, Cottle, Dallam, Deaf Smith, Dickens, Donley, Foard, Gray, Hall, Hansford, Hardeman, Hartley, Hemphill, Hutchinson, King, Knox, Lipscomb, Montague, Moore, Motley, Ochiltree, Oldham, Potter, Randall, Roberts, Sherman, Wheeler, Wichita and Wilbarger Counties; and Denton County tracts 020206, 020208, 020402, 020403, 020405, 020504, 020505, 020506, 020507, 020508, 020601, 020603, 020604, 020605, 020700, 020900, 021000, 021100, 021202, 021203, 021204, 021301, 021305, 021306 and 021422; and that part of Denton County tract 020204 included in block group 3 and blocks 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2029, 2030 and 2038; and that part of Denton County tract 020205 included in blocks 1025, 1045 and 1049; and that part of Denton County tract 020207 included in block group 1; and that part of Denton County tract 020310 included in block 2037; and that part of Denton County tract 020316 included in blocks 1002, 1022, 1037 and 1038; and that part of Denton County tract 020404 included in block group 1 and blocks 2000, 2001, 2002, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2037, 2038, 2039, 2040, 2041, 2042, 2043, 2044, 2045, 2046, 2047, 2048, 2049, 2050, 2051, 2052, 2053, 2054, 2055, 2056, 2057, 2058, 2059, 2060, 2061, 2062, 2063, 2064, 2065, 2066, 2067, 2068, 2069, 2070, 2071, 2072, 2073, 2074, 2075, 2076, 2077, 2078, 2079, 2080 and 2081; and that part of Denton County tract 020800 included in block groups 1 and 3 and blocks 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2037, 2038, 2039, 2040, 2041, 2042 and 2044; and that part of Denton County tract 021304 included in block groups 1, 3 and 4 and blocks 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013 and 2015; and that part of Denton County tract 021307 included in block group 2 and blocks 1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1017, 1020 and 1022; and that part of Denton County tract 021412 included in blocks 1012 and 3000; and that part of Denton County tract 021414 included in block group 2 and blocks 1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1048, 1049, 1050, 1051, 1052, 1053, 1054 and 1055; and that part of Denton County tract 021415 included in block groups 1, 3, 4 and 5 and blocks 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031 and 2034; and that part of Denton County tract 021416 included in block group 1 and blocks 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016 and 2017; and that part of Denton County tract 021417 included in blocks 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1015, 1023, 1034, 1035, 1036 and 1037; and that part of Denton County tract 021418 included in blocks 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004 and 3019; and that part of Denton County tract 021423 included in block group 1 and blocks 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2014, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2025 and 2027; and Wise County tract 150300; and that part of Wise County tract 150101 included in block groups 1 and 2 and blocks 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3024, 3025, 3026, 3027, 3028, 3029, 3030, 3031, 3032, 3033, 3034, 3035, 3036, 3037, 3038, 3039, 3040, 3041, 3042, 3043, 3044, 3045, 3046, 3049, 3050, 3051, 3052, 3053 and 3066; and that part of Wise County tract 150103 included in blocks 3000, 3001, 3002, 3004, 3005 and 3011; and that part of Wise County tract 150202 included in blocks 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1017, 1064, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2021 and 2024; and that part of Wise County tract 150404 included in blocks 1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1049, 1050, 1051, 1052, 1053, 1054, 1055, 1056, 1057, 1058, 1059, 1060, 1061, 1062, 1063, 1064, 1065, 1066, 1067, 1068, 1069, 1070, 1071, 1073, 1074, 1076, 1077, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2037, 2038, 2039, 2040, 2041, 2044, 2045, 2046, 2047, 2048, 2052, 2053, 2054, 2055, 2056, 2057 and 2058. SECTION 14.  District 14 is composed of Galveston and Orange Counties; and Brazoria County tracts 660100, 660200, 660301, 660302, 660303, 660613, 660614, 660615, 660616, 660706, 660708, 660805, 660901, 660902, 661000, 661300, 661501 and 661902; and that part of Brazoria County tract 660403 included in block group 1 and blocks 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004 and 3005; and that part of Brazoria County tract 660707 included in block group 2 and blocks 1000, 1001, 1002, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016 and 3004; and that part of Brazoria County tract 660803 included in block 3010; and that part of Brazoria County tract 660804 included in blocks 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031 and 1032; and that part of Brazoria County tract 660806 included in block group 1 and blocks 2000, 2001, 2007, 2009, 2011 and 2012; and that part of Brazoria County tract 661100 included in block groups 1 and 2 and blocks 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3024, 3025, 3027, 3028, 3029, 3030, 3031 and 3032; and that part of Brazoria County tract 661200 included in block group 1 and blocks 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2027, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3007 and 3008; and that part of Brazoria County tract 661400 included in block groups 1, 2 and 3 and blocks 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005 and 4012; and that part of Brazoria County tract 661502 included in blocks 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010 and 2014; and that part of Brazoria County tract 661601 included in block 2000; and that part of Brazoria County tract 661800 included in block group 1 and blocks 2002, 2003, 2004, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2037, 2039, 2044, 2045, 2046, 2047, 2071, 2087, 2088, 2089, 2090 and 2091; and that part of Brazoria County tract 661901 included in blocks 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2037, 2038, 2039, 2040, 2041, 2108, 2109, 2110, 2111, 2112, 2113, 2114, 2115, 2116, 2118, 2119, 2120, 2121, 2122, 2123, 2130, 2131, 2132 and 2133; and Chambers County tract 990000; and that part of Chambers County tract 710401 included in blocks 3113, 3114, 3115, 3117, 3118, 3119 and 3120; and Fort Bend County tracts 674503, 674504, 674505, 674506, 674507 and 674508; and that part of Fort Bend County tract 670801 included in blocks 2040 and 2041; and that part of Fort Bend County tract 670904 included in blocks 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007 and 2008; and that part of Fort Bend County tract 671001 included in block groups 1 and 4 and blocks 2011 and 2012; and that part of Fort Bend County tract 674301 included in blocks 2012, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3004, 3005, 3007, 3012, 3014 and 3015; and that part of Fort Bend County tract 674302 included in block groups 1, 2 and 3 and blocks 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4013, 4014, 4015, 4016, 4017, 4018 and 4021; and that part of Fort Bend County tract 674403 included in blocks 2000, 2001, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018 and 2019; and that part of Fort Bend County tract 674404 included in block group 2 and blocks 1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1049, 1050, 1051 and 1052; and Jefferson County tracts 001700, 002600, 005100, 005400, 005500, 005600, 005900, 006100, 006300, 006400, 006500, 006600, 006700, 006800, 006900, 007002, 007003, 007004, 007100, 010100, 010200, 010300, 010400, 010500, 010600, 010700, 010800, 010901, 010902, 011001, 011002, 011101, 011102, 011204, 011205, 011303, 011304, 011600, 011800, 980000, 980200, 980300 and 990000; and that part of Jefferson County tract 001303 included in blocks 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2037, 2038, 2039, 2040, 2041, 2042, 2043, 2044 and 2045; and that part of Jefferson County tract 001900 included in blocks 1040, 2000, 2001, 3000, 3008, 3009 and 3010; and that part of Jefferson County tract 002200 included in blocks 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1023, 1024, 1025, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2046, 2047, 2048, 2049, 2050, 2051, 2052, 2053, 2054, 2055, 2056, 2057, 2058, 2059, 2060, 2061, 2062, 2063, 2064, 2065 and 2067; and that part of Jefferson County tract 002300 included in block group 5 and blocks 4005, 4006 and 4010; and that part of Jefferson County tract 002400 included in blocks 1000, 1001, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2021, 2022 and 2023; and that part of Jefferson County tract 002500 included in block group 2 and blocks 1000, 1001, 1002, 1020, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1048 and 1049; and that part of Jefferson County tract 011402 included in blocks 1022, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1073, 1074, 2066, 2067, 2068, 2069, 2070 and 2071; and that part of Jefferson County tract 011500 included in blocks 1115, 1116, 1117, 1118, 1119, 1120, 1121, 1123, 1124, 1125, 1128, 1129, 1161, 1162, 1163, 1164, 1165, 1175, 1176, 1177, 1178, 1179, 1180, 1181, 1182, 1183, 1184, 1185, 1186, 1187, 1188, 1189, 1190, 1191, 1192, 1193, 1194, 1195, 1196, 1197, 1198, 1199, 1203, 1204, 1205, 1208 and 1209; and that part of Jefferson County tract 011700 included in blocks 1071, 1104, 1105, 1133, 1134, 1135, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2037, 2038, 2039, 2040, 2041, 2042, 2043, 2060, 2061, 2062, 2066, 2067, 2068, 2069, 2084, 2085, 2086, 2087, 2088, 2089, 2090, 2091, 2092, 2093, 2094, 2095, 2096, 2097, 2098, 2099, 2100, 2101, 2102, 2103, 2104, 2105, 2106, 2107, 2108, 2109, 2110, 2111, 2112, 2113, 2114, 2115, 2116, 2117, 2118, 2119, 2120, 2121, 2122, 2123, 2124, 2125, 2126, 2127, 2128, 2129, 2134, 2135, 2149 and 2150. SECTION 15.  District 15 is composed of Bee, Brooks, DeWitt, Goliad, Gonzales, Jim Wells and Lavaca Counties; and Aransas County tracts 950103, 950302 and 950501; and that part of Aransas County tract 950101 included in blocks 2029, 2030, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2037, 2038, 2039, 2040, 2041, 2046, 2047, 2048, 2067, 2068, 2069, 2070, 2071, 2072, 2073, 2074, 2075, 2076, 2077, 2078, 2079, 2080, 2081, 2082, 2083, 2084, 2085, 2110, 2111, 2112, 2113, 2114, 2115, 2116, 2117, 2118, 2119, 2120, 2121, 2122, 2123, 2124, 2125, 2126, 2127, 2128, 2129, 2130, 2131, 2132, 2133, 2134, 2135, 2136, 2137, 2138, 2139, 2140, 2141, 2142, 2143, 2144 and 2145; and that part of Aransas County tract 950102 included in block groups 1 and 2; and that part of Aransas County tract 950301 included in block groups 2 and 3 and blocks 1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1049, 1050, 1051, 1052, 1062, 1063, 1064, 1065, 1066, 1067, 1068, 1069, 1070, 1071, 1074, 1075, 1076, 1077, 1078, 1084, 1085, 1086, 1087 and 1093; and that part of Aransas County tract 950400 included in block groups 1, 2 and 4 and blocks 3032, 3033, 3034, 3035, 3036, 3037, 3038, 3039, 3040, 3044 and 3045; and that part of Aransas County tract 950502 included in blocks 1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2015, 2016, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2039, 2040, 2041, 2042, 2043, 2044, 2045, 2046, 2047, 2049, 2050 and 2051; and that part of Aransas County tract 950503 included in block groups 1 and 2 and blocks 3042, 3043, 3044, 3046, 3047, 3048, 3049, 3050 and 3051; and Hidalgo County tracts 020733, 020734, 020804, 020807, 020808, 020905, 020906, 021306, 021307, 021308, 021309, 021310, 021312, 021313, 021314, 021315, 021408, 021409, 021704, 021706, 021707, 021803, 021804, 021807, 021808, 021809, 021810, 021903, 021904, 021905, 021906, 022005, 022006, 022007, 022008, 022009, 022010, 022011, 022105, 022107, 022108, 022109, 022110, 022111, 022112, 022113, 022203, 022204, 022205, 022206, 022301, 022302, 022401, 022402, 022502, 022503, 022504, 022600, 022703, 022704, 022705, 022706, 022801, 022802, 022900, 023000, 023103, 023104, 023105, 023106, 023516, 023517, 023518, 023519, 023520, 023521, 023522, 023523, 023524, 023525, 023526, 023527, 023528, 023529, 023530, 023531, 023532, 023533, 023534, 023535, 023536, 023601, 023602, 023700, 023803, 023804, 023805, 023806, 023903, 023905, 023906, 023907, 023908, 024001, 024002, 024003, 024004, 024301, 024302, 024403, 024404, 024405, 024406, 024501, 024502 and 024600; and that part of Hidalgo County tract 020510 included in block 2027; and that part of Hidalgo County tract 020727 included in block group 1 and blocks 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004 and 2005; and that part of Hidalgo County tract 020735 included in blocks 1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1011 and 1019; and that part of Hidalgo County tract 020736 included in blocks 1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1013, 1014 and 1022; and that part of Hidalgo County tract 020806 included in blocks 1000, 1001, 1005, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 2000 and 2001; and that part of Hidalgo County tract 020909 included in blocks 1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1013, 1014 and 1016; and that part of Hidalgo County tract 021203 included in block group 3 and blocks 1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025 and 2026; and that part of Hidalgo County tract 021204 included in block group 1 and blocks 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2037, 2038, 2039, 2040, 2041, 2042 and 2043; and that part of Hidalgo County tract 021311 included in block groups 1 and 3 and blocks 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2014, 2015, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2062, 2063, 2064, 2065, 2066, 2067, 2068, 2069, 2070, 2071, 2072, 2073, 2074, 2075, 2076, 2077, 2078, 2079, 2080, 2081, 2082, 2083, 2084, 2085, 2086, 2087, 2088, 2089, 2090, 2091, 2092, 2093, 2094, 2095, 2096, 2097, 2098 and 2099; and that part of Hidalgo County tract 021405 included in block groups 1, 3 and 4 and blocks 2003, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010 and 2011; and that part of Hidalgo County tract 021406 included in blocks 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016 and 1017; and that part of Hidalgo County tract 021407 included in blocks 1006, 1007, 1009, 1010, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1026, 1027, 1028 and 1029; and that part of Hidalgo County tract 021705 included in block group 1; and that part of Hidalgo County tract 024115 included in block groups 1 and 3; and that part of Hidalgo County tract 024120 included in blocks 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008 and 2013; and that part of Hidalgo County tract 024121 included in blocks 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007 and 3008; and that part of Hidalgo County tract 024129 included in blocks 1000, 1001, 1002, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2033 and 2034; and that part of Hidalgo County tract 024131 included in block 1000; and that part of Hidalgo County tract 024132 included in blocks 1000, 1001, 1030, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045 and 1046; and that part of Hidalgo County tract 024212 included in blocks 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029 and 2045; and Refugio County tract 950200; and that part of Refugio County tract 950400 included in block groups 1, 3 and 4 and blocks 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2076, 2085, 2086, 2088, 2117, 2118, 2119, 2120, 2121, 2122, 2123, 2124, 2125, 2126, 2127, 2128, 2129, 2130, 2131, 2132, 2133, 2134, 2135, 2136, 2137, 2138, 2139, 2140, 2141, 2142, 2143, 2144, 2145, 2146, 2147, 2148, 2149, 2150, 2151, 2152, 2153, 2154, 2155, 2156, 2157, 2158, 2159, 2160, 2161, 2162, 2163, 2164, 2165, 2166, 2167, 2168, 2169, 2170, 2171, 2172, 2173, 2174, 2175, 2176, 2177 and 2179; and San Patricio County tracts 010602, 010800, 010900, 011000, 011100, 011200 and 011300; and that part of San Patricio County tract 010202 included in blocks 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009 and 4010; and that part of San Patricio County tract 010301 included in blocks 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3017, 3031 and 3032; and that part of San Patricio County tract 010500 included in block group 2 and blocks 1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1053, 1054, 1055 and 1056; and that part of San Patricio County tract 010601 included in blocks 1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008 and 4010; and that part of San Patricio County tract 010603 included in blocks 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022 and 2024; and that part of San Patricio County tract 010604 included in blocks 1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1011, 1014 and 1015; and that part of San Patricio County tract 010700 included in blocks 1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1049, 1050, 1051, 1052, 1053, 1054, 1055, 1056, 1057, 1058, 1059, 1060, 1061, 1062, 1063, 1064, 1065, 1066, 1067, 1068, 1069, 1070, 1071, 1072, 1073, 1074, 1075, 1076, 1077, 1078, 1079, 1080, 1081, 1082, 1083, 1084, 1085, 1086, 1087, 1088, 1089, 1090, 1091, 1092, 1093, 1094, 1095, 1096, 1097, 1098, 1099, 1100, 1101, 1102, 1103, 1104, 1105, 1106, 1107, 1108, 1109, 1110, 1111, 1112, 1113, 1114, 1115, 1116, 1117, 1118, 1119, 1120, 1121, 1122, 1123, 1124, 1125, 1126, 1127, 1128, 1129, 1130, 1131, 1132, 1133, 1134, 1135, 1136, 1137, 1138, 1139, 1140, 1141, 1142, 1143, 1144, 1145, 1146, 1147, 1148, 1149, 1150, 1151, 1152, 1153, 1154, 1155, 1156, 1157, 1158, 1159, 1160, 1161, 1162, 1163, 1164, 1165, 1170, 1171, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2037, 2038, 2039, 2040, 2041, 2042, 2043, 2044, 2045, 2046, 2047, 2048, 2049, 2050, 2051, 2052, 2053, 2054, 2055, 2056, 2057, 2058, 2059, 2060, 2061, 2062, 2063, 2064, 2065, 2066, 2067, 2068, 2069, 2070, 2071, 2072, 2073, 2074, 2075, 2076, 2077, 2078, 2079, 2080, 2081, 2082, 2083, 2084, 2085, 2086, 2087, 2088, 2089, 2090, 2091, 2095, 2096, 2097 and 2098. SECTION 16.  District 16 is composed of El Paso County tracts 000106, 000107, 000109, 000110, 000111, 000112, 000113, 000114, 000204, 000205, 000206, 000207, 000208, 000301, 000302, 000401, 000403, 000404, 000600, 000800, 000901, 000902, 001001, 001002, 001107, 001109, 001110, 001111, 001112, 001114, 001115, 001116, 001117, 001118, 001119, 001202, 001204, 001301, 001302, 001400, 001501, 001502, 001600, 001700, 001800, 001900, 002000, 002100, 002201, 002202, 002300, 002400, 002500, 002600, 002800, 002900, 003000, 003100, 003200, 003300, 003402, 003403, 003404, 003501, 003502, 003601, 003602, 003701, 003702, 003801, 003803, 003804, 003901, 003902, 003904, 003905, 004004, 004005, 004006, 004007, 004008, 004103, 004104, 004105, 004106, 004107, 004201, 004202, 004303, 004307, 004309, 004310, 004311, 004312, 004313, 004314, 004316, 004317, 004318, 004319, 004320, 010102, 010103, 010203, 010210, 010211, 010213, 010214, 010217, 010218, 010220, 010222, 010225, 010226, 010227, 010228, 010229, 010230, 010231, 010232, 010303, 010307, 010311, 010312, 010316, 010317, 010322, 010323, 010326, 010327, 010328, 010329, 010336, 010337, 010338, 010346, 010348, 010349, 010350, 010351, 010352, 010353, 010354, 010355, 010362, 010366, 010367, 010368, 010370, 010401, 010408, 010409, 010601, 010602 and 980000; and that part of El Paso County tract 000108 included in block group 2; and that part of El Paso County tract 010101 included in block groups 1 and 2 and block 3021; and that part of El Paso County tract 010212 included in block groups 1 and 4 and blocks 2001, 2006, 2010, 2011, 2016, 2028, 2032, 2034, 2035, 2036, 3004, 3005 and 3006; and that part of El Paso County tract 010223 included in block group 1; and that part of El Paso County tract 010334 included in block group 2 and blocks 1023, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1037 and 1038; and that part of El Paso County tract 010347 included in block groups 1 and 2 and blocks 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3016, 3022 and 3023; and that part of El Paso County tract 010357 included in block group 3 and blocks 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010 and 4023; and that part of El Paso County tract 010358 included in block group 1 and blocks 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2037, 2038, 2039, 2040, 2041, 2042, 2043, 2044, 2045, 2046, 2047, 2048, 2049, 2050, 2051, 2052, 2053, 2054, 2055, 2056, 2057, 2058, 2059, 2060, 2061, 2062, 2063, 2064, 2065, 2066, 2067, 2068, 2069, 2070, 2071, 2072, 2073, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018 and 3019; and that part of El Paso County tract 010363 included in block group 1 and blocks 2000, 2001, 2003, 2006, 2007, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016 and 2017; and that part of El Paso County tract 010369 included in blocks 1004, 1005, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1049, 1050, 1051, 1052, 1053, 1054, 1055, 1056, 1057, 1058, 1059, 1060, 1061, 1062, 1063, 1064, 1065, 1066, 1067, 1068, 1069, 1070, 1071, 1072, 1073, 1074, 1075, 1076, 1077, 1078, 1079, 1080, 1081, 1082, 1083, 1084, 1085, 1086, 1087, 1088, 1089, 1090, 1091, 1092, 1093, 1094, 1095, 1096, 1097, 1098, 1099, 1100, 1101, 1102, 1103, 1104, 1105, 1106, 1107, 1108, 1109, 1110, 1111, 1112, 1113, 1114, 1115, 1116, 1117, 1118, 1119, 1120, 1121, 1122, 1123, 1124, 1125, 1126, 1127, 1128, 1129, 1130, 1131, 1132, 1133, 1134, 1135, 1136, 1137, 1138, 1139, 1140, 1141, 1142, 1143, 1144, 1145, 1146, 1147, 1148, 1149, 1150, 1151, 1152, 1153, 1154, 1155, 1156, 1157, 1158, 1159, 1160, 1161, 1162, 1163, 1164, 1165, 1166, 1167, 1168, 1169, 1170, 1171, 1172, 1173, 1174, 1175, 1176, 1177, 1178, 1179, 1180, 1181, 1182, 1183, 1184, 1185, 1186, 1187, 1188, 1189, 1190, 1191, 1192, 1195, 1196, 1197, 1198, 1199, 1200, 1201, 1202, 1203, 1204, 1205, 1206, 1207, 1208, 1209, 1210, 1211, 1212, 1213, 1214, 1215, 1216, 1217, 1218, 1219, 1220, 1221, 1222, 1223, 1224, 1225, 1226, 1227, 1228, 1229, 1230, 1231, 1232, 1233, 1234, 1235, 1236 and 1237; and that part of El Paso County tract 010372 included in blocks 1012, 2002 and 2022; and that part of El Paso County tract 010404 included in block group 3 and blocks 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2011, 2014, 2015, 2022, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4013, 4014, 4015, 4016, 4017, 4018 and 4025; and that part of El Paso County tract 010410 included in block groups 1 and 2 and blocks 3000, 3002, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009 and 3010; and that part of El Paso County tract 010411 included in block group 3 and blocks 1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1031, 1033, 2000 and 2001. SECTION 17.  District 17 is composed of Bosque, Falls, Freestone, Hill, Limestone, McLennan, Milam and Robertson Counties; and Bell County tracts 020101, 020102, 020402, 020500, 020600, 020701 and 020800; and that part of Bell County tract 020302 included in blocks 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005 and 2031; and that part of Bell County tract 020401 included in block groups 2 and 3 and blocks 1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1050, 1051, 1052, 1053, 1054, 1055, 1056, 1057, 1058, 1059, 1060, 1062, 1063, 1064, 1065, 1066, 1067, 1068 and 1069; and that part of Bell County tract 020702 included in block group 1 and blocks 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2037, 2038, 2039, 2040, 2041, 2042, 2043, 2044, 2045, 2046, 2047, 2048, 2049, 2050, 2051, 2052, 2053, 2054, 2055, 2056, 2057, 2058, 2059, 2060, 2061, 2062, 2063, 2064, 2065, 2066, 2067, 2068, 2069, 2070, 2071, 2072, 2073 and 2074; and that part of Bell County tract 020900 included in block group 1 and blocks 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2008, 2009, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3011, 3012, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3024, 3025, 3028, 3029, 3030, 3031, 3032, 3033, 3034, 3035, 3036, 3037, 3038, 3039 and 3040; and that part of Bell County tract 021000 included in block groups 1 and 2 and blocks 3027, 3028, 3029, 4007, 5000, 5016 and 5017; and that part of Bell County tract 021400 included in blocks 1000, 1070, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2034, 2035, 2036 and 2044; and that part of Bell County tract 023402 included in block group 2 and blocks 1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1049, 1050, 1051, 1052, 1053, 1054, 1055, 1056, 1057, 1058, 1059, 1060, 1061, 1062, 1063, 1064 and 1065; and that part of Johnson County tract 130502 included in block group 2 and blocks 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1051, 1052, 1054, 1055 and 1056; and that part of Johnson County tract 130602 included in blocks 1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1049, 1050, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2010, 2011, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022 and 2055; and that part of Johnson County tract 130603 included in block group 2 and blocks 1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035 and 1036; and that part of Johnson County tract 130604 included in block group 1 and blocks 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2060, 2061, 2062, 2063, 2064, 2065, 2066, 2067, 2068, 2069, 2070, 2071, 2072, 2073, 2074, 2075, 2076, 2077, 2078, 2095, 2097, 2098 and 2106; and that part of Johnson County tract 130800 included in blocks 2177 and 2178; and that part of Johnson County tract 131000 included in block group 1 and blocks 2032, 2033, 2035, 2036, 2037, 2038, 2039, 2040, 2041, 2042, 2043, 2047, 2048, 2049, 2050, 2051, 2052, 2053, 2054, 2055, 2056, 2057, 2058, 2059, 2060, 2062, 2063, 2064, 2065 and 2066; and Williamson County tracts 020311, 020319, 020321, 020323, 020325, 020326, 020327, 020331, 020332, 020333, 020334, 020335, 020336, 020337, 020338, 020339, 020341, 020345, 020346, 020347, 020348, 020349, 020350, 020351, 020352, 020353, 020354, 020355, 020356, 020403, 020404, 020408, 020409, 020505, 020507, 020508, 020509, 020514, 020515, 020516, 020517, 020704, 020707, 020810, 020811, 020819, 020820, 021502 and 021513; and that part of Williamson County tract 020124 included in block 2023; and that part of Williamson County tract 020310 included in block group 1 and blocks 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020 and 2021; and that part of Williamson County tract 020340 included in blocks 1050, 1051, 1052, 1066, 1067, 1068, 1070, 1071, 1072, 1073, 1074, 1075, 1076, 1077, 1078, 1079, 1080 and 1082; and that part of Williamson County tract 020344 included in blocks 1044 and 1045; and that part of Williamson County tract 020405 included in block groups 1, 2 and 3 and blocks 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005 and 4006; and that part of Williamson County tract 020406 included in block group 1 and blocks 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005 and 2009; and that part of Williamson County tract 020410 included in block group 4 and blocks 1000 and 1001; and that part of Williamson County tract 020411 included in blocks 1002, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1023, 1024 and 1034; and that part of Williamson County tract 020503 included in block groups 1, 2 and 3 and blocks 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4013, 4014, 4015, 4016, 4017, 4018, 4019, 4020, 4021, 4022, 4023, 4024, 4025, 4026, 4027, 4028, 4031, 4032, 4038, 4039, 4040, 4041 and 4046; and that part of Williamson County tract 020602 included in blocks 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027 and 2028; and that part of Williamson County tract 020701 included in block group 2 and blocks 1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1047, 1048, 1049, 1050, 1051, 1052, 1053, 1054, 1055, 1056, 1058, 1059, 1060, 1061, 1062, 1063, 1064, 1065, 1068, 1069, 1070, 1071, 1072, 1073, 1074 and 1075; and that part of Williamson County tract 020706 included in block group 2 and block 1013; and that part of Williamson County tract 020709 included in blocks 1004, 1005 and 1008; and that part of Williamson County tract 020711 included in blocks 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022 and 2023; and that part of Williamson County tract 020712 included in block group 1; and that part of Williamson County tract 020808 included in block group 1 and blocks 2048, 2049, 2050, 2051, 2052, 2053, 2054, 2055, 2056 and 2061; and that part of Williamson County tract 020814 included in blocks 1000, 1006, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 2000, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009 and 3010; and that part of Williamson County tract 020816 included in block group 3 and blocks 1000, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2031, 2033, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4013, 4014, 4015, 4016, 4017 and 4018; and that part of Williamson County tract 020817 included in block 2053; and that part of Williamson County tract 020900 included in block groups 2 and 4 and blocks 3005, 3006, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3024, 3025, 3026, 3027, 3028, 3029, 3030, 3031, 3032, 3033, 3034, 3035, 3036, 3037, 3038, 3039, 3040, 3041, 3042, 3043, 3044, 3045, 3046, 3047, 3048, 3049, 3050, 3051, 3052, 3053, 3054, 3055, 3056, 3057, 3058, 3059, 3060, 3061, 3062, 3063, 3064, 3065, 3066, 3067, 3068, 3069, 3070, 3071, 3072, 3073, 3074, 3075, 3076, 3077, 3078, 3079, 3080, 3081, 3082, 3083, 3084, 3085, 3086, 3087, 3088, 3089, 3090, 3091, 3092, 3093, 3094, 3095, 3096, 3097, 3098, 3099, 3100, 3101, 3102, 3103, 3104, 3105, 3106, 3107, 3108, 3109, 3110, 3111, 3112, 3113, 3114, 3115, 3116, 3117, 3118 and 3119; and that part of Williamson County tract 021000 included in block groups 2 and 3 and blocks 1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1007, 1008, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019 and 1020; and that part of Williamson County tract 021100 included in blocks 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1049, 1050, 1051, 1052, 1053, 1054, 1055, 1056, 1057, 1058, 1059, 1060, 1061, 1062, 1063, 1064, 1065, 1066, 1067, 1068, 1069, 1070, 1071, 1072, 1073, 1074, 1075, 1076, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2037 and 2038; and that part of Williamson County tract 021201 included in blocks 1016, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2018, 2019, 2020 and 2023; and that part of Williamson County tract 021202 included in block group 2 and blocks 1024, 1029, 1030 and 1031; and that part of Williamson County tract 021203 included in block group 2 and blocks 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3024, 3025, 3026, 3027 and 3029; and that part of Williamson County tract 021503 included in block group 2 and blocks 1000, 1001, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027 and 1028; and that part of Williamson County tract 021511 included in blocks 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038 and 1039; and that part of Williamson County tract 021515 included in blocks 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2019, 2020, 2022 and 2023; and that part of Williamson County tract 021516 included in blocks 1000, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020 and 1022; and that part of Williamson County tract 021517 included in block group 1 and blocks 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004 and 2007; and that part of Williamson County tract 021518 included in blocks 1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 2000, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015 and 2016. SECTION 18.  District 18 is composed of Fort Bend County tracts 670101, 670102, 670201, 670202, 670300, 670400, 670500, 670602, 670603, 670604, 670700, 670802, 670803, 670804, 670902, 670903, 671002, 671101, 671102, 671200, 671300, 671401, 671402 and 671502; and that part of Fort Bend County tract 670801 included in block group 1 and blocks 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2037, 2038 and 2039; and that part of Fort Bend County tract 670904 included in block groups 1 and 3 and blocks 2000, 2001, 2002, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029 and 2030; and that part of Fort Bend County tract 671001 included in block group 3 and blocks 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017 and 2018; and that part of Fort Bend County tract 671501 included in block groups 1, 2 and 4 and blocks 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022 and 3023; and that part of Fort Bend County tract 671700 included in blocks 1000, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1012, 1013, 1016 and 1026; and that part of Fort Bend County tract 671800 included in block group 1 and blocks 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2037, 2038, 2039, 2040, 2041, 2042, 2043, 2044, 2045, 2046, 2047, 2048, 2049, 2050, 2051, 2052, 2053, 2054, 2055, 2056, 2063, 2064, 2065, 2066, 2067, 2068, 2069, 2070, 2071, 2072, 2073, 2074, 2075, 2076, 2077, 2078, 2079, 2080, 2081, 2082, 2083, 2084, 2085, 2086, 2087, 2088, 2089, 2090, 2091, 2092, 2093, 2094, 2095, 2096, 2097, 2098 and 2099; and that part of Fort Bend County tract 671900 included in block 2026; and that part of Fort Bend County tract 672002 included in block groups 1, 2 and 4 and blocks 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 5004, 5005, 5006 and 5007; and Harris County tracts 100001, 210800, 210900, 211000, 211101, 211102, 211200, 211301, 211302, 211400, 211700, 230100, 230200, 230300, 230400, 230600, 230700, 230800, 230900, 231000, 231100, 231200, 231300, 231400, 231500, 231600, 231900, 232000, 232202, 232203, 232303, 232304, 232305, 232306, 233600, 310101, 310102, 310200, 310300, 310400, 310500, 310600, 312000, 312200, 312300, 312400, 312501, 312502, 312601, 312602, 312603, 312700, 312800, 312901, 312902, 313000, 313101, 313102, 313201, 313202, 313300, 313500, 313600, 313700, 313801, 313802, 313901, 313902, 314001, 314003, 314004, 314005, 314301, 314302, 314401, 314402, 330101, 330102, 330200, 330301, 330302, 330303, 330400, 330500, 330600, 330700, 330802, 330901, 330902, 331100, 331200, 331300, 331400, 331501, 331502, 331603, 331604, 331800, 331900, 332000, 332100, 332300, 332400, 332500, 334101, 334102, 410101, 410102, 412902, 413301, 413302, 420100, 420200, 420300, 420400, 420500, 420600, 420700, 421900, 422000, 422100, 422200, 422302, 422303, 422304, 422403, 422404, 422405, 422406, 422501, 422502, 423100, 423201, 423203, 423204, 423301, 423303, 423304, 423401, 423402, 423500, 423600, 433601, 433602, 440101, 440102, 453300, 453401, 453405, 980200, 980400 and 980700; and that part of Harris County tract 210400 included in blocks 1000, 1001, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1023, 1024, 1062, 1063, 1064 and 1065; and that part of Harris County tract 210500 included in blocks 2000, 2001, 2002, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2047, 2048, 2049, 2050, 2051, 2052, 2056, 2057, 2058, 2059, 2060, 2061, 2068, 2069, 2070 and 2071; and that part of Harris County tract 211502 included in blocks 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1053 and 1054; and that part of Harris County tract 211600 included in blocks 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1020, 1021, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2038, 2039 and 2040; and that part of Harris County tract 212300 included in block group 1 and blocks 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3024, 3025, 3026, 3027, 3028, 3029, 3030, 3031, 3032, 3033, 3034, 3035, 3036, 3037, 3038, 3039, 3040, 3041, 3042, 3043, 3044, 3045, 3046, 3047, 3048, 3049, 3050, 3051, 3052, 3053, 3054, 3055, 3056, 3057, 3058, 3059, 3060, 3061, 3062, 3063, 3064, 3065, 3066, 3067, 3069, 3070, 3071, 3072, 3073, 3074, 3075, 3076, 3077, 3078, 3079, 3080, 3081, 3082, 3083, 3084, 3085, 3086, 3087, 3088, 3089, 3090, 3091, 3092, 3093, 3094, 3095, 3096, 3097, 3098, 3099, 3100, 3101, 3102, 3103, 4000, 4001, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4014, 4015, 4016, 4017, 4018, 4019, 4020, 4022, 4023, 4024, 4025, 4026, 4027, 4028, 4029, 4030, 4031 and 4032; and that part of Harris County tract 212400 included in blocks 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2037, 2038, 2039, 2040, 2041, 2042, 2043, 2044, 2045, 2046, 2047, 2048, 2051, 2052, 2053, 2054, 2055, 2062, 2063, 2066, 2067, 2068, 2069, 2070, 2071 and 2072; and that part of Harris County tract 212500 included in block group 2 and blocks 1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1034, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3040, 3041, 3042, 3043, 3044, 3047 and 3048; and that part of Harris County tract 220100 included in blocks 1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1049, 1050, 1051, 1052, 1053, 1054, 1055, 1056, 1057, 1058, 1061, 1062, 1063, 1064, 1065, 1066, 1067, 1068, 1069, 1070 and 1071; and that part of Harris County tract 231800 included in block group 2 and blocks 1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020 and 1022; and that part of Harris County tract 232201 included in block group 1 and blocks 2000, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2038, 2039, 2040, 2041, 2042, 2043, 2044, 2052, 2053 and 2054; and that part of Harris County tract 233400 included in blocks 2012, 2013, 2015 and 2016; and that part of Harris County tract 233701 included in blocks 1025 and 1026; and that part of Harris County tract 250101 included in blocks 3024 and 3030; and that part of Harris County tract 250201 included in blocks 1007, 1008, 2017 and 2018; and that part of Harris County tract 250202 included in blocks 1019 and 1023; and that part of Harris County tract 250303 included in blocks 1013 and 1014; and that part of Harris County tract 250304 included in blocks 2018, 2020, 2021 and 2022; and that part of Harris County tract 250408 included in blocks 1025, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045 and 1046; and that part of Harris County tract 252001 included in blocks 1013 and 1014; and that part of Harris County tract 252002 included in blocks 2004, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2041, 2042, 2043, 2044 and 2064; and that part of Harris County tract 310900 included in block 4017; and that part of Harris County tract 311900 included in blocks 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2017, 2018, 2019 and 2020; and that part of Harris County tract 313400 included in block groups 1 and 3 and blocks 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007 and 2008; and that part of Harris County tract 330801 included in blocks 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 2004, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028 and 2029; and that part of Harris County tract 331602 included in block groups 2 and 3 and blocks 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012 and 1014; and that part of Harris County tract 331700 included in block groups 2 and 3 and blocks 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035 and 1036; and that part of Harris County tract 332200 included in block group 3 and blocks 1001, 1002, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032 and 2033; and that part of Harris County tract 332600 included in block groups 2, 3 and 4; and that part of Harris County tract 333600 included in blocks 1009 and 1010; and that part of Harris County tract 410502 included in block group 2 and blocks 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008 and 3009; and that part of Harris County tract 410601 included in blocks 1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1049, 1050, 1051, 1053, 1054, 1055, 1056, 1059 and 1061; and that part of Harris County tract 410602 included in block group 1 and blocks 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2023 and 2024; and that part of Harris County tract 412202 included in blocks 1000, 1001, 1015, 1021 and 1022; and that part of Harris County tract 453404 included in block group 1. SECTION 19.  District 19 is composed of Andrews, Bailey, Borden, Castro, Cochran, Crosby, Dawson, Fisher, Floyd, Gaines, Garza, Hale, Haskell, Hockley, Howard, Jones, Kent, Lamb, Lubbock, Lynn, Martin, Mitchell, Nolan, Parmer, Scurry, Shackelford, Stonewall, Swisher, Taylor, Terry, Throckmorton and Yoakum Counties; and that part of Callahan County tract 030101 included in blocks 1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 2000, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019 and 2020; and that part of Callahan County tract 030102 included in blocks 1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1054, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014 and 2015; and that part of Callahan County tract 030200 included in block 2043. SECTION 20.  District 20 is composed of Bexar County tracts 110100, 110300, 110500, 110600, 110700, 111100, 120502, 120503, 120504, 121402, 121403, 121404, 130200, 130300, 130401, 130402, 130500, 130600, 130900, 131000, 131503, 131504, 131505, 131506, 131507, 131609, 131614, 131615, 131616, 140100, 140200, 140400, 140500, 150100, 150400, 160100, 160200, 160300, 160501, 160502, 160600, 170101, 170102, 170200, 170300, 170401, 170402, 170500, 170600, 170700, 170800, 170900, 171000, 171100, 171200, 171301, 171302, 171401, 171402, 171501, 171502, 171801, 171802, 171903, 171912, 171913, 171914, 171915, 171916, 171917, 171918, 171920, 171922, 171923, 171924, 171927, 171928, 171929, 180101, 180102, 180201, 180202, 180300, 180400, 180501, 180503, 180504, 180602, 180603, 180604, 180701, 180702, 180800, 180901, 180902, 181004, 181005, 181402, 181403, 181404, 181503, 181504, 181505, 181506, 181601, 181602, 181704, 181705, 181711, 181712, 181713, 181725, 181727, 181730, 181817, 190100, 190200, 190501, 190503, 190504, 190601, 190603, 190604, 191003, 191004, 191005, 191006, 191900 and 192100; and that part of Bexar County tract 111000 included in block groups 1 and 2 and blocks 3000, 3001, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3024, 3025, 3026, 3027, 3028, 3029, 3030, 3031, 3032 and 3033; and that part of Bexar County tract 120100 included in block 1000; and that part of Bexar County tract 120601 included in block groups 1 and 2; and that part of Bexar County tract 120902 included in blocks 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010 and 4012; and that part of Bexar County tract 121300 included in blocks 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008 and 2009; and that part of Bexar County tract 121506 included in block groups 2 and 3; and that part of Bexar County tract 121508 included in block groups 2 and 3 and blocks 1001, 1002 and 1003; and that part of Bexar County tract 130700 included in block group 1 and blocks 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032 and 2033; and that part of Bexar County tract 130800 included in block groups 2, 3 and 4 and blocks 1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034 and 1035; and that part of Bexar County tract 131100 included in block groups 1 and 2 and blocks 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013 and 3017; and that part of Bexar County tract 131200 included in block group 1; and that part of Bexar County tract 131300 included in block groups 1 and 4 and blocks 2000, 2001, 2002 and 2003; and that part of Bexar County tract 131402 included in blocks 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010 and 2011; and that part of Bexar County tract 131606 included in blocks 1020, 1029 and 1033; and that part of Bexar County tract 131610 included in block group 1 and blocks 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014 and 2015; and that part of Bexar County tract 131612 included in blocks 1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016 and 1017; and that part of Bexar County tract 140300 included in block groups 1 and 3 and blocks 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024 and 2025; and that part of Bexar County tract 140600 included in block 1004; and that part of Bexar County tract 140700 included in block groups 4 and 5 and blocks 1000, 1001, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3022, 3023, 3024, 3025, 3026 and 3027; and that part of Bexar County tract 150300 included in block groups 3 and 4 and blocks 1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012 and 2014; and that part of Bexar County tract 150501 included in blocks 1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005 and 1006; and that part of Bexar County tract 150800 included in block 3000; and that part of Bexar County tract 160400 included in block groups 1, 2 and 3 and blocks 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4013, 4014, 4015, 4016, 4017, 4018, 4019, 4020 and 4022; and that part of Bexar County tract 160701 included in block groups 1 and 2 and blocks 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3011 and 3012; and that part of Bexar County tract 160702 included in block groups 1, 2 and 4 and blocks 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015 and 3017; and that part of Bexar County tract 160902 included in blocks 2000 and 2001; and that part of Bexar County tract 171601 included in block groups 1 and 3 and blocks 2002, 2003, 2004 and 2005; and that part of Bexar County tract 171602 included in block group 1; and that part of Bexar County tract 171700 included in block groups 1, 2, 3, 4 and 5 and blocks 6005, 6006, 6007, 6008, 6013, 6014, 6015, 6016 and 6017; and that part of Bexar County tract 171919 included in blocks 1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1039, 1040, 1041 and 1042; and that part of Bexar County tract 171921 included in block groups 2 and 3 and blocks 1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012 and 1015; and that part of Bexar County tract 171926 included in blocks 1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022 and 1023; and that part of Bexar County tract 172002 included in blocks 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2042, 2043, 2044, 2045, 2046, 2047, 2048, 2049, 2050, 2051, 2052, 2053, 2055, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3032, 3033, 3034, 3035, 3036, 3037, 3038, 3067, 3068 and 3069; and that part of Bexar County tract 172003 included in blocks 1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1006, 1009, 1010, 1013, 1014, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2023, 2024, 2027, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032 and 2033; and that part of Bexar County tract 172005 included in blocks 1000, 1001 and 1002; and that part of Bexar County tract 172008 included in blocks 1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1049, 1050, 1053, 1054, 1055, 1058 and 1059; and that part of Bexar County tract 172009 included in blocks 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006 and 3007; and that part of Bexar County tract 181003 included in block group 2 and blocks 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 3001 and 3002; and that part of Bexar County tract 181303 included in blocks 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006 and 2012; and that part of Bexar County tract 181715 included in block groups 2 and 3 and blocks 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008 and 4009; and that part of Bexar County tract 181716 included in block group 4 and blocks 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011 and 1012; and that part of Bexar County tract 181731 included in blocks 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008 and 3009; and that part of Bexar County tract 181732 included in blocks 1008, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029 and 1030; and that part of Bexar County tract 181733 included in block 2021; and that part of Bexar County tract 181808 included in blocks 1000 and 1001; and that part of Bexar County tract 181811 included in blocks 1005, 1006 and 1007; and that part of Bexar County tract 181818 included in block group 3; and that part of Bexar County tract 181822 included in block group 3 and blocks 1005 and 1006; and that part of Bexar County tract 190400 included in block groups 2 and 3 and blocks 1000, 1001, 1002, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015 and 1016; and that part of Bexar County tract 190700 included in block group 3 and blocks 1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011 and 2012; and that part of Bexar County tract 190800 included in block 2012; and that part of Bexar County tract 190901 included in blocks 3007, 3008, 3011 and 3012; and that part of Bexar County tract 192000 included in block groups 4 and 5 and blocks 1003, 1004, 1007, 1008, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1049, 1051, 1052, 1053, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2009, 2010, 2016, 2018, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010 and 3011; and that part of Bexar County tract 980100 included in blocks 1003, 1014, 1031, 1032 and 1051. SECTION 21.  District 21 is composed of Bandera, Blanco, Comal, Gillespie, Kendall, Kerr and Real Counties; and Bexar County tracts 120301, 120302, 120401, 120402, 120602, 120701, 120702, 120800, 121116, 121117, 121123, 121124, 121903, 121904, 121905, 121906, 121908, 121910, 121911, 121912, 181001, 181100, 181200, 181301, 181302, 181703, 181718, 181720, 181721, 181722, 181723, 181809, 181813, 181814, 181815, 181816, 181819, 181820, 181821, 181823, 181824, 181825, 181826, 190902, 191101, 191102, 191201, 191202, 191303, 191304, 191408, 191409, 191410, 191411, 191503, 191505 and 192300; and that part of Bexar County tract 111000 included in blocks 3002, 3003, 3004 and 3005; and that part of Bexar County tract 120100 included in blocks 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1049, 1050, 1051, 1052, 1053, 1054, 1055, 1056, 1057, 1058, 1059, 1060, 1061, 1062, 1063, 1064, 1065, 1066, 1067, 1068, 1069, 1070, 1071, 1072, 1073, 1074, 1075, 1076, 1077, 1078, 1079, 1080, 1081, 1082, 1083, 1084, 1085, 1086, 1087, 1088, 1089, 1090, 1091, 1092, 1093, 1094, 1095, 1096, 1097, 1098, 1099, 1100, 1101, 1102, 1103, 1104, 1105, 1106, 1107, 1108, 1109, 1110, 1111, 1112, 1113, 1114, 1115, 1116, 1117, 1118, 1119, 1120, 1121, 1122, 1123, 1124, 1125, 1126, 1127, 1128, 1129, 1130, 1131, 1132, 1133, 1134, 1135, 1136, 1137, 1138, 1139, 1140, 1141, 1142, 1143, 1144, 1145, 1146, 1147, 1148, 1149, 1150, 1151, 1152, 1153, 1154, 1155, 1156, 1157, 1158, 1159, 1160, 1161, 1162, 1163, 1164, 1165, 1166, 1167, 1168, 1169, 1170, 1171, 1172, 1173, 1174, 1175, 1176, 1177, 1178, 1179, 1180, 1181, 1182, 1183, 1184, 1185, 1186, 1187, 1188, 1189, 1190, 1191, 1192, 1193, 1194, 1195, 1196, 1197, 1198, 1199, 1200, 1201, 1202, 1203, 1204, 1205, 1206, 1207 and 1208; and that part of Bexar County tract 120601 included in block group 3; and that part of Bexar County tract 120901 included in blocks 1011, 1012 and 1013; and that part of Bexar County tract 121000 included in block groups 1, 2, 4, 5 and 6; and that part of Bexar County tract 121112 included in block 1017; and that part of Bexar County tract 121115 included in block group 3; and that part of Bexar County tract 121118 included in blocks 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026 and 3013; and that part of Bexar County tract 130700 included in block 2014; and that part of Bexar County tract 130800 included in blocks 1009 and 1018; and that part of Bexar County tract 181003 included in blocks 1000, 1001, 1002 and 3000; and that part of Bexar County tract 181303 included in blocks 1000, 1001, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011 and 2013; and that part of Bexar County tract 181715 included in block group 1 and blocks 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003 and 4004; and that part of Bexar County tract 181716 included in block groups 2 and 3 and blocks 1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004 and 1005; and that part of Bexar County tract 181731 included in block groups 1 and 4 and blocks 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 3000, 3001, 3002 and 3003; and that part of Bexar County tract 181808 included in blocks 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010 and 1011; and that part of Bexar County tract 181811 included in block groups 2 and 3 and blocks 1000, 1001, 1002, 1003 and 1004; and that part of Bexar County tract 181818 included in block groups 1 and 2; and that part of Bexar County tract 181822 included in block group 2 and blocks 1000, 1001, 1002, 1003 and 1004; and that part of Bexar County tract 181901 included in block group 1 and blocks 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017 and 2018; and that part of Bexar County tract 190400 included in block 1003; and that part of Bexar County tract 190700 included in blocks 1004 and 2013; and that part of Bexar County tract 190800 included in block group 1 and blocks 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2037, 2038, 2039, 2040, 2041, 2042 and 2043; and that part of Bexar County tract 190901 included in block groups 1, 2, 4 and 5 and blocks 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3009 and 3010; and that part of Bexar County tract 191405 included in block group 1; and that part of Bexar County tract 191506 included in blocks 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011 and 2012; and that part of Bexar County tract 191702 included in block 1017; and that part of Bexar County tract 191807 included in blocks 2022, 2023, 2025, 2026, 2028, 2029 and 2030; and that part of Bexar County tract 192000 included in blocks 1000, 1001, 1002, 1005, 1006, 1009, 1010, 1019, 1050, 2000, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2017, 3012 and 3013; and that part of Bexar County tract 980004 included in blocks 1001, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045 and 1046; and Hays County tracts 010100, 010200, 010307, 010308, 010401, 010402, 010500, 010601, 010602, 010603, 010704, 010807, 010809, 010810, 010811, 010813, 010814, 010817 and 010818; and that part of Hays County tract 010302 included in block groups 2 and 3 and blocks 1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024 and 1025; and that part of Hays County tract 010305 included in block groups 2, 3 and 4 and blocks 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007 and 1008; and that part of Hays County tract 010306 included in blocks 1027, 1028, 1029 and 1030; and that part of Hays County tract 010309 included in block group 1 and blocks 2004, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031 and 2035; and that part of Hays County tract 010702 included in blocks 1008, 2006, 2007, 2008 and 2009; and that part of Hays County tract 010703 included in block groups 2, 3 and 4 and blocks 1000, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005 and 1006; and that part of Hays County tract 010806 included in block groups 2 and 3 and blocks 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023 and 1025; and that part of Hays County tract 010812 included in block groups 2, 3 and 4 and blocks 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1025 and 1026; and that part of Hays County tract 010815 included in blocks 1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1013, 1014 and 1015; and that part of Hays County tract 010816 included in blocks 1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 2007, 2008, 2009, 4003 and 4009; and that part of Hays County tract 010905 included in blocks 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014 and 1015. SECTION 22.  District 22 is composed of Brazoria County tracts 661602, 661700, 662000, 662100, 662200, 662300, 662400, 662500, 662600, 662700, 662800, 662900, 663000, 663100, 663200, 663300, 663400, 663500, 663600, 663700, 663800, 663900, 664000, 664100, 664200, 664300, 664400, 664501 and 990000; and that part of Brazoria County tract 661100 included in block 3026; and that part of Brazoria County tract 661200 included in blocks 2025, 2026, 3006, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018 and 3019; and that part of Brazoria County tract 661400 included in block groups 5 and 6 and blocks 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4013 and 4014; and that part of Brazoria County tract 661502 included in block group 1 and blocks 2011, 2012, 2013, 2015, 2016, 2017 and 2018; and that part of Brazoria County tract 661601 included in block groups 1, 3 and 4 and blocks 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2037, 2038, 2039, 2040, 2041, 2042 and 2043; and that part of Brazoria County tract 661800 included in blocks 2000, 2001, 2005, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2038, 2040, 2041, 2042, 2043, 2048, 2049, 2050, 2051, 2052, 2053, 2054, 2055, 2056, 2057, 2058, 2059, 2060, 2061, 2062, 2063, 2064, 2065, 2066, 2067, 2068, 2069, 2070, 2072, 2073, 2074, 2075, 2076, 2077, 2078, 2079, 2080, 2081, 2082, 2083, 2084, 2085, 2086, 2092, 2093, 2094, 2095, 2096, 2097, 2098, 2099, 2100 and 2101; and that part of Brazoria County tract 661901 included in block groups 1 and 3 and blocks 2034, 2035, 2036, 2042, 2043, 2044, 2045, 2046, 2047, 2048, 2049, 2050, 2051, 2052, 2053, 2054, 2055, 2056, 2057, 2058, 2059, 2060, 2061, 2062, 2063, 2064, 2065, 2066, 2067, 2068, 2069, 2070, 2071, 2072, 2073, 2074, 2075, 2076, 2077, 2078, 2079, 2080, 2081, 2082, 2083, 2084, 2085, 2086, 2087, 2088, 2089, 2090, 2091, 2092, 2093, 2094, 2095, 2096, 2097, 2098, 2099, 2100, 2101, 2102, 2103, 2104, 2105, 2106, 2107, 2117, 2124, 2125, 2126, 2127, 2128, 2129, 2134, 2135, 2136, 2137, 2138, 2139, 2140, 2141, 2142, 2143, 2144, 2145 and 2146; and Fort Bend County tracts 671601, 671602, 672003, 672202, 672304, 672306, 673004, 673005, 673006, 673008, 673009, 673010, 673103, 673104, 673105, 673106, 673107, 673108, 673109, 673110, 673111, 673112, 673113, 673201, 673202, 673300, 673401, 673402, 673403, 673404, 673501, 673502, 673600, 674001, 674002, 674100, 674200, 674402, 674601, 674602, 674603, 674800, 674900, 675000, 675101, 675102, 675200, 675300, 675401, 675402, 675501, 675503, 675600, 675701, 675702 and 675800; and that part of Fort Bend County tract 671501 included in block 3015; and that part of Fort Bend County tract 671700 included in block group 2 and blocks 1001, 1002, 1011, 1014, 1015, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036 and 1037; and that part of Fort Bend County tract 671800 included in blocks 2031, 2057, 2058, 2059, 2060, 2061 and 2062; and that part of Fort Bend County tract 671900 included in block group 3 and blocks 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2027, 2028 and 2029; and that part of Fort Bend County tract 672002 included in blocks 3000, 5000, 5001, 5002, 5003 and 5008; and that part of Fort Bend County tract 672004 included in block groups 1 and 3; and that part of Fort Bend County tract 672100 included in block groups 2 and 3 and blocks 1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043 and 1044; and that part of Fort Bend County tract 672201 included in block group 1 and blocks 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020 and 2021; and that part of Fort Bend County tract 672305 included in block groups 2 and 3; and that part of Fort Bend County tract 672402 included in block groups 2 and 3 and blocks 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024 and 1025; and that part of Fort Bend County tract 672801 included in blocks 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012 and 1013; and that part of Fort Bend County tract 672802 included in block 2006; and that part of Fort Bend County tract 672901 included in blocks 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2019, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2052, 2053, 2054, 2055, 2056, 2057, 2058, 2059, 2060, 2061, 2062, 2065, 2066, 2068, 2069, 2070, 2079, 2082 and 2083; and that part of Fort Bend County tract 672903 included in blocks 1009, 1010, 1013, 1014, 1015, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 3023, 3043, 3044, 3045 and 3046; and that part of Fort Bend County tract 673007 included in blocks 1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043 and 1044; and that part of Fort Bend County tract 673700 included in blocks 1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010 and 1011; and that part of Fort Bend County tract 673801 included in blocks 2003, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3024, 3025, 3026, 3027, 3028, 3029, 3030, 3031, 3032, 3033, 3034, 3035, 3036, 3037, 3038, 3039 and 3041; and that part of Fort Bend County tract 673902 included in block group 1; and that part of Fort Bend County tract 674301 included in block group 1 and blocks 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2013, 3003, 3006, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011 and 3013; and that part of Fort Bend County tract 674302 included in blocks 4004, 4019 and 4020; and that part of Fort Bend County tract 674401 included in block groups 4 and 5 and blocks 1000, 1001, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1026, 1027, 1029, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2008, 2009, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3009, 3010 and 3011; and that part of Fort Bend County tract 674403 included in block group 1 and blocks 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2020, 2021, 2022 and 2023; and that part of Fort Bend County tract 674404 included in blocks 1006, 1007, 1023 and 1024; and that part of Fort Bend County tract 674702 included in block groups 2 and 3 and blocks 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4013, 4014, 4015, 4016, 4017, 4018, 4019, 4020, 4021, 4022, 4023, 4024, 4025, 4026, 4027, 4028, 4029, 4030, 4031, 4032, 4033, 4034, 4035, 4036, 4037, 4038, 4039, 4040, 4041, 4042, 4043, 4044, 4045, 4051, 4052, 4053, 4054, 4055, 4056, 4057, 4058, 4061, 4062, 4063, 4064, 4065, 4066, 4067, 4068, 4069, 4070, 4071, 4072 and 4073; and that part of Fort Bend County tract 675502 included in block groups 2, 3 and 4 and blocks 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1049, 1050, 1051, 1052, 1053, 1054 and 1055; and Harris County tracts 454502, 454503, 454504, 454600, 454700, 454801, 454802, 454901, 454902, 455000, 455102, 455103, 455104, 455200, 455300, 542302, 542303, 542401, 542402, 542500, 542600, 542700, 542800, 542901 and 542902; and that part of Harris County tract 454400 included in blocks 1002, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046 and 1047; and that part of Harris County tract 454505 included in blocks 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034 and 1035; and that part of Harris County tract 542003 included in block group 1 and blocks 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017 and 2018; and that part of Harris County tract 542004 included in block group 2; and that part of Harris County tract 542202 included in blocks 2004, 2014, 2037, 2038, 2039 and 2040; and that part of Harris County tract 542305 included in block group 2 and blocks 1001, 1010, 1011 and 1012. SECTION 23.  District 23 is composed of Brewster, Crane, Crockett, Culberson, Edwards, Frio, Hudspeth, Jeff Davis, Kinney, Loving, Medina, Pecos, Presidio, Reagan, Reeves, Schleicher, Sutton, Terrell, Upton, Uvalde, Val Verde, Ward, Winkler and Zavala Counties; and Bexar County tracts 161400, 161600, 161801, 172004, 172006, 181724, 181726, 181729, 181902, 182001, 182002, 182003, 182101, 182102, 182103, 182105, 182106, 191406, 191412, 191413, 191504, 191701, 191804, 191806, 191808, 191809, 191810, 191811, 191812, 191813, 191814, 191815, 191816, 191818, 191819, 980001 and 980005; and that part of Bexar County tract 160400 included in block 4021; and that part of Bexar County tract 160701 included in blocks 3009, 3010 and 3013; and that part of Bexar County tract 160702 included in block 3016; and that part of Bexar County tract 160902 included in blocks 1008 and 1009; and that part of Bexar County tract 161304 included in block 1000; and that part of Bexar County tract 161802 included in block group 2 and blocks 1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1054 and 1055; and that part of Bexar County tract 161901 included in block 1001; and that part of Bexar County tract 161902 included in blocks 1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1027, 1030, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3024, 3025, 3026, 3027, 3028, 3029, 3030, 3031, 3032, 3033, 3034, 3035, 3036, 3037, 3038, 3039, 3040, 3041, 3042, 3043, 3044, 3045, 3046, 3047, 3048, 3049, 3050, 3051, 3052, 3053, 3054, 3055, 3056, 3057, 3060, 3061, 3062, 3066, 3067 and 3068; and that part of Bexar County tract 171601 included in blocks 2000 and 2001; and that part of Bexar County tract 171602 included in block group 2; and that part of Bexar County tract 171700 included in blocks 6000, 6001, 6002, 6003, 6004, 6009, 6010, 6011 and 6012; and that part of Bexar County tract 171919 included in blocks 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026 and 1038; and that part of Bexar County tract 171921 included in blocks 1013, 1014 and 1016; and that part of Bexar County tract 171926 included in blocks 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007 and 1024; and that part of Bexar County tract 172002 included in block groups 1 and 4 and blocks 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2037, 2038, 2039, 2040, 2041, 2054, 2056, 2057, 2058, 2059, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3024, 3025, 3026, 3027, 3028, 3029, 3030, 3031, 3039, 3040, 3041, 3042, 3043, 3044, 3045, 3046, 3047, 3048, 3049, 3050, 3051, 3052, 3053, 3054, 3055, 3056, 3057, 3058, 3059, 3060, 3061, 3062, 3063, 3064, 3065, 3066, 3070, 3071, 3072, 3073, 3074, 3075, 3076, 3077, 3078, 3079, 3080, 3081, 3082, 3083 and 3084; and that part of Bexar County tract 172003 included in blocks 1004, 1005, 1007, 1008, 1011, 1012, 2022, 2025, 2026 and 2028; and that part of Bexar County tract 172005 included in block group 2 and blocks 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043 and 1044; and that part of Bexar County tract 172008 included in blocks 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1051, 1052, 1056, 1057 and 1060; and that part of Bexar County tract 172009 included in block groups 1 and 4 and blocks 2018, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016 and 3017; and that part of Bexar County tract 181732 included in block group 2 and blocks 1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1009, 1020, 1021, 1022 and 1023; and that part of Bexar County tract 181733 included in block group 1 and blocks 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019 and 2020; and that part of Bexar County tract 181901 included in blocks 2000 and 2001; and that part of Bexar County tract 191405 included in block groups 2, 3, 4 and 5; and that part of Bexar County tract 191506 included in block groups 1 and 3 and blocks 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004 and 2005; and that part of Bexar County tract 191702 included in block groups 2, 3 and 4 and blocks 1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015 and 1016; and that part of Bexar County tract 191807 included in block groups 1 and 3 and blocks 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2024, 2027, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2037, 2038, 2039, 2040, 2041, 2042, 2043 and 2044; and that part of Bexar County tract 980003 included in blocks 1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024 and 1025; and that part of Bexar County tract 980100 included in blocks 1000, 1001, 1002, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1049, 1050, 1052, 1053, 1054, 1055, 1056, 1057, 1058, 1059, 1060, 1061, 1062, 1063, 1064, 1065, 1066, 1067, 1068, 1069, 1070, 1071, 1072, 1073, 1074, 1075, 1076, 1077, 1078, 1079, 1080, 1081, 1082, 1083, 1084, 1085, 1086, 1087, 1088, 1089, 1090, 1091, 1092, 1093, 1094, 1095, 1096, 1097, 1098, 1099, 1100, 1101, 1102, 1103, 1104, 1105, 1106, 1107, 1108, 1109, 1110, 1111, 1112, 1113, 1114, 1115, 1116, 1117, 1118, 1119, 1120, 1121, 1122, 1123 and 1124; and El Paso County tracts 010224, 010333, 010335, 010344, 010356, 010359, 010360, 010361, 010364, 010365, 010371, 010406, 010412, 010413, 010501, 010502, 010504, 010505 and 010506; and that part of El Paso County tract 000108 included in block group 1; and that part of El Paso County tract 010101 included in blocks 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3022, 3023, 3024, 3025, 3026, 3027, 3028, 3029, 3030, 3031, 3032, 3033, 3034, 3035, 3036, 3037 and 3038; and that part of El Paso County tract 010212 included in blocks 2000, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2033, 3000, 3001, 3002 and 3003; and that part of El Paso County tract 010223 included in block group 2; and that part of El Paso County tract 010334 included in blocks 1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1024, 1025, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043 and 1044; and that part of El Paso County tract 010347 included in blocks 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3024 and 3025; and that part of El Paso County tract 010357 included in block groups 1 and 2 and blocks 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4011, 4012, 4013, 4014, 4015, 4016, 4017, 4018, 4019, 4020, 4021 and 4022; and that part of El Paso County tract 010358 included in blocks 2000, 2001, 2007, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3024 and 3025; and that part of El Paso County tract 010363 included in blocks 2002, 2004, 2005 and 2008; and that part of El Paso County tract 010369 included in blocks 1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1034, 1035, 1193 and 1194; and that part of El Paso County tract 010372 included in blocks 1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1013, 1014, 2000, 2001, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020 and 2021; and that part of El Paso County tract 010404 included in block group 1 and blocks 2010, 2012, 2013, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 4019, 4020, 4021, 4022, 4023, 4024, 4026, 4027 and 4028; and that part of El Paso County tract 010410 included in blocks 3001, 3003, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017 and 3018; and that part of El Paso County tract 010411 included in blocks 1020, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1032, 2002, 2003 and 2004; and Maverick County tracts 950204, 950208, 950301, 950302, 950400, 950500, 950601, 950602, 950701 and 950702; and that part of Maverick County tract 950206 included in blocks 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3019, 3020, 3023 and 3030; and that part of Maverick County tract 950207 included in blocks 1001, 1002 and 1003; and that part of Maverick County tract 950209 included in block group 3 and blocks 2015 and 2016. SECTION 24.  District 24 is composed of Dallas County tracts 000300, 000705, 000706, 007101, 007301, 007601, 007604, 007605, 007701, 007702, 007906, 007913, 007914, 009402, 009500, 009603, 009604, 009609, 013102, 013104, 013201, 013300, 013400, 013500, 013728, 013804, 013806, 013807, 013808, 013901, 013902, 014001, 014002, 014119, 014120, 014121, 014123, 014126, 014134, 014135, 014151, 014152, 014157, 019301, 019302, 019400, 019501, 019502, 019600, 019700, 019800, 020000 and 020600; and that part of Dallas County tract 000202 included in block 3020; and that part of Dallas County tract 000606 included in blocks 1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1020, 1021 and 1022; and that part of Dallas County tract 000607 included in blocks 2000, 2001 and 2005; and that part of Dallas County tract 000609 included in blocks 1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1009, 1012 and 1013; and that part of Dallas County tract 000703 included in blocks 1000, 1001 and 2003; and that part of Dallas County tract 000802 included in blocks 2000, 2001, 2002 and 2003; and that part of Dallas County tract 000901 included in block group 1 and blocks 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022 and 2023; and that part of Dallas County tract 000902 included in blocks 2000, 2001, 2002, 3000, 3001, 3002 and 3003; and that part of Dallas County tract 001001 included in block group 2 and blocks 1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007 and 1008; and that part of Dallas County tract 001002 included in block group 1 and blocks 2002, 2003, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014 and 2022; and that part of Dallas County tract 001101 included in blocks 2003, 2004 and 2011; and that part of Dallas County tract 007302 included in block groups 1, 2 and 3 and blocks 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007 and 4009; and that part of Dallas County tract 007801 included in block group 2 and blocks 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024 and 1025; and that part of Dallas County tract 007903 included in block group 2; and that part of Dallas County tract 009401 included in block 1008; and that part of Dallas County tract 009607 included in block group 1; and that part of Dallas County tract 009608 included in block group 2 and blocks 1000, 1001, 1002, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1016 and 1017; and that part of Dallas County tract 009702 included in block group 2 and blocks 1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1007, 1008, 1011, 1017, 1018 and 1019; and that part of Dallas County tract 009900 included in blocks 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1049, 1050, 1051, 1052, 1053, 1054, 1058, 1059, 1060, 1071, 1072, 1073, 1125, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010 and 2011; and that part of Dallas County tract 013101 included in blocks 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2031, 2032, 2034, 2045, 2046 and 2047; and that part of Dallas County tract 013106 included in blocks 1011, 1012, 1013 and 1014; and that part of Dallas County tract 013107 included in blocks 1001 and 1002; and that part of Dallas County tract 013202 included in block group 4; and that part of Dallas County tract 013628 included in blocks 5001, 5003, 5004, 5005, 5006, 5007, 5008, 5009, 5010, 5011, 5012, 5013, 5014, 5015, 5016, 5017, 5019, 5020, 5021, 5022, 5024, 5025, 5026, 5027, 5034 and 5035; and that part of Dallas County tract 013726 included in blocks 1005, 1006, 1017, 2002, 2003 and 2005; and that part of Dallas County tract 013729 included in blocks 2010, 2011, 2013, 4011, 4012 and 4013; and that part of Dallas County tract 013805 included in blocks 1004 and 2001; and that part of Dallas County tract 014124 included in block groups 2 and 3 and blocks 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1049, 1050, 1051, 1052, 1053, 1054, 1055, 1056, 1057, 1058, 1059, 1060, 1064, 1068 and 1069; and that part of Dallas County tract 014130 included in blocks 1032, 1039, 1042, 1043 and 1048; and that part of Dallas County tract 014150 included in blocks 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019 and 1020; and that part of Dallas County tract 014159 included in block group 1 and blocks 2000, 2001, 2007, 2009 and 2040; and that part of Dallas County tract 014160 included in blocks 1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007 and 1013; and that part of Dallas County tract 980000 included in blocks 1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1042, 1043, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1051, 1052, 1065, 1066, 1067, 1068, 1069, 1070, 1071, 1072, 1073, 1074, 1076 and 1080; and Tarrant County tracts 110104, 113207, 113210, 113212, 113213, 113214, 113215, 113216, 113217, 113218, 113221, 113222, 113223, 113301, 113403, 113404, 113407, 113409, 113410, 113509, 113511, 113512, 113514, 113516, 113517, 113519, 113520, 113521, 113522, 113607, 113611, 113612, 113613, 113618, 113619, 113622, 113623, 113624, 113625, 113626, 113628, 113629, 113630, 113632, 113633, 113634, 113635, 113636, 113637, 113638, 113639, 113640, 113707, 113709, 113710, 113711, 113712, 113713, 113714, 113715, 113716, 113803, 113808, 113809, 113810, 113812, 113813, 113814, 113815, 113816, 113906, 113908, 113912, 113916, 113919, 113920, 113923, 113924, 113925, 113933, 113934, 113935, 113936, 113937, 113938, 113939, 113942, 113943, 113944, 113945, 113946, 113947, 113948, 113949, 113950, 113951, 113952, 113953, 113954, 113955, 113956, 113957 and 113958; and that part of Tarrant County tract 101201 included in blocks 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1015 and 1018; and that part of Tarrant County tract 106523 included in block 4002; and that part of Tarrant County tract 106524 included in blocks 1010 and 2025; and that part of Tarrant County tract 110206 included in blocks 1000, 2000 and 2001; and that part of Tarrant County tract 113206 included in block groups 1, 2 and 3 and blocks 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4013, 4014, 4015 and 4016; and that part of Tarrant County tract 113302 included in block groups 1 and 2 and blocks 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3024, 3025, 3026, 3027, 3028, 3029, 3030, 3031, 3032, 3033, 3034, 3035, 3036, 3037, 3038, 3041, 3042, 3043 and 3044; and that part of Tarrant County tract 113408 included in block groups 1, 2, 4 and 5 and blocks 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3024, 3025 and 3026; and that part of Tarrant County tract 113510 included in block groups 2 and 3 and blocks 1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041 and 1046; and that part of Tarrant County tract 113513 included in block group 2 and blocks 1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3024, 3030 and 3031; and that part of Tarrant County tract 113811 included in block group 1 and blocks 2000, 2001, 2002, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2037, 2040 and 2041; and that part of Tarrant County tract 113917 included in block groups 2 and 3 and blocks 1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1008, 1009, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4014, 4015, 4016, 4017, 4019 and 4021; and that part of Tarrant County tract 113918 included in block groups 2 and 3 and blocks 1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024 and 1025; and that part of Tarrant County tract 113940 included in block group 2 and blocks 1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1049, 1050, 1051 and 1052; and that part of Tarrant County tract 113941 included in block groups 2, 3 and 4 and blocks 1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032 and 1033; and that part of Tarrant County tract 980000 included in blocks 1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1049, 1050, 1051, 1052, 1053, 1054, 1055, 1056, 1057, 1058, 1059, 1060, 1061, 1062, 1063, 1064, 1065, 1066, 1067, 1068, 1069, 1070, 1071, 1072, 1073, 1074, 1075, 1076, 1077, 1078, 1079, 1080, 1081, 1082, 1083, 1084, 1085, 1086, 1087, 1088, 1089, 1090, 1091, 1092, 1093, 1094, 1095, 1096, 1097, 1098, 1099, 1100, 1101, 1102, 1103, 1104, 1105, 1106, 1107, 1108, 1109, 1110, 1111, 1112, 1113, 1114, 1115, 1116, 1117, 1118, 1119, 1120, 1121, 1122, 1123, 1124, 1125, 1126, 1127, 1128, 1129, 1130, 1131, 1132, 1133, 1134, 1135, 1136, 1137, 1138, 1139, 1140, 1141, 1142, 1143, 1144, 1145, 1146, 1147, 1148, 1149, 1150, 1151, 1152, 1153, 1154, 1155, 1156, 1157, 1158, 1159, 1160, 1161, 1162, 1163, 1164, 1165, 1166, 1167, 1168, 1169, 1170, 1171, 1172, 1173, 1174, 1177, 1180, 1181, 1182, 1183, 1199, 1200, 1201, 1202, 1203, 1205, 1206, 1207, 1209, 1210, 1211, 1212, 1213, 1214 and 1215. SECTION 25.  District 25 is composed of Comanche, Eastland, Erath, Hood, Jack, Palo Pinto, Somervell, Stephens and Young Counties; and that part of Callahan County tract 030101 included in block groups 3 and 4 and blocks 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2037, 2038, 2039, 2040, 2041, 2042, 2043, 2044, 2045 and 2046; and that part of Callahan County tract 030102 included in block groups 3 and 4 and blocks 1021, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1049, 1050, 1051, 1052, 1053, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2037, 2038, 2039, 2040, 2041 and 2042; and that part of Callahan County tract 030200 included in block groups 1, 3 and 4 and blocks 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2037, 2038, 2039, 2040, 2041, 2042, 2044, 2045, 2046, 2047, 2048, 2049, 2050, 2051, 2052, 2053, 2054, 2055, 2056, 2057, 2058, 2059, 2060, 2061, 2062, 2063, 2064, 2065, 2066, 2067, 2068, 2069, 2070, 2071, 2072, 2073, 2074, 2075, 2076, 2077, 2078, 2079, 2080, 2081, 2082, 2083, 2084, 2085, 2086, 2087, 2088, 2089, 2090, 2091, 2092, 2093, 2094, 2095, 2096, 2097, 2098, 2099, 2100, 2101, 2102, 2103, 2104, 2105, 2106, 2107, 2108, 2109, 2110, 2111, 2112, 2113, 2114, 2115, 2116, 2117, 2118, 2119, 2120, 2121, 2122, 2123, 2124, 2125, 2126, 2127, 2128, 2129, 2130, 2131, 2132, 2133, 2134, 2135, 2136, 2137, 2138, 2139, 2140, 2141, 2142, 2143, 2144, 2145, 2146, 2147, 2148, 2149, 2150, 2151, 2152, 2153, 2154, 2155, 2156, 2157, 2158, 2159, 2160, 2161, 2162, 2163, 2164, 2165, 2166, 2167, 2168, 2169, 2170, 2171, 2172, 2173, 2174, 2175, 2176, 2177, 2178, 2179, 2180, 2181, 2182, 2183, 2184, 2185, 2186, 2187, 2188, 2189, 2190, 2191, 2192, 2193, 2194, 2195, 2196, 2197, 2198, 2199, 2200, 2201, 2202, 2203, 2204, 2205, 2206, 2207, 2208, 2209, 2210, 2211, 2212, 2213, 2214, 2215, 2216, 2217, 2218, 2219, 2220, 2221, 2222, 2223, 2224, 2225, 2226, 2227, 2228, 2229, 2230, 2231, 2232, 2233, 2234, 2235, 2236, 2237, 2238, 2239, 2240, 2241, 2242, 2243, 2244, 2245, 2246, 2247, 2248, 2249, 2250, 2251, 2252, 2253, 2254, 2255, 2256, 2257, 2258, 2259, 2260, 2261, 2262, 2263, 2264, 2265, 2266, 2267, 2268, 2269, 2270, 2271, 2272, 2273, 2274, 2275, 2276, 2277, 2278, 2279, 2280, 2281, 2282, 2283, 2284, 2285, 2286, 2287, 2288, 2289, 2290, 2291, 2292, 2293, 2294, 2295, 2296, 2297, 2298, 2299, 2300, 2301, 2302, 2303, 2304 and 2305; and Johnson County tracts 130100, 130205, 130212, 130213, 130214, 130215, 130216, 130217, 130218, 130302, 130700 and 131100; and that part of Johnson County tract 130210 included in blocks 1049, 1050 and 1057; and that part of Johnson County tract 130304 included in blocks 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021 and 1028; and that part of Johnson County tract 130602 included in blocks 1019, 1020, 1024, 2008, 2009, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2037, 2038, 2039, 2040, 2041, 2042, 2043, 2044, 2045, 2046, 2047, 2048, 2049, 2050, 2051, 2052, 2053, 2054, 2056 and 2057; and that part of Johnson County tract 130604 included in blocks 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2037, 2038, 2039, 2040, 2041, 2042, 2043, 2044, 2045, 2046, 2047, 2048, 2049, 2050, 2051, 2052, 2053, 2054, 2055, 2056, 2057, 2058, 2059, 2079, 2080, 2081, 2082, 2083, 2084, 2085, 2086, 2087, 2088, 2089, 2090, 2091, 2092, 2093, 2094, 2096, 2099, 2100, 2101, 2102, 2103, 2104, 2105, 2107 and 2108; and that part of Johnson County tract 130800 included in block groups 1 and 3 and blocks 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2037, 2038, 2039, 2040, 2041, 2042, 2043, 2044, 2045, 2046, 2047, 2048, 2049, 2050, 2051, 2052, 2053, 2054, 2055, 2056, 2057, 2058, 2059, 2060, 2061, 2062, 2063, 2064, 2065, 2066, 2067, 2068, 2069, 2070, 2071, 2072, 2073, 2074, 2075, 2076, 2077, 2078, 2079, 2080, 2081, 2082, 2083, 2084, 2085, 2086, 2087, 2088, 2089, 2090, 2091, 2092, 2093, 2094, 2095, 2096, 2097, 2098, 2099, 2100, 2101, 2102, 2103, 2104, 2105, 2106, 2107, 2108, 2109, 2110, 2111, 2112, 2113, 2114, 2115, 2116, 2117, 2118, 2119, 2120, 2121, 2122, 2123, 2124, 2125, 2126, 2127, 2128, 2129, 2130, 2133, 2134, 2135, 2136, 2137, 2138, 2139, 2140, 2141, 2142, 2143, 2144, 2145, 2146, 2147, 2148, 2149, 2150, 2151, 2152, 2153, 2154, 2155, 2156, 2157, 2158, 2164, 2165, 2166, 2167, 2168, 2169, 2170, 2171, 2172, 2173, 2174, 2175, 2176, 2179 and 2180; and that part of Johnson County tract 130900 included in block 2003; and that part of Johnson County tract 131000 included in blocks 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2034, 2044, 2045, 2046, 2061 and 2067; and Parker County tract 140713; and that part of Parker County tract 140601 included in blocks 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1049, 1050, 1051, 1052, 1053, 1054, 1055, 1056, 1057, 1058, 1059, 1060, 1061, 1062, 1063 and 1064; and that part of Parker County tract 140603 included in block groups 2 and 4 and blocks 1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1049, 1050, 1051, 1052, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3024, 3025, 3026, 3027, 3028 and 3029; and that part of Parker County tract 140604 included in block group 2 and blocks 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046 and 1047; and that part of Parker County tract 140707 included in block group 1 and blocks 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2031, 2035, 2036, 2037 and 2038; and that part of Parker County tract 140709 included in blocks 1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008 and 1055; and that part of Parker County tract 140710 included in blocks 1012, 1013, 1014, 1023, 1024, 2024, 2027, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2037, 2038, 2039, 2041, 2042, 2056, 2059, 2060, 2061, 2062, 2064, 2065, 2067, 2068, 2070, 2071, 2072, 2073, 2074, 2078, 2080, 2081, 2082, 2083, 2084, 2085, 2086, 2087, 2088, 2089, 2090, 2091, 2092, 2094, 2095, 2096, 2097, 2098, 2099, 2100, 2101, 2102, 2103, 2104, 2105, 2106, 2107 and 2109; and that part of Parker County tract 140711 included in blocks 3039, 3040, 3041, 3042, 3043, 3048, 3049, 3050 and 3051; and that part of Parker County tract 140712 included in blocks 1000, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1059, 1061, 1062 and 1063; and that part of Parker County tract 140714 included in block groups 1 and 3 and blocks 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2037, 2038, 2039, 2040, 2041, 2044, 2045 and 2046; and Tarrant County tracts 101301, 101302, 101401, 101402, 101403, 101500, 103500, 103601, 103602, 103701, 103702, 104601, 104602, 104603, 104604, 104605, 105502, 105503, 105511, 105512, 105515, 105516, 105701, 105703, 105705, 105706, 106002, 106005, 106006, 106101, 106102, 106201, 106202, 106300, 106400, 106502, 106503, 106507, 106509, 106512, 106513, 106514, 106515, 106518, 106519, 106520, 106521, 106522, 106525, 106526, 111003, 111015, 111019, 111020, 111021, 111022, 111023, 111024, 111025, 111026, 111027, 111028, 111029, 111030, 111032, 111033, 111103, 111104, 111202, 113102, 113104, 113107, 113108, 113110, 113112, 113117, 113118, 113119, 113120, 113121, 113122, 121612, 121613, 121614, 121615, 121703 and 121704; and that part of Tarrant County tract 101201 included in blocks 1000, 1001, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1016, 1017, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1049, 1050, 1051, 1052, 1053, 1054, 1055, 1056, 1057, 1071, 1072, 1073, 1074, 1075, 1076, 1077, 1086, 1093 and 1106; and that part of Tarrant County tract 101202 included in block 1030; and that part of Tarrant County tract 104504 included in blocks 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010 and 2030; and that part of Tarrant County tract 104702 included in block 2024; and that part of Tarrant County tract 105800 included in block group 1; and that part of Tarrant County tract 105902 included in block groups 1, 3 and 4; and that part of Tarrant County tract 106004 included in block groups 2, 3 and 4 and blocks 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032 and 1033; and that part of Tarrant County tract 106523 included in block groups 1, 2 and 3 and blocks 4000, 4001, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006 and 4007; and that part of Tarrant County tract 106524 included in blocks 1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2037, 2038, 2039, 2040, 2041, 2042, 2043, 2044, 2045, 2046, 2047, 2048, 2049, 2050, 2051, 2052, 2053, 2054, 2055, 2056, 2057 and 2058; and that part of Tarrant County tract 111010 included in blocks 1000, 1001, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2039, 2041, 2042, 2043, 2044 and 2045; and that part of Tarrant County tract 111018 included in block group 2 and blocks 1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034 and 1035; and that part of Tarrant County tract 111031 included in blocks 1000, 1001, 1003, 1009, 1010, 1021, 2000, 2004 and 2005; and that part of Tarrant County tract 111102 included in block group 2 and blocks 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1049 and 1050; and that part of Tarrant County tract 111203 included in block group 2 and blocks 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3024, 3025, 3026, 3027, 3028, 3029, 3030, 3031, 3032, 3033, 3034, 3035 and 3036; and that part of Tarrant County tract 111204 included in blocks 1008, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 3024 and 3025; and that part of Tarrant County tract 111505 included in blocks 1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1025 and 1026; and that part of Tarrant County tract 113003 included in blocks 1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1049, 1050, 1054, 1061, 1062, 1063, 1064, 1065, 1066, 1067, 1068, 1089, 1091 and 1092; and that part of Tarrant County tract 113109 included in block groups 1 and 3 and blocks 2002, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014 and 2016; and that part of Tarrant County tract 113115 included in block groups 1 and 2 and blocks 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009 and 3010; and that part of Tarrant County tract 113116 included in block groups 2 and 3 and blocks 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009 and 1010; and that part of Tarrant County tract 113408 included in block 3027; and that part of Tarrant County tract 113510 included in blocks 1042, 1043, 1044 and 1045; and that part of Tarrant County tract 113513 included in blocks 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3025, 3026, 3027, 3028, 3029, 3032 and 3033; and that part of Tarrant County tract 121605 included in block groups 1 and 2 and blocks 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3024 and 3025; and that part of Tarrant County tract 121606 included in blocks 2000, 2001, 2002, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2016, 2020, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2040, 2041, 2042, 2048, 2049 and 2066; and that part of Tarrant County tract 121609 included in blocks 1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1033, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014 and 2015; and that part of Tarrant County tract 121611 included in block group 3 and blocks 4014 and 4015; and that part of Tarrant County tract 121702 included in block groups 1 and 5 and blocks 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2021, 3000, 3001, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3015, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4014, 4015, 4016, 4017, 4018, 4019 and 4020; and that part of Tarrant County tract 122200 included in blocks 1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031 and 2032; and that part of Tarrant County tract 980000 included in blocks 1175, 1176, 1178, 1179, 1184, 1185, 1186, 1187, 1188, 1189, 1190, 1191, 1192, 1193, 1194, 1195, 1196, 1197, 1198, 1204 and 1208. SECTION 26.  District 26 is composed of Cooke County; and Denton County tracts 020115, 020116, 020117, 020118, 020119, 020120, 020121, 020122, 020123, 020124, 020125, 020126, 020127, 020129, 020130, 020131, 020132, 020135, 020136, 020137, 020203, 020305, 020311, 020312, 020313, 020314, 020315, 020317, 020318, 020319, 020320, 020321, 020322, 021410, 021411, 021413, 021419, 021420, 021421, 021502, 021505, 021512, 021513, 021514, 021516, 021517, 021518, 021520, 021530, 021531, 021532, 021611, 021612, 021613, 021614, 021615, 021616, 021618, 021619, 021620, 021621, 021622, 021630, 021631, 021632, 021633, 021634, 021635, 021637, 021638, 021639, 021640, 021641, 021642, 021643, 021644, 021645, 021646, 021647, 021648, 021649, 021650, 021651, 021652, 021653, 021654, 021655, 021715, 021716, 021717, 021719, 021720, 021721, 021722, 021723, 021724, 021725, 021726, 021727, 021728, 021729, 021730, 021731, 021732, 021733, 021734, 021735, 021736, 021737, 021738, 021739, 021740, 021741, 021742, 021743, 021744, 021745, 021746, 021748, 021749, 021750, 021751, 021752, 021754, 021755, 021756, 021757, 021758 and 021759; and that part of Denton County tract 020112 included in block group 1 and blocks 2000, 2001, 2002, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017 and 2018; and that part of Denton County tract 020128 included in blocks 1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 4016, 4024, 5002, 5003, 5004, 5005, 5006, 5007, 5008, 5009, 5010, 5011, 5012, 5013, 5014, 5015, 5016, 5017, 5018, 5019, 5020, 5021, 5022, 5023, 5024 and 5025; and that part of Denton County tract 020133 included in block groups 1 and 2 and blocks 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020 and 3021; and that part of Denton County tract 020134 included in blocks 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 2003, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2037, 2038 and 2039; and that part of Denton County tract 020204 included in block group 1 and blocks 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2036 and 2037; and that part of Denton County tract 020205 included in block group 2 and blocks 1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1046, 1047 and 1048; and that part of Denton County tract 020207 included in block group 2; and that part of Denton County tract 020310 included in block groups 1 and 3 and blocks 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2038, 2039, 2040, 2041, 2042, 2043, 2044, 2045, 2046, 2047, 2048, 2049, 2050, 2051, 2052, 2053, 2054, 2055, 2056 and 2057; and that part of Denton County tract 020316 included in block group 2 and blocks 1000, 1001, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035 and 1036; and that part of Denton County tract 020404 included in blocks 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009 and 2010; and that part of Denton County tract 020800 included in block 2043; and that part of Denton County tract 021304 included in block 2014; and that part of Denton County tract 021307 included in blocks 1016, 1018, 1019 and 1021; and that part of Denton County tract 021412 included in block group 2 and blocks 1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3024, 3025, 3026, 3027, 3028, 3029, 3030, 3031, 3032, 3033, 3034, 3035, 3036, 3037, 3038, 3039, 3040, 3041, 3042, 3043, 3044, 3045, 3046 and 3047; and that part of Denton County tract 021414 included in blocks 1046 and 1047; and that part of Denton County tract 021415 included in blocks 2032 and 2033; and that part of Denton County tract 021416 included in blocks 2018 and 2019; and that part of Denton County tract 021417 included in blocks 1000, 1001, 1002, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032 and 1033; and that part of Denton County tract 021418 included in block groups 1 and 2 and blocks 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3024, 3025, 3026 and 3027; and that part of Denton County tract 021423 included in blocks 2012, 2013, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2024 and 2026; and that part of Denton County tract 021521 included in block group 1 and blocks 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2028 and 2029; and that part of Denton County tract 021522 included in blocks 1051, 1052, 1053, 1057, 1058, 1059 and 1060; and that part of Denton County tract 021529 included in blocks 1009, 1010, 1023, 1024, 1025 and 1026; and that part of Denton County tract 021533 included in block group 2 and blocks 1031, 1032, 1033, 3030, 3031, 3033, 3034, 3035, 3036, 3037, 3038, 3039, 3040 and 3041; and that part of Denton County tract 021534 included in block group 1 and blocks 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2040, 2041, 2042, 2043, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3024, 3025, 3026, 3027, 3028, 3029, 3030, 3031, 3032, 3033, 3034, 3035, 3036, 3037, 3038, 3039, 3040, 3041, 3042, 3043, 3044, 3045, 3046, 3047, 3048, 3049, 3050, 3051, 3052, 3053, 3054, 3055, 3056, 3057, 3058, 3059, 3060, 3061, 3062, 3063, 3064, 3065, 3066, 3067, 3068, 3069, 3070, 3071, 3072, 3073, 3074, 3075, 3076 and 3077; and that part of Denton County tract 021535 included in blocks 2023, 2049 and 2050; and that part of Denton County tract 021536 included in block groups 2 and 3 and blocks 1000, 1001, 1023 and 1024; and that part of Denton County tract 021537 included in block group 2 and blocks 1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036 and 1037; and that part of Denton County tract 021626 included in blocks 1002, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1049, 1050, 1051, 1052, 1053, 1054, 1055 and 1056; and Wise County tracts 150104, 150201, 150402, 150403, 150405, 150500, 150603, 150604, 150605, 150606 and 150607; and that part of Wise County tract 150101 included in blocks 3047, 3048, 3054, 3055, 3056, 3057, 3058, 3059, 3060, 3061, 3062, 3063, 3064 and 3065; and that part of Wise County tract 150103 included in block groups 1 and 2 and blocks 3003, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3024, 3025, 3026, 3027, 3028, 3029, 3030, 3031, 3032, 3033, 3034, 3035, 3036, 3037, 3038, 3039, 3040, 3041, 3042, 3043, 3044, 3045, 3046, 3047, 3048, 3049, 3050, 3051, 3052, 3053, 3054 and 3055; and that part of Wise County tract 150202 included in blocks 1000, 1001, 1007, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1049, 1050, 1051, 1052, 1053, 1054, 1055, 1056, 1057, 1058, 1059, 1060, 1061, 1062, 1063, 1065, 2007, 2008, 2014, 2020, 2022, 2023, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2037, 2038, 2039, 2040, 2041, 2042, 2043, 2044, 2045, 2046, 2047, 2048, 2049, 2050, 2051, 2052, 2053, 2054, 2055, 2056, 2057, 2058, 2059, 2060, 2061, 2062, 2063, 2064, 2065, 2066, 2067, 2068, 2069, 2070, 2071, 2072, 2073, 2074, 2075, 2076, 2077, 2078, 2079, 2080, 2081, 2082, 2083, 2084, 2085, 2086, 2087 and 2088; and that part of Wise County tract 150404 included in blocks 1072, 1075, 1078, 1079, 1080, 1081, 1082, 1083, 1084, 1085, 1086, 1087, 1088, 1089, 1090, 1091, 1092, 2042, 2043, 2049, 2050, 2051, 2059 and 2060. SECTION 27.  District 27 is composed of Austin, Caldwell, Calhoun, Colorado, Fayette, Jackson, Matagorda, Victoria, Washington and Wharton Counties; and Aransas County tracts 950200 and 990000; and that part of Aransas County tract 950101 included in block group 1 and blocks 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2031, 2042, 2043, 2044, 2045, 2049, 2050, 2051, 2052, 2053, 2054, 2055, 2056, 2057, 2058, 2059, 2060, 2061, 2062, 2063, 2064, 2065, 2066, 2086, 2087, 2088, 2089, 2090, 2091, 2092, 2093, 2094, 2095, 2096, 2097, 2098, 2099, 2100, 2101, 2102, 2103, 2104, 2105, 2106, 2107, 2108, 2109, 2146, 2147, 2148, 2149, 2150, 2151, 2152, 2153, 2154, 2155, 2156, 2157, 2158, 2159, 2160, 2161, 2162, 2163, 2164, 2165, 2166, 2167, 2168, 2169, 2170, 2171, 2172, 2173 and 2174; and that part of Aransas County tract 950102 included in block group 3; and that part of Aransas County tract 950301 included in blocks 1053, 1054, 1055, 1056, 1057, 1058, 1059, 1060, 1061, 1072, 1073, 1079, 1080, 1081, 1082, 1083, 1088, 1089, 1090, 1091, 1092, 1094, 1095, 1096 and 1097; and that part of Aransas County tract 950400 included in blocks 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3024, 3025, 3026, 3027, 3028, 3029, 3030, 3031, 3041, 3042 and 3043; and that part of Aransas County tract 950502 included in blocks 1020, 1021, 1022, 2014, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2030, 2036, 2037, 2038 and 2048; and that part of Aransas County tract 950503 included in blocks 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3024, 3025, 3026, 3027, 3028, 3029, 3030, 3031, 3032, 3033, 3034, 3035, 3036, 3037, 3038, 3039, 3040, 3041, 3045, 3052, 3053, 3054, 3055, 3056, 3057, 3058, 3059, 3060, 3061, 3062, 3063, 3064, 3065, 3066, 3067, 3068, 3069, 3070, 3071, 3072, 3073, 3074, 3075, 3076, 3077, 3078, 3079, 3080, 3081 and 3082; and Bastrop County tracts 950101, 950301, 950302, 950303, 950401, 950402, 950403, 950503, 950504, 950505, 950506, 950601, 950602, 950700, 950803, 950804, 950805 and 950806; and that part of Bastrop County tract 950102 included in block groups 2 and 4 and blocks 1018, 1019, 1020, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1048, 1050, 1053, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3024, 3025, 3026, 3027, 3028, 3029, 3030, 3031, 3032, 3033, 3034, 3035, 3036, 3037, 3038, 3039, 3040, 3041, 3042, 3043, 3044, 3045, 3046, 3047, 3048, 3049, 3050, 3051, 3052, 3053, 3054, 3055, 3056, 3057, 3058, 3059, 3060, 3061, 3062, 3063, 3064, 3065, 3066, 3067, 3068, 3069, 3070, 3071, 3072, 3073, 3074, 3075, 3076, 3077, 3078, 3079, 3080, 3081, 3082, 3083, 3084, 3085, 3086, 3087, 3088, 3089, 3090, 3091, 3092 and 3093; and that part of Bastrop County tract 950201 included in block group 1 and blocks 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2037, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017 and 3018; and that part of Bastrop County tract 950202 included in block groups 2 and 3 and blocks 1001, 1002, 1003, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022 and 1023; and Hays County tracts 010909, 010911, 010912, 010913, 010914, 010915, 010916, 010917, 010918, 010919, 010920, 010921, 010922, 010923, 010924 and 010925; and that part of Hays County tract 010302 included in blocks 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014 and 1026; and that part of Hays County tract 010305 included in blocks 1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026 and 1027; and that part of Hays County tract 010306 included in blocks 1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025 and 1026; and that part of Hays County tract 010309 included in blocks 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2014, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2032, 2033 and 2034; and that part of Hays County tract 010702 included in blocks 1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014 and 2015; and that part of Hays County tract 010703 included in block 1001; and that part of Hays County tract 010806 included in blocks 1000, 1001, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016 and 1024; and that part of Hays County tract 010812 included in blocks 1000, 1001, 1002, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023 and 1024; and that part of Hays County tract 010815 included in blocks 1010, 1011 and 1012; and that part of Hays County tract 010816 included in block groups 3 and 5 and blocks 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2010, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4010, 4011 and 4012; and that part of Hays County tract 010905 included in block groups 2 and 3 and blocks 1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1049, 1050, 1051, 1052, 1053, 1054, 1055, 1056, 1057, 1058, 1059, 1060, 1061, 1062, 1063, 1064, 1065, 1066, 1067, 1068, 1069, 1070, 1071, 1072, 1073, 1074, 1075, 1076, 1077, 1078, 1079, 1080, 1081, 1082, 1083, 1084, 1085, 1086, 1087, 1088, 1089, 1090, 1091, 1092, 1093, 1094, 1095, 1096, 1097, 1098, 1099, 1100, 1101, 1102, 1103, 1104, 1105, 1106, 1107, 1108 and 1109; and Nueces County tracts 000500, 001000, 001100, 001500, 001602, 001703, 001704, 001801, 001904, 005103, 005104, 006400 and 990000; and that part of Nueces County tract 000601 included in block groups 1, 3, 4 and 5 and blocks 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007 and 2008; and that part of Nueces County tract 000602 included in blocks 1001, 1004, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1049, 1050, 1051, 1052, 1053, 1054, 1055, 1056, 1057, 1058, 1059, 1060, 1061, 1062, 1063, 1064, 1065, 1066, 1067, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2007, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020 and 2021; and that part of Nueces County tract 000800 included in blocks 2031, 2032 and 3034; and that part of Nueces County tract 000900 included in block groups 1, 3 and 4 and blocks 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028 and 2029; and that part of Nueces County tract 001201 included in block group 2 and blocks 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1020, 1021 and 1027; and that part of Nueces County tract 001202 included in block group 1; and that part of Nueces County tract 001300 included in block group 1 and blocks 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 4006, 4007, 4008 and 4009; and that part of Nueces County tract 001601 included in block groups 2, 3 and 4 and blocks 1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023 and 1024; and that part of Nueces County tract 001702 included in block 2002; and that part of Nueces County tract 001903 included in block groups 1 and 2 and blocks 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3014 and 3015; and that part of Nueces County tract 002001 included in blocks 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4013, 4014, 4015, 4016 and 4017; and that part of Nueces County tract 002002 included in blocks 1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010 and 1020; and that part of Nueces County tract 006205 included in blocks 1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1048, 1049, 1050, 1051, 1052, 1053, 1054, 1055, 1056, 1057, 1058, 1059, 1060, 1061, 1062, 1063, 1064, 1065, 1066, 1067, 1068, 1069, 1070, 1071, 1072, 1073, 1074, 1075, 1076, 1077, 1078, 1079, 1080, 1081, 1082, 1083, 1084, 1085, 1086, 1087, 1088, 1089, 1090, 1091, 1092, 1093, 1094, 1095, 1096, 1097, 1098, 1099, 1100, 1101, 1102, 1103, 1104, 1105, 1107, 1113, 1131, 1134, 1135, 1136, 1137, 1141, 1142 and 1143; and that part of Nueces County tract 006300 included in blocks 1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1033, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1049, 1050, 1051, 1052, 1053, 1054, 1055, 1056, 1057, 1058, 1059, 1060, 1061, 1062, 1063, 1064, 1065, 1066, 1067, 1068, 1069, 1070, 1071, 1072, 1073, 1074, 1075, 1076, 1077, 1078, 1079, 1080, 1081, 1082, 1083, 1084, 1085, 1086, 1087, 1088, 1089, 1090, 1091, 1092, 1093, 1094, 1095, 1096, 1097, 1098, 1099, 1100, 1101, 1102, 1103, 1104, 1105, 1106, 1107, 1108, 1109, 1110, 1111, 1112, 1113, 1114, 1116, 1117, 1118, 1119, 1120, 1186, 1187, 1188, 1189, 1194, 1195, 1196, 1197, 1198, 1199, 1200, 1201, 1202, 1203, 1204, 1205, 1206, 1207, 1208, 1209, 1210, 1211, 1212, 1213, 1214, 1215, 1216, 1217, 1218, 1219, 1220, 1221, 1222, 1223, 1225, 1226, 1227, 1228, 1229, 1230, 1231 and 1232; and that part of Refugio County tract 950400 included in blocks 2000, 2001, 2002, 2007, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2037, 2038, 2039, 2040, 2041, 2042, 2043, 2044, 2045, 2046, 2047, 2048, 2049, 2050, 2051, 2052, 2053, 2054, 2055, 2056, 2057, 2058, 2059, 2060, 2061, 2062, 2063, 2064, 2065, 2066, 2067, 2068, 2069, 2070, 2071, 2072, 2073, 2074, 2075, 2077, 2078, 2079, 2080, 2081, 2082, 2083, 2084, 2087, 2089, 2090, 2091, 2092, 2093, 2094, 2095, 2096, 2097, 2098, 2099, 2100, 2101, 2102, 2103, 2104, 2105, 2106, 2107, 2108, 2109, 2110, 2111, 2112, 2113, 2114, 2115, 2116 and 2178; and San Patricio County tracts 010201 and 010302; and that part of San Patricio County tract 010202 included in block groups 1, 2 and 3 and blocks 4011, 4012, 4013, 4014, 4015, 4016, 4017, 4018, 4019, 4020 and 4021; and that part of San Patricio County tract 010301 included in block groups 1 and 2 and blocks 3012, 3016, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3024, 3025, 3026, 3027, 3028, 3029 and 3030; and that part of San Patricio County tract 010500 included in blocks 1021, 1039, 1040, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1049, 1050, 1051 and 1052; and that part of San Patricio County tract 010601 included in blocks 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 2014, 2015, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3024, 3025, 3026, 3027, 4009, 4011, 4012, 4013, 4014 and 4015; and that part of San Patricio County tract 010603 included in block group 1 and block 2023; and that part of San Patricio County tract 010604 included in block group 2 and blocks 1010, 1012, 1013, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025 and 1026; and that part of San Patricio County tract 010700 included in blocks 1166, 1167, 1168, 1169, 2092, 2093, 2094, 2099, 2100, 2101, 2102, 2103, 2104, 2105, 2106, 2107, 2108, 2109, 2110, 2111, 2112, 2113, 2114, 2115, 2116, 2117, 2118, 2119, 2120, 2121, 2122, 2123, 2124, 2125, 2126, 2127, 2128, 2129, 2130, 2131, 2132, 2133, 2134, 2135, 2136, 2137, 2138, 2139, 2140, 2141, 2142, 2143, 2144, 2145, 2146, 2147, 2148, 2149, 2150, 2151, 2152, 2153, 2154, 2155, 2156, 2157, 2158, 2159, 2160, 2161, 2162, 2163, 2164, 2165, 2166, 2167, 2168, 2169, 2170, 2171 and 2172; and Travis County tracts 002434, 002436, 002446, 002450, 031100 and 033300; and that part of Travis County tract 002215 included in block 1010; and that part of Travis County tract 002216 included in blocks 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2037, 2038, 2039, 2040 and 2041; and that part of Travis County tract 002217 included in block group 1; and that part of Travis County tract 002218 included in block group 3; and that part of Travis County tract 002219 included in block groups 3 and 4 and blocks 1011, 1012, 1013, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1037, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1049, 1050, 1051, 1052, 1053, 1054, 1055, 1056, 1057, 1058, 1059, 1060, 1061, 1062, 1063, 1064, 1065, 1066, 1067, 1068, 1069, 1070, 1071, 1072, 1073, 1074, 1075, 1076, 1077, 1078, 1079, 1080, 1081, 1082, 1083, 1084, 1085, 1086, 1087 and 1088; and that part of Travis County tract 002407 included in block groups 1 and 3 and blocks 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2024, 2025, 2027, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035 and 2036; and that part of Travis County tract 002432 included in block group 2; and that part of Travis County tract 002440 included in block 2036; and that part of Travis County tract 002445 included in block groups 1 and 2 and block 3039; and that part of Travis County tract 002449 included in block group 1 and blocks 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2037, 2038, 2039, 2040, 2041, 2042, 2043, 2044, 2045, 2046, 2047, 2048, 2049, 2050, 2051 and 2052; and that part of Travis County tract 002452 included in blocks 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2037, 2038, 2039, 2040, 2041, 2042, 2043, 2044, 2045, 2046, 2047, 2048 and 2049; and that part of Travis County tract 002453 included in block groups 1 and 2 and blocks 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3024, 3025, 3040, 3041, 3042, 3043, 3044, 3046, 3047, 3048, 3049 and 3050; and that part of Travis County tract 031300 included in blocks 2024, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030 and 2031; and that part of Travis County tract 033000 included in blocks 1016, 1018, 1022, 1023, 1024, 2018, 2019, 2020 and 2021; and that part of Travis County tract 033200 included in block group 1 and blocks 2020, 2022, 2024, 2025, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032 and 2033; and that part of Travis County tract 036700 included in block group 2 and blocks 1018, 1026, 3000, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 4000, 4001, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008 and 4009; and that part of Travis County tract 036800 included in blocks 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2013, 2014, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2024 and 2025; and that part of Travis County tract 037100 included in block group 2 and blocks 1006 and 1008; and that part of Travis County tract 037200 included in blocks 1003, 1004, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 3006, 3007, 3008 and 3009; and that part of Travis County tract 045800 included in blocks 1034, 1048, 1049, 1050, 1051, 1052, 1053, 1054, 1055, 1056, 1057, 1058, 1059, 1060, 1061, 1062, 1063, 1064, 1065, 1066, 1067, 1068, 1069, 1070, 1072, 1078, 1083, 1084, 1085, 1086, 1087, 1088, 1090, 1091, 1092, 1093 and 1094; and that part of Travis County tract 045900 included in blocks 1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1049, 1050, 1051, 1052, 1053, 1054, 1055, 1056, 1057, 1058, 1059, 1060, 1061, 1062, 1063, 1064, 1065, 1066, 1067, 1068, 1069, 1070, 1071, 1072, 1073, 1074, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028 and 2029. SECTION 28.  District 28 is composed of Atascosa, Dimmit, Duval, Jim Hogg, La Salle, Live Oak, McMullen, Starr, Webb and Zapata Counties; and Hidalgo County tracts 020103, 020104, 020105, 020106, 020107, 020108, 020205, 020206, 020207, 020208, 020209, 020210, 020211, 020303, 020304, 020305, 020306, 020307, 020403, 020405, 020406, 020407, 020408, 020409, 020505, 020506, 020507, 020508, 020509, 020511, 020512, 020513, 020600, 020724, 020725, 020728, 020729, 020730, 020731, 020732, 020805, 020907, 020908, 020910, 021001, 021002, 021003, 021100, 021201, 021401, 021500, 021600, 021703, 024107, 024108, 024109, 024116, 024117, 024118, 024119, 024122, 024123, 024124, 024125, 024126, 024127, 024128, 024130, 024204, 024206, 024207, 024208, 024209, 024210, 024211 and 980000; and that part of Hidalgo County tract 020510 included in block group 1 and blocks 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031 and 2032; and that part of Hidalgo County tract 020727 included in blocks 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019 and 2020; and that part of Hidalgo County tract 020735 included in blocks 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026 and 1027; and that part of Hidalgo County tract 020736 included in blocks 1010, 1011, 1012, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026 and 1027; and that part of Hidalgo County tract 020806 included in block group 3 and blocks 1002, 1003, 1004, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1018, 1019, 1020, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016 and 2017; and that part of Hidalgo County tract 020909 included in block group 2 and blocks 1010, 1011, 1012, 1015, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021 and 1022; and that part of Hidalgo County tract 021203 included in blocks 1005, 1006 and 2020; and that part of Hidalgo County tract 021204 included in blocks 2000, 2001 and 2002; and that part of Hidalgo County tract 021311 included in blocks 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2037, 2038, 2039, 2040, 2041, 2042, 2043, 2044, 2045, 2046, 2047, 2048, 2049, 2050, 2051, 2052, 2053, 2054, 2055, 2056, 2057, 2058, 2059, 2060 and 2061; and that part of Hidalgo County tract 021405 included in blocks 2000, 2001, 2002 and 2004; and that part of Hidalgo County tract 021406 included in blocks 1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024 and 1025; and that part of Hidalgo County tract 021407 included in block group 2 and blocks 1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1008, 1011, 1017, 1022, 1023, 1024 and 1025; and that part of Hidalgo County tract 021705 included in block groups 2 and 3; and that part of Hidalgo County tract 024115 included in block groups 2 and 4; and that part of Hidalgo County tract 024120 included in block group 1 and blocks 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029 and 2030; and that part of Hidalgo County tract 024121 included in block groups 1 and 2 and blocks 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3024, 3025, 3026, 3027, 3028, 3029, 3030, 3031, 3032, 3033, 3034, 3035, 3036, 3037 and 3038; and that part of Hidalgo County tract 024129 included in blocks 1003, 1004, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2032 and 2035; and that part of Hidalgo County tract 024131 included in blocks 1001, 1002, 1003 and 1004; and that part of Hidalgo County tract 024132 included in blocks 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1040, 1047 and 1048; and that part of Hidalgo County tract 024212 included in block groups 1 and 3 and blocks 2020, 2021, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2037, 2038, 2039, 2040, 2041, 2042, 2043, 2044, 2046, 2047, 2048, 2049, 2050, 2051, 2052, 2053, 2054, 2055, 2056, 2057, 2058, 2059, 2060, 2061, 2062, 2063, 2064, 2065, 2066, 2067, 2068, 2069, 2070, 2071, 2072, 2073, 2074, 2075, 2076, 2077, 2078, 2079, 2080, 2081, 2082, 2083, 2084, 2085, 2086, 2087, 2088, 2089, 2090, 2091, 2092, 2093, 2094, 2095, 2096, 2097, 2098 and 2099; and that part of Maverick County tract 950206 included in block groups 1 and 2 and blocks 3018, 3021, 3022, 3024, 3025, 3026, 3027, 3028 and 3029; and that part of Maverick County tract 950207 included in block groups 2 and 3 and blocks 1000, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030 and 1031; and that part of Maverick County tract 950209 included in block group 1 and blocks 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033 and 2034. SECTION 29.  District 29 is composed of Harris County tracts 210600, 210700, 220200, 220300, 220400, 220500, 220600, 220701, 220702, 220800, 220900, 221000, 221100, 221200, 221301, 221302, 221400, 221501, 221502, 221601, 221602, 221701, 221702, 221800, 221900, 222000, 222100, 222200, 222300, 222401, 222402, 222501, 222502, 222504, 222505, 222601, 222602, 222701, 222702, 222800, 222900, 223001, 223002, 223100, 230500, 231700, 232100, 240101, 240102, 240400, 240503, 240504, 240505, 240506, 240600, 240703, 240704, 240705, 240706, 240707, 240802, 240803, 240804, 240903, 240904, 240905, 240906, 241104, 241105, 241502, 241503, 520400, 520502, 520601, 520603, 520604, 521201, 521401, 521600, 521701, 521702, 530101, 530200, 530300, 530400, 530501, 530502, 530600, 530701, 530702, 530800, 530900, 531000, 531100, 531200, 531300, 531400, 531500, 531600, 531700, 531800, 531900, 532003, 532004, 532101, 532102, 532200, 532301, 532302, 532400, 532600, 532700, 532800, 532900, 533000, 533100, 533200, 533301, 533302, 533401, 533402, 533500, 533600, 533701, 533702, 533802, 533803, 533804, 533902, 533903, 533904, 534003, 550101, 550102, 550201, 550202, 550303, 550304, 550305, 550306, 550307, 550308, 550403, 550404, 550405, 550406, 550407, 550500, 550601, 550602, 550603, 550800, 550901, 550902, 551000, 551101, 551102, 551201, 551300, 553101, 553102, 553201, 553202, 553300 and 980100; and that part of Harris County tract 210500 included in blocks 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005 and 3014; and that part of Harris County tract 220100 included in blocks 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1059 and 1060; and that part of Harris County tract 231800 included in block 1021; and that part of Harris County tract 232201 included in blocks 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2037, 2045, 2046, 2047, 2048, 2049, 2050 and 2051; and that part of Harris County tract 241103 included in block groups 2 and 3 and blocks 1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1010 and 1011; and that part of Harris County tract 241501 included in block groups 1 and 3 and blocks 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011 and 2016; and that part of Harris County tract 250101 included in block group 2 and blocks 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3025, 3026, 3027, 3031, 3032, 3033, 3034, 3035, 3036, 3037 and 3038; and that part of Harris County tract 250102 included in block group 2; and that part of Harris County tract 250201 included in block groups 3 and 4 and blocks 1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015 and 2016; and that part of Harris County tract 250202 included in blocks 1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1020, 1021, 1022 and 1024; and that part of Harris County tract 250303 included in blocks 1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018 and 1019; and that part of Harris County tract 250304 included in block groups 1 and 3 and blocks 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2019 and 2023; and that part of Harris County tract 250305 included in block groups 2 and 3 and blocks 1025 and 1026; and that part of Harris County tract 250306 included in blocks 1008 and 1009; and that part of Harris County tract 250408 included in blocks 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040 and 1041; and that part of Harris County tract 250601 included in blocks 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013 and 1014; and that part of Harris County tract 250602 included in blocks 1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1009, 1010 and 1011; and that part of Harris County tract 251100 included in blocks 5018, 5019, 5020, 5021, 5022, 5023, 5024, 5025, 5026, 5027, 5028, 5029, 5030, 5031, 5037 and 5038; and that part of Harris County tract 520501 included in block group 2 and blocks 1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1053, 1054, 1055, 1056, 1057, 1058 and 1059; and that part of Harris County tract 521202 included in block group 2 and blocks 1000, 1001, 1002 and 1003; and that part of Harris County tract 521300 included in block groups 2, 3 and 4 and blocks 1000, 1001, 1002, 1004, 1005, 1006 and 5000; and that part of Harris County tract 521402 included in block group 2 and blocks 1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014 and 1015; and that part of Harris County tract 521502 included in block 2022; and that part of Harris County tract 521800 included in blocks 1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027 and 1032; and that part of Harris County tract 530102 included in block group 1 and blocks 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2020 and 2021; and that part of Harris County tract 532502 included in block groups 1 and 3 and blocks 2002, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011 and 2012; and that part of Harris County tract 532504 included in block 2005; and that part of Harris County tract 534001 included in blocks 1011, 1012, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 2000, 2006, 2007, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014 and 2019; and that part of Harris County tract 534002 included in block groups 2 and 3 and blocks 1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024 and 1025; and that part of Harris County tract 534203 included in blocks 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1049, 1050 and 1051; and that part of Harris County tract 550700 included in block group 2 and blocks 1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043 and 1044; and that part of Harris County tract 551202 included in block group 2 and blocks 1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022 and 1023; and that part of Harris County tract 551400 included in blocks 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 4000, 4001 and 4030; and that part of Harris County tract 551502 included in blocks 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1034, 1035, 1036 and 1037. SECTION 30.  District 30 is composed of Dallas County tracts 002500, 002703, 003700, 005400, 005500, 005600, 005700, 005901, 005902, 006001, 006002, 006100, 006200, 006301, 006302, 008604, 008701, 008703, 008704, 008705, 008801, 008802, 010804, 010806, 010807, 010903, 010904, 010905, 010906, 011002, 011003, 011004, 011101, 011103, 011104, 011105, 011201, 011202, 011300, 011401, 011601, 016410, 016412, 016414, 016415, 016416, 016417, 016511, 016513, 016516, 016517, 016518, 016519, 016522, 016524, 016525, 016526, 016527, 016528, 016529, 016530, 016531, 016532, 016535, 016536, 016607, 016610, 016615, 016616, 016617, 016618, 016619, 016620, 016621, 016622, 016623, 016624, 016626, 016627, 016628, 016629, 016630, 016631, 016632, 016633, 016634, 016635, 016636, 016637, 016638, 016704, 016706, 016707, 016708, 016709, 016710, 016711, 016802, 016803, 016805, 016806, 016902, 016903, 020200, 020300, 020800, 020900, 021000 and 021100; and that part of Dallas County tract 002002 included in blocks 2000, 2001, 2002, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021 and 2022; and that part of Dallas County tract 004800 included in blocks 1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1049, 1050, 2031, 2032, 2033 and 2034; and that part of Dallas County tract 005000 included in blocks 1021, 1022, 2020 and 2054; and that part of Dallas County tract 009303 included in block group 1 and blocks 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032 and 2033; and that part of Dallas County tract 009304 included in block groups 2, 3 and 4 and blocks 1005, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1023, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032 and 1033; and that part of Dallas County tract 010805 included in block groups 1 and 3 and blocks 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020 and 2021; and that part of Dallas County tract 011500 included in block group 1 and blocks 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2037, 2038, 2039, 2040, 2041, 2042, 2043, 2044, 2045, 2046, 2047, 2048, 2049, 2050, 2052, 2053, 2054, 2055, 2056, 2057, 2058, 2059, 2060, 2061, 2062, 2063, 2064, 2065, 2066, 2067, 2068, 2069, 2070 and 2071; and that part of Dallas County tract 011603 included in blocks 2007, 2008, 2009, 2026 and 2028; and that part of Dallas County tract 016521 included in block group 1 and blocks 2005, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2037, 2038, 2039, 2040, 2041, 2042, 2043, 2044, 2045, 2046, 2050, 2051, 2052, 2053, 2054, 2055, 2056, 2057, 2058, 2059, 2060, 2061, 2062, 2063, 2064, 2065, 2066, 2067, 2068, 2069, 2070, 2071 and 2072; and that part of Dallas County tract 016533 included in block group 2 and blocks 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3024, 3025, 3026, 3027, 3028, 3029 and 3030; and that part of Dallas County tract 016534 included in block group 2 and blocks 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016 and 1017; and that part of Dallas County tract 017102 included in blocks 3035, 3037, 3038, 3039 and 3040; and that part of Dallas County tract 020401 included in blocks 2036, 2037, 2038, 2039, 2044, 2045, 2046, 2047, 2048, 2049, 2050, 2051, 2052, 2053, 2054, 2055, 2056, 2057, 2058, 2059, 2060, 2061, 2062 and 2063; and that part of Dallas County tract 020402 included in blocks 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2037, 2038, 2039, 2040, 2041, 2042, 2043, 2044, 2045, 2046, 2047, 2048, 2049, 2050, 2051, 2052, 2053, 2054, 2055, 2056, 2057, 2058, 2059, 2060, 2061, 2062, 2063, 2064, 2065, 2066, 2067, 2068, 2069, 2070, 2072, 2073, 2074, 2075, 2076, 2077, 2078, 2079, 2080, 2081, 2082, 2083, 2084, 2085, 2086, 2087, 2088, 2089, 2090, 2091, 2092, 2093, 2094, 2095, 2096, 2097, 2098, 2099, 2100, 2101, 2102, 2103, 2104, 2105, 2106, 2107, 2108, 2109, 2110, 2111, 2112, 2113, 2114, 2115, 2116, 2117, 2118, 2119, 2120, 2121, 2122, 2123, 2124, 2125, 2126, 2127, 2128, 2129, 2130, 2131, 2132, 2133, 2134, 2135, 2136, 2137, 2138, 2139, 2140, 2141, 2142, 2143, 2144, 2145, 2146 and 2147; and Tarrant County tracts 111315, 111316, 111320, 111513, 111514, 111516, 111522, 111525, 111536, 111538, 111540, 111541, 111542, 111543, 111544, 111554, 111555, 111556, 111557, 111558, 111559, 111560, 111561, 111562, 111563, 111564, 111565, 111566, 111567, 111568, 111569, 111570, 111571, 111572, 113006, 113007, 121904, 121905, 121906, 121907, 121908, 122001, 122002, 122701, 122801, 122802, 122901 and 122902; and that part of Tarrant County tract 111314 included in block group 1 and blocks 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030 and 2031; and that part of Tarrant County tract 111319 included in block group 3 and block 1002; and that part of Tarrant County tract 113005 included in blocks 1159, 1167, 1168, 1171, 1172, 1174 and 1176; and that part of Tarrant County tract 122401 included in blocks 1013 and 1017. SECTION 31.  District 31 is composed of Coryell, Hamilton, Lampasas and Mills Counties; and Bell County tracts 020201, 020203, 020204, 020301, 021101, 021102, 021201, 021202, 021203, 021301, 021302, 021304, 021305, 021501, 021502, 021601, 021602, 021701, 021702, 021801, 021802, 021901, 021905, 021906, 021907, 021908, 022001, 022002, 022101, 022103, 022104, 022105, 022200, 022300, 022401, 022402, 022403, 022405, 022406, 022407, 022501, 022503, 022504, 022600, 022801, 022900, 023001, 023002, 023103, 023104, 023109, 023110, 023111, 023112, 023113, 023114, 023115, 023116, 023117, 023118, 023201, 023202, 023203, 023204, 023301, 023302, 023404, 023405, 023406, 023500, 980001, 980002 and 980003; and that part of Bell County tract 020302 included in block group 1 and blocks 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2037, 2038, 2039, 2040, 2041, 2042, 2043, 2044, 2045, 2046, 2047, 2048, 2049, 2050, 2051, 2052, 2053, 2054, 2055, 2056, 2057, 2058, 2059, 2060, 2061, 2062, 2063 and 2064; and that part of Bell County tract 020401 included in blocks 1031, 1035, 1049 and 1061; and that part of Bell County tract 020702 included in blocks 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2030 and 2075; and that part of Bell County tract 020900 included in blocks 2007, 3010, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3023, 3026 and 3027; and that part of Bell County tract 021000 included in blocks 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3024, 3025, 3026, 3030, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4013, 4014, 4015, 4016, 5001, 5002, 5003, 5004, 5005, 5006, 5007, 5008, 5009, 5010, 5011, 5012, 5013, 5014, 5015, 5018 and 5019; and that part of Bell County tract 021400 included in block group 3 and blocks 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1049, 1050, 1051, 1052, 1053, 1054, 1055, 1056, 1057, 1058, 1059, 1060, 1061, 1062, 1063, 1064, 1065, 1066, 1067, 1068, 1069, 1071, 1072, 1073, 1074, 1075, 1076, 2028, 2032, 2033, 2037, 2038, 2039, 2040, 2041, 2042 and 2043; and that part of Bell County tract 023402 included in block groups 3 and 4 and blocks 1034 and 1035; and Burnet County tracts 960101, 960102, 960200, 960301, 960302, 960401, 960501, 960502, 960600 and 960702; and that part of Burnet County tract 960402 included in block group 1 and blocks 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2037, 2038, 2039, 2040, 2041, 2042, 2043, 2044, 2045, 2046, 2047, 2048, 2049, 2050, 2051, 2052, 2053, 2054, 2055, 2056, 2057, 2058, 2059, 2060, 2061, 2062, 2063, 2064, 2065, 2066, 2067, 2068, 2069, 2070, 2071, 2073, 2074, 2075, 2076, 2077, 2078, 2079, 2080, 2081, 2082, 2083, 2086, 2089, 2090, 2091, 2092, 2093, 2094 and 2095; and that part of Burnet County tract 960701 included in block group 3 and blocks 1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1049, 1050, 1051, 1052, 1053, 1054, 1055, 1056, 1057, 1058, 1059, 1060, 1061, 1062, 1063, 1064, 1065, 1066, 1067, 1068, 1069, 1070, 1071, 1072, 1073, 1074, 1075, 1076, 1077, 1078, 1079, 1080, 1081, 1082, 1083, 1084, 1085, 1086, 1087, 1088, 1089, 1090, 1091, 1092, 1093, 1094, 1095, 1096, 1097, 1098, 1100, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2037, 2038, 2039, 2040, 2041, 2042, 2043, 2044, 2045, 2046, 2047, 2048, 2049, 2050, 2051, 2052, 2053, 2054, 2055, 2056, 2057, 2058, 2059, 2060, 2061, 2062, 2063, 2064 and 2065; and that part of Burnet County tract 960803 included in blocks 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2014, 2025, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2037, 2038, 2039, 2040, 2041, 2042, 2043, 2054 and 2055; and Williamson County tracts 020106, 020108, 020109, 020111, 020113, 020114, 020115, 020116, 020117, 020118, 020119, 020120, 020121, 020122, 020123, 020201, 020203, 020205, 020206, 020207, 020208, 020329, 020330, 020342, 020343, 020604, 020606, 020607, 020608, 020609, 020812, 020813, 020815, 020818, 020821, 020822, 021300, 021402, 021404, 021405, 021406, 021407, 021506, 021509, 021510, 021512, 021514, 021601, 021602 and 021603; and that part of Williamson County tract 020124 included in block groups 1 and 3 and blocks 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021 and 2022; and that part of Williamson County tract 020310 included in blocks 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2022, 2023 and 2024; and that part of Williamson County tract 020340 included in blocks 1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1049, 1053, 1054, 1055, 1056, 1057, 1058, 1059, 1060, 1061, 1062, 1063, 1064, 1065, 1069, 1081 and 1083; and that part of Williamson County tract 020344 included in blocks 1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1049, 1050, 1051, 1052, 1053, 1054, 1055 and 1056; and that part of Williamson County tract 020602 included in block groups 1 and 3 and blocks 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022 and 2023; and that part of Williamson County tract 020706 included in blocks 1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023 and 1024; and that part of Williamson County tract 020711 included in blocks 1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1017, 2000, 2001 and 2002; and that part of Williamson County tract 020808 included in blocks 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2037, 2038, 2039, 2040, 2041, 2042, 2043, 2044, 2045, 2046, 2047, 2057, 2058, 2059 and 2060; and that part of Williamson County tract 020814 included in blocks 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 3000, 3001 and 3002; and that part of Williamson County tract 020816 included in blocks 1001, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2032, 4004 and 4005; and that part of Williamson County tract 020817 included in block group 1 and blocks 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2037, 2038, 2039, 2040, 2041, 2042, 2043, 2044, 2045, 2046, 2047, 2048, 2049, 2050, 2051 and 2052; and that part of Williamson County tract 020900 included in block group 1 and blocks 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3007, 3012 and 3120; and that part of Williamson County tract 021000 included in blocks 1005, 1006, 1009, 1010, 1011 and 1012; and that part of Williamson County tract 021100 included in blocks 1000, 2004, 2005 and 2006; and that part of Williamson County tract 021201 included in blocks 1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 2017, 2021, 2022, 2024, 2025 and 2026; and that part of Williamson County tract 021202 included in blocks 1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1032 and 1033; and that part of Williamson County tract 021203 included in block group 1 and blocks 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3023 and 3028; and that part of Williamson County tract 021503 included in blocks 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1017, 1021 and 1022; and that part of Williamson County tract 021511 included in blocks 1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1040 and 1041; and that part of Williamson County tract 021515 included in block group 1 and blocks 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2021, 2024 and 2025; and that part of Williamson County tract 021516 included in block group 2 and blocks 1001 and 1021; and that part of Williamson County tract 021517 included in block group 3 and blocks 2005 and 2006; and that part of Williamson County tract 021518 included in blocks 1008, 2001 and 2002. SECTION 32.  District 32 is composed of Camp, Rains, Rockwall, Upshur and Wood Counties; and Collin County tracts 031806, 031810, 031813, 031814, 031815, 031816, 031903, 031904, 032017, 032018 and 032019; and that part of Collin County tract 031333 included in blocks 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021 and 2022; and that part of Collin County tract 031334 included in blocks 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020 and 2021; and that part of Collin County tract 031807 included in blocks 1020 and 4036; and that part of Collin County tract 031809 included in blocks 1011, 1012 and 2007; and that part of Collin County tract 031811 included in block 2001; and that part of Collin County tract 031901 included in blocks 1029, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039 and 1040; and that part of Collin County tract 032016 included in blocks 1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034 and 1035; and Dallas County tracts 007810, 007828, 007829, 013605, 013606, 013607, 013608, 013609, 013610, 013611, 013615, 013617, 013618, 013619, 013620, 013621, 013622, 013624, 013625, 013626, 013627, 013629, 013630, 013631, 013715, 013716, 013717, 013718, 013719, 013720, 013721, 013722, 013725, 013727, 018105, 018120, 018121, 018140, 018143, 018144, 018149, 018150, 018151, 018152, 018153, 018154, 018155, 018156, 018157, 018505, 018507, 018508, 018801, 018802, 018900, 019013, 019016, 019018, 019019, 019020, 019023, 019024, 019025, 019026, 019027, 019028, 019029, 019031, 019032, 019033, 019034, 019035, 019036, 019037, 019039, 019040, 019041, 019042, 019044, 019045, 019046, 019047, 019048, 019049, 019050, 019051, 019052, 019053, 019101, 019102, 019202, 019203, 019205, 019208, 019210, 019211, 019212, 019213, 019214, 019215, 019216, 020700 and 980200; and that part of Dallas County tract 007805 included in block groups 1 and 3 and blocks 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2021, 2022, 2023 and 2024; and that part of Dallas County tract 007812 included in block group 1; and that part of Dallas County tract 007823 included in blocks 1000, 1001, 1002 and 1005; and that part of Dallas County tract 007825 included in blocks 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009 and 1016; and that part of Dallas County tract 007834 included in block group 1 and blocks 2000, 2001 and 2002; and that part of Dallas County tract 013101 included in blocks 1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1011, 1012, 1013, 2000, 2001, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2033, 2035, 2036, 2037, 2038, 2039, 2040, 2041, 2042, 2043, 2044 and 2048; and that part of Dallas County tract 013202 included in block groups 1, 2 and 3; and that part of Dallas County tract 013628 included in block groups 1, 2, 3 and 4 and blocks 5000, 5002, 5018, 5023, 5028, 5029, 5030, 5031, 5032, 5033, 5036, 5037, 5038, 5039, 5040, 5041 and 5042; and that part of Dallas County tract 013726 included in blocks 1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1018, 1019, 2000, 2001 and 2004; and that part of Dallas County tract 013729 included in block groups 1 and 3 and blocks 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2012, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010 and 4014; and that part of Dallas County tract 013805 included in blocks 1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1005 and 2000; and that part of Dallas County tract 018203 included in blocks 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 4007 and 4008; and that part of Dallas County tract 018204 included in blocks 1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020 and 1023; and that part of Dallas County tract 018506 included in blocks 1001 and 3022; and that part of Dallas County tract 018700 included in blocks 2001 and 2002; and Hunt County tracts 961501, 961502, 961503, 961600 and 961700; and that part of Hunt County tract 960700 included in blocks 1082, 1088, 1089, 1090, 1091, 1098, 1100, 1103, 1104, 1105, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2037, 2038, 2039, 2040, 2041, 2042, 2043, 2044, 2045, 2046, 2047, 2048, 2049, 2050, 2051, 2052, 2053, 2054, 2055, 2056, 2057, 2058, 2059, 2060, 2061, 2062, 2063, 2064, 2065, 2066, 2067, 2068, 2069, 2070, 2071, 2072, 2073, 2074, 2075, 2076, 2077, 2078, 2079, 2080, 2081, 2082, 2083, 2084, 2085, 2086, 2087, 2088, 2089, 2090, 2091, 2092, 2093, 2094, 2095, 2096, 2097, 2098, 2099, 2100, 2101, 2102, 2103, 2104, 2105, 2106, 2107, 2108, 2109, 2110, 2111, 2112, 2113, 2114, 2115, 2116, 2117, 2118, 2119, 2120, 2121 and 2122; and that part of Hunt County tract 961101 included in blocks 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029 and 1030; and that part of Hunt County tract 961102 included in blocks 3010, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3026, 3027, 3028, 3029, 3030, 3031, 3032, 3033, 3034, 3035, 3036, 3037, 3038, 3039, 3040 and 3042; and that part of Hunt County tract 961300 included in blocks 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1049, 1050, 1051, 1052, 1053, 1054, 1055, 1056, 1057, 1058, 1059, 1060 and 1061; and that part of Hunt County tract 961401 included in blocks 1046, 1047, 1048, 1049, 1050, 1051, 1052, 1053, 1054, 1055, 1058, 1059, 1060, 1061, 1062, 1064, 1065, 2056, 2057, 2058, 2059, 2060, 2061, 2062, 2063, 2064, 2084, 2085, 2086, 2087, 2100, 2101, 2102, 2118, 2119, 2120, 2121, 2122, 2123, 2124, 2125, 2126, 2127, 2128, 2129, 2130 and 2137. SECTION 33.  District 33 is composed of Dallas County tracts 000401, 000405, 000407, 000408, 000409, 000410, 000501, 000502, 000503, 000605, 000608, 000610, 000611, 000704, 000801, 001102, 001202, 001203, 001204, 001301, 001302, 001400, 001502, 001503, 001504, 001601, 001602, 001703, 001705, 001801, 001802, 001901, 001902, 002001, 002100, 002200, 002400, 003102, 003103, 004201, 004202, 004300, 004400, 004500, 004600, 004700, 005100, 005200, 005300, 006401, 006402, 006501, 006502, 006701, 006702, 006800, 006900, 007102, 007203, 007204, 007205, 007206, 008102, 008200, 008401, 008402, 008500, 009001, 009002, 009101, 009103, 009104, 009105, 009202, 009203, 009204, 009301, 009605, 009610, 009611, 009701, 009802, 009803, 009804, 010001, 010002, 010003, 010101, 010102, 010500, 010601, 010602, 010701, 010704, 010808, 010809, 011604, 011701, 011702, 011801, 011802, 011901, 012000, 012101, 012102, 012206, 012208, 012209, 012210, 012211, 012212, 012213, 012301, 012400, 012502, 012603, 012702, 012801, 012802, 013007, 014128, 014132, 014138, 014141, 014142, 014143, 014144, 014149, 014155, 014156, 015403, 015404, 015500, 015900, 016001, 016002, 016100, 016201, 016203, 016204, 016301, 016302, 016406, 016407, 016409, 016418, 016419, 016420, 016421, 017101, 017204, 017315, 017605, 019900, 020500 and 980100; and that part of Dallas County tract 000100 included in blocks 1020, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028 and 2029; and that part of Dallas County tract 000201 included in blocks 3003, 3005, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019 and 3020; and that part of Dallas County tract 000202 included in block group 1 and blocks 3000, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3021, 3022 and 3023; and that part of Dallas County tract 000606 included in block groups 2 and 3 and blocks 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019 and 1023; and that part of Dallas County tract 000607 included in block group 1 and blocks 2002, 2003, 2004, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011 and 2012; and that part of Dallas County tract 000609 included in blocks 1007, 1008, 1010, 1011, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030 and 1031; and that part of Dallas County tract 000703 included in blocks 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007 and 2008; and that part of Dallas County tract 000802 included in block group 1 and blocks 2004 and 2005; and that part of Dallas County tract 000901 included in blocks 2024 and 2025; and that part of Dallas County tract 000902 included in block group 1 and blocks 2003, 2004, 3004 and 3005; and that part of Dallas County tract 001001 included in block 1009; and that part of Dallas County tract 001002 included in blocks 2000, 2001, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020 and 2021; and that part of Dallas County tract 001101 included in block groups 1, 3 and 4 and blocks 2000, 2001, 2002, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018 and 2019; and that part of Dallas County tract 002002 included in block group 1 and blocks 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2023, 2024, 2025 and 2026; and that part of Dallas County tract 004800 included in blocks 1004, 1005, 1006, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1024, 1025, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030 and 2035; and that part of Dallas County tract 005000 included in blocks 1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1023, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2037, 2038, 2039, 2040, 2041, 2042, 2043, 2044, 2045, 2046, 2047, 2048, 2049, 2050, 2051, 2052 and 2053; and that part of Dallas County tract 007302 included in block 4008; and that part of Dallas County tract 008101 included in block group 1 and blocks 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004 and 2005; and that part of Dallas County tract 009303 included in blocks 2013 and 2014; and that part of Dallas County tract 009304 included in blocks 1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1024 and 1025; and that part of Dallas County tract 009401 included in block groups 2 and 3 and blocks 1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016 and 1017; and that part of Dallas County tract 009607 included in block groups 2 and 3; and that part of Dallas County tract 009608 included in block group 3 and blocks 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1013, 1014 and 1015; and that part of Dallas County tract 009702 included in blocks 1006, 1009, 1010, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023 and 1024; and that part of Dallas County tract 009900 included in block group 3 and blocks 1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1055, 1056, 1057, 1061, 1062, 1063, 1064, 1065, 1066, 1067, 1068, 1069, 1070, 1074, 1075, 1076, 1077, 1078, 1079, 1080, 1081, 1082, 1083, 1084, 1085, 1086, 1087, 1088, 1089, 1090, 1091, 1092, 1093, 1094, 1095, 1096, 1097, 1098, 1099, 1100, 1101, 1102, 1103, 1104, 1105, 1106, 1107, 1108, 1109, 1110, 1111, 1112, 1113, 1114, 1115, 1116, 1117, 1118, 1119, 1120, 1121, 1122, 1123, 1124, 1126, 1127, 2005, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015 and 2016; and that part of Dallas County tract 010805 included in block 2010; and that part of Dallas County tract 011500 included in blocks 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2051, 2072, 2073, 2074, 2075, 2076 and 2077; and that part of Dallas County tract 011603 included in block group 1 and blocks 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2027 and 2029; and that part of Dallas County tract 011902 included in block group 1 and blocks 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2036 and 2037; and that part of Dallas County tract 012207 included in block groups 1, 2 and 3 and blocks 4002, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4013, 4014, 4015, 4016, 4017, 4018, 4021, 4023, 4024, 4025, 4026, 4027, 4028, 4029, 4030, 4031, 4032, 4033 and 4034; and that part of Dallas County tract 012302 included in block groups 1, 2, 3 and 4 and blocks 5000, 5001, 5002, 5003, 5004, 5005, 5006, 5007, 5008, 5009, 5010, 5011, 5012, 5013, 5014, 5015, 5016, 5017, 5018, 5019, 5020, 5021, 5022 and 5024; and that part of Dallas County tract 012501 included in block group 2 and blocks 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025 and 1026; and that part of Dallas County tract 012601 included in block group 2 and blocks 1002, 1003, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 3001, 3002, 3004 and 3005; and that part of Dallas County tract 012604 included in block group 4 and blocks 1002, 1003, 1004, 2001, 2002, 2003, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015 and 3016; and that part of Dallas County tract 012701 included in block groups 2 and 3 and blocks 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020 and 1021; and that part of Dallas County tract 012900 included in block groups 1, 3 and 4 and blocks 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2037, 2038, 2039, 2040, 2041, 2042, 2043, 2044, 2045, 2046, 2047, 2048, 2049 and 2050; and that part of Dallas County tract 013010 included in block groups 2 and 3 and blocks 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019 and 1020; and that part of Dallas County tract 013011 included in block groups 1 and 2 and blocks 3006, 3007, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3024, 3025 and 3026; and that part of Dallas County tract 014124 included in blocks 1000, 1001, 1002, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1061, 1062, 1063, 1065, 1066 and 1067; and that part of Dallas County tract 014130 included in block groups 2 and 3 and blocks 1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1040, 1041, 1044, 1045, 1046 and 1047; and that part of Dallas County tract 014150 included in blocks 1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033 and 1034; and that part of Dallas County tract 014209 included in block 1000; and that part of Dallas County tract 015600 included in block groups 1 and 2 and blocks 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016 and 3017; and that part of Dallas County tract 015700 included in block group 2 and blocks 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025 and 1026; and that part of Dallas County tract 016521 included in blocks 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2047, 2048 and 2049; and that part of Dallas County tract 016533 included in blocks 1000, 1001, 1002, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012 and 3013; and that part of Dallas County tract 016534 included in blocks 1000 and 1001; and that part of Dallas County tract 017005 included in blocks 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1019, 1020, 1021, 2000, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2026 and 2027; and that part of Dallas County tract 017007 included in block 2002; and that part of Dallas County tract 017008 included in blocks 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014 and 1017; and that part of Dallas County tract 017009 included in block group 1 and blocks 2000, 2001, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006 and 2007; and that part of Dallas County tract 017010 included in block group 2 and blocks 1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037 and 1038; and that part of Dallas County tract 017102 included in block groups 1 and 2 and blocks 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3024, 3025, 3026, 3027, 3028, 3029, 3030, 3031, 3032, 3033, 3034, 3036, 3041, 3042, 3043, 3044, 3045, 3046, 3047, 3048, 3049, 3050, 3051, 3052, 3053 and 3054; and that part of Dallas County tract 017201 included in block groups 1 and 2 and blocks 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023 and 3024; and that part of Dallas County tract 017203 included in block group 2 and blocks 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005 and 1008; and that part of Dallas County tract 017314 included in blocks 2014, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4013, 4018, 4019 and 4024; and that part of Dallas County tract 017604 included in blocks 1004, 1009, 2008, 2009, 2012, 2013 and 2014; and that part of Dallas County tract 017805 included in blocks 1006, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4010, 4021 and 4022; and that part of Dallas County tract 017806 included in blocks 1014, 1015 and 1016; and that part of Dallas County tract 017900 included in blocks 1009, 1010, 3011, 3012 and 3022; and that part of Dallas County tract 018001 included in blocks 3000, 3008, 3009 and 3019; and that part of Dallas County tract 020100 included in block 1053; and that part of Dallas County tract 020401 included in block group 1 and blocks 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2040, 2041, 2042 and 2043; and that part of Dallas County tract 020402 included in block group 1 and block 2071; and that part of Dallas County tract 021200 included in block groups 1 and 2 and blocks 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3024, 3025, 3026, 3027, 3028, 3029, 3030, 3031, 3032, 3033, 3034, 3035, 3036, 3037, 3038, 3039, 3040, 3041, 3042, 3043, 3044, 3045, 3046, 3047, 3048, 3049, 3050, 3051, 3052, 3053, 3054, 3055, 3056, 3057, 3058, 3059, 3060, 3061, 3062, 3063, 3064, 3065, 3066, 3067, 3068, 3069, 3070, 3071, 3072, 3073, 3074, 3075, 3076, 3077, 3078, 3079, 3080, 3081, 3082, 3083, 3084, 3085, 3086, 3087, 3088, 3089, 3090, 3091, 3092, 3093, 3094, 3095, 3096, 3097 and 3098. SECTION 34.  District 34 is composed of Cameron, Kenedy, Kleberg and Willacy Counties; and Nueces County tracts 000700, 001400, 001802, 001905, 001906, 002101, 002102, 002200, 002301, 002303, 002304, 002400, 002500, 002601, 002602, 002603, 002703, 002705, 002706, 002707, 002708, 002900, 003002, 003003, 003004, 003101, 003102, 003202, 003204, 003205, 003206, 003303, 003304, 003305, 003306, 003401, 003402, 003500, 003601, 003602, 003603, 003700, 005404, 005406, 005407, 005408, 005409, 005410, 005411, 005412, 005413, 005414, 005415, 005416, 005417, 005603, 005604, 005605, 005606, 005801, 005803, 005804, 005900, 006000, 006100, 006201, 006202, 006203, 006204 and 980000; and that part of Nueces County tract 000601 included in blocks 2009, 2010 and 2011; and that part of Nueces County tract 000602 included in blocks 1000, 1002, 1003, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1013, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1034, 1048, 2005, 2006, 2008 and 2009; and that part of Nueces County tract 000800 included in block group 1 and blocks 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2033, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3024, 3025, 3026, 3027, 3028, 3029, 3030, 3031, 3032, 3033 and 3035; and that part of Nueces County tract 000900 included in block 2006; and that part of Nueces County tract 001201 included in blocks 1000, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025 and 1026; and that part of Nueces County tract 001202 included in block group 2; and that part of Nueces County tract 001300 included in blocks 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 3013, 3023, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4013, 4014, 4015, 4016 and 4017; and that part of Nueces County tract 001601 included in block 1025; and that part of Nueces County tract 001702 included in block group 1 and blocks 2000, 2001, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018 and 2019; and that part of Nueces County tract 001903 included in block 3013; and that part of Nueces County tract 002001 included in block groups 1, 2 and 3 and blocks 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006 and 4007; and that part of Nueces County tract 002002 included in block groups 2 and 3 and blocks 1005, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019 and 1021; and that part of Nueces County tract 006205 included in blocks 1039, 1040, 1047, 1106, 1108, 1109, 1110, 1111, 1112, 1114, 1115, 1116, 1117, 1118, 1119, 1120, 1121, 1122, 1123, 1124, 1125, 1126, 1127, 1128, 1129, 1130, 1132, 1133, 1138, 1139 and 1140; and that part of Nueces County tract 006300 included in block group 2 and blocks 1032, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1115, 1121, 1122, 1123, 1124, 1125, 1126, 1127, 1128, 1129, 1130, 1131, 1132, 1133, 1134, 1135, 1136, 1137, 1138, 1139, 1140, 1141, 1142, 1143, 1144, 1145, 1146, 1147, 1148, 1149, 1150, 1151, 1152, 1153, 1154, 1155, 1156, 1157, 1158, 1159, 1160, 1161, 1162, 1163, 1164, 1165, 1166, 1167, 1168, 1169, 1170, 1171, 1172, 1173, 1174, 1175, 1176, 1177, 1178, 1179, 1180, 1181, 1182, 1183, 1184, 1185, 1190, 1191, 1192, 1193 and 1224. SECTION 35.  District 35 is composed of Guadalupe, Karnes and Wilson Counties; and Bexar County tracts 121110, 121111, 121119, 121120, 121121, 121122, 121203, 121204, 121205, 121206, 121501, 121504, 121505, 121507, 121601, 121604, 121605, 121606, 121701, 121702, 121802, 121803, 121804, 121808, 121809, 121810, 121811, 121812, 121813, 121909, 131401, 131601, 131608, 131700, 131801, 131802, 140800, 140900, 141000, 141101, 141102, 141200, 141300, 141402, 141403, 141404, 141600, 141700, 141800, 141900, 150502, 150600, 150700, 150900, 151000, 151100, 151200, 151301, 151302, 151400, 151500, 151600, 151700, 151900, 152000, 152100, 152201, 152202, 160901, 161000, 161100, 161200, 161302, 161303, 161501, 161503, 161504, 162001, 162003, 162004, 192200 and 980002; and that part of Bexar County tract 120901 included in block group 2 and blocks 1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010 and 1014; and that part of Bexar County tract 120902 included in block groups 1 and 2 and blocks 3011, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4013, 4014 and 4015; and that part of Bexar County tract 121000 included in block group 3; and that part of Bexar County tract 121112 included in block group 2 and blocks 1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1018, 1019 and 1020; and that part of Bexar County tract 121115 included in block groups 1 and 2; and that part of Bexar County tract 121118 included in block group 2 and blocks 1000, 1001, 1008, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018 and 3019; and that part of Bexar County tract 121300 included in block groups 1, 3 and 4 and blocks 2000, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030 and 2031; and that part of Bexar County tract 121506 included in block groups 1 and 4; and that part of Bexar County tract 121508 included in blocks 1000, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009 and 1010; and that part of Bexar County tract 131100 included in blocks 3014, 3015 and 3016; and that part of Bexar County tract 131200 included in block group 2; and that part of Bexar County tract 131300 included in block group 3 and blocks 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021 and 2022; and that part of Bexar County tract 131402 included in block group 1 and blocks 2000, 2001, 2012, 2013, 2014 and 2015; and that part of Bexar County tract 131606 included in block group 2 and blocks 1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1049, 1050, 1051, 1052, 1053, 1054, 1055, 1056, 1057, 1058, 1059 and 1060; and that part of Bexar County tract 131610 included in blocks 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020 and 2021; and that part of Bexar County tract 131612 included in blocks 1006, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025 and 1026; and that part of Bexar County tract 140300 included in blocks 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029 and 2030; and that part of Bexar County tract 140600 included in block group 2 and blocks 1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026 and 1027; and that part of Bexar County tract 140700 included in block group 2 and blocks 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 3000, 3009, 3010, 3020 and 3021; and that part of Bexar County tract 150300 included in blocks 1021, 1022, 2013 and 2015; and that part of Bexar County tract 150501 included in block groups 2, 3 and 4 and blocks 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020 and 1021; and that part of Bexar County tract 150800 included in block groups 1 and 2 and blocks 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011 and 3012; and that part of Bexar County tract 160902 included in block group 3 and blocks 1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030 and 2031; and that part of Bexar County tract 161304 included in block group 2 and blocks 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022 and 1023; and that part of Bexar County tract 161802 included in blocks 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1049, 1050, 1051, 1052, 1053, 1056 and 1057; and that part of Bexar County tract 161901 included in blocks 1000, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048 and 1049; and that part of Bexar County tract 161902 included in block groups 2 and 4 and blocks 1025, 1026, 1028, 1029, 3058, 3059, 3063, 3064 and 3065; and that part of Bexar County tract 980003 included in block 1026; and that part of Bexar County tract 980004 included in blocks 1000 and 1002. SECTION 36.  District 36 is composed of Angelina, Hardin, Jasper, Newton and Tyler Counties; and Brazoria County tracts 660401, 660402, 660501, 660502, 660503, 660504, 660603, 660604, 660605, 660606, 660607, 660608, 660609, 660610, 660611, 660612, 660703, 660704 and 660705; and that part of Brazoria County tract 660403 included in block group 4 and blocks 2000 and 3000; and that part of Brazoria County tract 660707 included in blocks 1003, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003 and 3005; and that part of Brazoria County tract 660803 included in block groups 1 and 2 and blocks 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008 and 3009; and that part of Brazoria County tract 660804 included in block group 2 and blocks 1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025 and 1033; and that part of Brazoria County tract 660806 included in blocks 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2008 and 2010; and Chambers County tracts 710100, 710201, 710202, 710300, 710500 and 710600; and that part of Chambers County tract 710401 included in block groups 1, 2 and 4 and blocks 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3024, 3025, 3026, 3027, 3028, 3029, 3030, 3031, 3032, 3033, 3034, 3035, 3036, 3037, 3038, 3039, 3040, 3041, 3042, 3043, 3044, 3045, 3046, 3047, 3048, 3049, 3050, 3051, 3052, 3053, 3054, 3055, 3056, 3057, 3058, 3059, 3060, 3061, 3062, 3063, 3064, 3065, 3066, 3067, 3068, 3069, 3070, 3071, 3072, 3073, 3074, 3075, 3076, 3077, 3078, 3079, 3080, 3081, 3082, 3083, 3084, 3085, 3086, 3087, 3088, 3089, 3090, 3091, 3092, 3093, 3094, 3095, 3096, 3097, 3098, 3099, 3100, 3101, 3102, 3103, 3104, 3105, 3106, 3107, 3108, 3109, 3110, 3111, 3112, 3116, 3121, 3122, 3123, 3124, 3125, 3126, 3127, 3128, 3129, 3130, 3131, 3132, 3133, 3134, 3135 and 3136; and Harris County tracts 253900, 321101, 321102, 333100, 333201, 333203, 333204, 333205, 333301, 333302, 333501, 333502, 333700, 333801, 333802, 333903, 333904, 333905, 333906, 334001, 334002, 334003, 340101, 340102, 340201, 340202, 340203, 340301, 340302, 340400, 340501, 340502, 340600, 340701, 340702, 340800, 340900, 341001, 341002, 341101, 341102, 341201, 341203, 341204, 341302, 341303, 341304, 341400, 341501, 341502, 341600, 341700, 341800, 343602, 350101, 350102, 350103, 350104, 350201, 350202, 350300, 350400, 350500, 350601, 350603, 350604, 350700, 350801, 350803, 350804 and 980000; and that part of Harris County tract 253201 included in blocks 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3024, 3025 and 3026; and that part of Harris County tract 253800 included in block group 3 and blocks 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004 and 4005; and that part of Harris County tract 254000 included in block group 1 and blocks 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2010, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2037, 2038 and 2039; and that part of Harris County tract 254100 included in blocks 1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008 and 1011; and that part of Harris County tract 254600 included in blocks 2032, 2033, 3045, 3046, 3047, 3048, 3051, 3052, 3053, 3054, 3055, 3056, 3057, 3058, 3059 and 3060; and that part of Harris County tract 254700 included in blocks 1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1011, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1049, 1050, 1051, 1052, 1053, 1054, 1055, 1056, 1057, 1058, 1059, 1060, 1061, 1062, 1063, 1064, 1065, 1066, 1067, 1068, 1069, 1070, 1071, 1072, 1073, 1074, 1075, 1076, 1077, 1078, 1079, 1080, 1081, 1082, 1083, 1084, 1085 and 1086; and that part of Harris County tract 320601 included in blocks 2017 and 2018; and that part of Harris County tract 320602 included in blocks 1016, 1017 and 1018; and that part of Harris County tract 320700 included in block 1025; and that part of Harris County tract 321200 included in blocks 1009 and 1010; and that part of Harris County tract 324000 included in blocks 3008, 3009, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3021, 3023, 3024, 3025, 3026 and 3027; and that part of Harris County tract 330801 included in blocks 1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1024, 1025, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2030 and 2031; and that part of Harris County tract 331602 included in blocks 1000 and 1013; and that part of Harris County tract 331700 included in blocks 1000, 1009 and 1010; and that part of Harris County tract 333600 included in block groups 2 and 3 and blocks 1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020 and 1021; and that part of Harris County tract 343000 included in blocks 2015, 2016, 2021, 3024 and 3035; and that part of Harris County tract 343100 included in blocks 1004 and 2030; and that part of Harris County tract 343200 included in blocks 2012, 2013, 2022 and 2023; and that part of Harris County tract 343601 included in blocks 1094, 1095, 1096, 1097, 1098, 1099, 1100, 1101, 1103, 1122, 1128, 1129, 1130, 1131, 1132, 1146, 1147, 1148, 1149, 1150, 1153, 1154, 1155, 1156, 1157, 1158, 1159, 1160, 1203 and 1204; and that part of Harris County tract 343700 included in block group 2 and blocks 1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1049, 1050, 1051, 1052, 1053, 1054, 1055, 1056, 1057, 1058, 1059, 1060, 1061, 1062, 1063, 1064, 1065, 1066, 1067, 1068, 1069, 1070, 1071, 1072, 1073, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3024, 3025, 3026, 3027, 3028, 3029, 3041, 3042, 3043, 3044, 3045, 3046, 3047, 3048, 3049, 3050, 3054, 3055, 3056, 3057, 3058, 3059, 3060, 3061, 3062, 3063, 3064, 3065, 3066, 3067, 3068, 3071, 3072, 3073, 3074, 3075, 3076, 3077, 3078, 3079, 3080, 3081, 3082, 3083, 3084, 3085, 3086, 3087, 3088, 3089, 3090, 3091, 3092, 3093, 3094, 3095, 3096, 3097, 3098, 3099, 3100, 3101, 3102, 3103, 3104, 3105, 3106, 3107, 3108, 3109, 3110, 3111, 3112, 3113, 3114, 3115, 3116, 3117, 3118, 3119, 3120, 3121, 3122, 3123, 3124, 3125, 3126, 3127, 3128, 3129, 3130, 3131, 3132, 3133, 3134, 3135, 3136, 3137, 3138, 3139, 3140, 3141, 3142, 3143, 3144, 3145, 3146, 3147, 3148, 3149, 3150, 3151, 3152, 3153, 3154, 3155, 3156, 3157, 3158, 3159 and 3160; and Jefferson County tracts 000101, 000102, 000103, 000200, 000304, 000306, 000307, 000309, 000310, 000311, 000312, 000313, 000314, 000400, 000500, 000600, 000700, 000900, 001100, 001200, 001301, 001302, 002000, 002100 and 011401; and that part of Jefferson County tract 001303 included in block group 1 and blocks 2015, 2016, 2029 and 2030; and that part of Jefferson County tract 001900 included in blocks 1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1041, 1042, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3024, 3025, 3026, 3027, 3028, 3029, 3030, 3031, 3032, 3033, 3034, 3035, 3036, 3037, 3038, 3039, 3040, 3041, 3042, 3043, 3044, 3045, 3046 and 3047; and that part of Jefferson County tract 002200 included in block group 3 and blocks 1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1021, 1022, 1026, 1027, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2036, 2037, 2038, 2039, 2040, 2041, 2042, 2043, 2044, 2045 and 2066; and that part of Jefferson County tract 002300 included in block groups 1, 2 and 3 and blocks 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4007, 4008, 4009 and 4011; and that part of Jefferson County tract 002400 included in block groups 3 and 4 and blocks 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1011, 1012, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019 and 2020; and that part of Jefferson County tract 002500 included in blocks 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1021, 1022, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042 and 1047; and that part of Jefferson County tract 011402 included in block group 3 and blocks 1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1049, 1050, 1051, 1052, 1053, 1054, 1055, 1056, 1057, 1058, 1059, 1060, 1061, 1062, 1063, 1064, 1065, 1066, 1067, 1068, 1069, 1070, 1071, 1072, 1075, 1076, 1077, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2037, 2038, 2039, 2040, 2041, 2042, 2043, 2044, 2045, 2046, 2047, 2048, 2049, 2050, 2051, 2052, 2053, 2054, 2055, 2056, 2057, 2058, 2059, 2060, 2061, 2062, 2063, 2064, 2065, 2072, 2073, 2074, 2075, 2076, 2077, 2078, 2079, 2080, 2081, 2082, 2083, 2084, 2085, 2086, 2087, 2088, 2089, 2090 and 2091; and that part of Jefferson County tract 011500 included in blocks 1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1049, 1050, 1051, 1052, 1053, 1054, 1055, 1056, 1057, 1058, 1059, 1060, 1061, 1062, 1063, 1064, 1065, 1066, 1067, 1068, 1069, 1070, 1071, 1072, 1073, 1074, 1075, 1076, 1077, 1078, 1079, 1080, 1081, 1082, 1083, 1084, 1085, 1086, 1087, 1088, 1089, 1090, 1091, 1092, 1093, 1094, 1095, 1096, 1097, 1098, 1099, 1100, 1101, 1102, 1103, 1104, 1105, 1106, 1107, 1108, 1109, 1110, 1111, 1112, 1113, 1114, 1122, 1126, 1127, 1130, 1131, 1132, 1133, 1134, 1135, 1136, 1137, 1138, 1139, 1140, 1141, 1142, 1143, 1144, 1145, 1146, 1147, 1148, 1149, 1150, 1151, 1152, 1153, 1154, 1155, 1156, 1157, 1158, 1159, 1160, 1166, 1167, 1168, 1169, 1170, 1171, 1172, 1173, 1174, 1200, 1201, 1202, 1206, 1207, 1210, 1211, 1212 and 1213; and that part of Jefferson County tract 011700 included in blocks 1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1049, 1050, 1051, 1052, 1053, 1054, 1055, 1056, 1057, 1058, 1059, 1060, 1061, 1062, 1063, 1064, 1065, 1066, 1067, 1068, 1069, 1070, 1072, 1073, 1074, 1075, 1076, 1077, 1078, 1079, 1080, 1081, 1082, 1083, 1084, 1085, 1086, 1087, 1088, 1089, 1090, 1091, 1092, 1093, 1094, 1095, 1096, 1097, 1098, 1099, 1100, 1101, 1102, 1103, 1106, 1107, 1108, 1109, 1110, 1111, 1112, 1113, 1114, 1115, 1116, 1117, 1118, 1119, 1120, 1121, 1122, 1123, 1124, 1125, 1126, 1127, 1128, 1129, 1130, 1131, 1132, 1136, 1137, 1138, 1139, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2044, 2045, 2046, 2047, 2048, 2049, 2050, 2051, 2052, 2053, 2054, 2055, 2056, 2057, 2058, 2059, 2063, 2064, 2065, 2070, 2071, 2072, 2073, 2074, 2075, 2076, 2077, 2078, 2079, 2080, 2081, 2082, 2083, 2130, 2131, 2132, 2133, 2136, 2137, 2138, 2139, 2140, 2141, 2142, 2143, 2144, 2145, 2146, 2147, 2148, 2151, 2152, 2153, 2154, 2155, 2156, 2157, 2158 and 2159. SECTION 37.  District 37 is composed of Travis County tracts 000101, 000102, 000203, 000204, 000205, 000206, 000302, 000304, 000305, 000307, 000308, 000309, 000401, 000402, 000500, 000601, 000605, 000606, 000607, 000608, 000801, 000802, 000803, 000804, 000901, 000902, 001000, 001304, 001307, 001308, 001310, 001312, 001403, 001501, 001503, 001504, 001505, 001606, 001922, 001923, 002002, 002003, 002004, 002006, 002007, 002104, 002105, 002106, 002107, 002108, 002109, 002110, 002111, 002112, 002113, 002201, 002211, 002213, 002214, 002220, 002221, 002222, 002304, 002307, 002310, 002313, 002314, 002315, 002316, 002319, 002320, 002321, 002322, 002323, 002324, 002325, 002326, 002327, 002403, 002409, 002410, 002411, 002412, 002413, 002419, 002422, 002423, 002424, 002430, 002437, 002438, 002439, 002441, 002442, 002443, 002444, 002447, 002448, 002451, 030000, 030100, 030200, 030300, 030400, 030600, 030900, 031000, 031200, 031700, 031800, 031900, 032000, 032100, 032200, 032300, 032400, 033400, 033500, 034700, 034800, 040000, 040100, 040200, 040300, 040400, 040500, 040600, 040700, 040800, 040900, 041000, 041100, 041200, 041400, 041500, 041600, 041700, 041800, 041900, 042100, 042200, 043100, 043200, 043300, 043400, 043600, 043700, 043800, 044000, 045000, 045200, 045300, 045400 and 980000; and that part of Travis County tract 000700 included in blocks 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1049, 1050, 1051, 1052, 1053, 1054, 1055, 1056, 1057, 1058, 1059, 1060, 1069 and 1071; and that part of Travis County tract 001101 included in blocks 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2020, 2021 and 2022; and that part of Travis County tract 001103 included in blocks 1010 and 1011; and that part of Travis County tract 001200 included in blocks 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 3003, 3007, 3008, 3009 and 5018; and that part of Travis County tract 001309 included in block group 2 and blocks 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011 and 1012; and that part of Travis County tract 001311 included in blocks 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015 and 1016; and that part of Travis County tract 001401 included in block groups 1 and 3 and blocks 2000, 2001 and 2003; and that part of Travis County tract 001402 included in block groups 2 and 3 and blocks 1001, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020 and 1021; and that part of Travis County tract 001603 included in block groups 1, 2, 3 and 4 and blocks 5000 and 5030; and that part of Travis County tract 001605 included in block groups 2, 3 and 4 and block 1014; and that part of Travis County tract 001911 included in blocks 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 2001, 2002, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3015 and 3016; and that part of Travis County tract 001915 included in blocks 1000, 1001, 1002, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1049, 1050, 1051, 1052, 1053 and 1054; and that part of Travis County tract 001917 included in blocks 2013 and 2014; and that part of Travis County tract 001920 included in blocks 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005 and 2023; and that part of Travis County tract 002215 included in block group 2 and blocks 1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1011, 1012 and 1013; and that part of Travis County tract 002216 included in block group 1 and blocks 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2042, 2043, 2044, 2045, 2046, 2047, 2048, 2049, 2050, 2051, 2052, 2053, 2054, 2055, 2056, 2057, 2058, 2059, 2060, 2061, 2062, 2063, 2064, 2065, 2066, 2067, 2068, 2069, 2070, 2071 and 2072; and that part of Travis County tract 002217 included in block group 2; and that part of Travis County tract 002218 included in block groups 1 and 2; and that part of Travis County tract 002219 included in block group 2 and blocks 1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1038, 1039 and 1040; and that part of Travis County tract 002407 included in blocks 2023, 2026, 2028 and 2029; and that part of Travis County tract 002432 included in block group 1; and that part of Travis County tract 002440 included in block group 1 and blocks 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2037, 2038, 2039, 2040, 2041, 2042, 2043 and 2044; and that part of Travis County tract 002445 included in blocks 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3024, 3025, 3026, 3027, 3028, 3029, 3030, 3031, 3032, 3033, 3034, 3035, 3036, 3037, 3038, 3040, 3041 and 3042; and that part of Travis County tract 002449 included in blocks 2016 and 2017; and that part of Travis County tract 002452 included in block group 1 and blocks 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2017, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028 and 2029; and that part of Travis County tract 002453 included in blocks 3026, 3027, 3028, 3029, 3030, 3031, 3032, 3033, 3034, 3035, 3036, 3037, 3038, 3039 and 3045; and that part of Travis County tract 030700 included in block groups 1 and 2 and blocks 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015 and 3016; and that part of Travis County tract 030800 included in block groups 2 and 3 and blocks 1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 4000, 4002, 4003, 4004 and 4005; and that part of Travis County tract 031300 included in block group 1 and blocks 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023 and 2025; and that part of Travis County tract 031600 included in block 2006; and that part of Travis County tract 032500 included in block group 2 and blocks 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 3000, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019 and 3020; and that part of Travis County tract 032600 included in blocks 2029, 2030, 2035 and 2036; and that part of Travis County tract 032800 included in blocks 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010 and 1011; and that part of Travis County tract 033000 included in blocks 1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1017, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026 and 2027; and that part of Travis County tract 033200 included in blocks 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2021, 2023, 2026, 2027 and 2034; and that part of Travis County tract 036700 included in blocks 1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1027, 3001, 4002 and 4003; and that part of Travis County tract 036800 included in block group 1 and blocks 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2021, 2022 and 2023; and that part of Travis County tract 037100 included in blocks 1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005 and 1007; and that part of Travis County tract 037200 included in block group 2 and blocks 1000, 1001, 1002, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004 and 3005; and that part of Travis County tract 041300 included in block group 3 and blocks 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013 and 2014; and that part of Travis County tract 042000 included in blocks 1014, 1015, 1019, 1020, 1022, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020 and 2021; and that part of Travis County tract 042400 included in block groups 2 and 4 and blocks 1009, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1049, 1050, 1051, 1052, 1053, 1054, 1055, 1056, 1057, 1058, 1059, 1060, 1061, 1062, 1063, 1064, 1065, 1066, 1067, 1068, 1069, 1070, 1071, 1072, 1073, 3014, 3015, 3017, 3018, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3024, 3025, 3026, 3028, 3029, 3030, 3031, 3032, 3033, 3034, 3035, 3036, 3037, 3038, 3039, 3040, 3041 and 3042; and that part of Travis County tract 043500 included in block groups 2 and 3 and blocks 1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006 and 1007; and that part of Travis County tract 043900 included in block groups 2 and 3 and blocks 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012 and 1013; and that part of Travis County tract 044300 included in block 1020; and that part of Travis County tract 044900 included in blocks 2031, 2033, 2034, 2039, 2040, 2041, 2042, 2043, 2044, 2045, 2046, 2048 and 2049; and that part of Travis County tract 045100 included in block group 1 and blocks 2001, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011 and 2012; and that part of Travis County tract 045900 included in block 2019. SECTION 38.  District 38 is composed of Harris County tracts 411301, 411302, 411600, 430101, 430102, 430200, 430300, 430400, 430500, 430600, 430700, 430800, 430900, 431001, 431002, 431203, 431204, 431205, 431206, 431302, 431303, 431304, 431503, 431504, 431505, 431506, 431600, 431701, 431702, 432102, 450100, 450200, 450301, 450302, 450401, 450700, 451200, 520100, 520200, 520301, 520302, 520700, 521000, 521100, 521501, 521900, 522001, 522002, 522101, 522102, 522201, 522202, 522301, 522302, 522401, 522402, 522500, 540101, 540102, 540200, 540700, 540800, 540901, 540903, 540904, 541004, 541005, 541006, 541007, 541008, 541009, 541100, 541203, 541205, 541207, 543004, 543007, 543201, 551702, 551704, 551901, 551902, 552002, 552003, 552004, 552101, 552102, 552103, 552200, 552301, 552303, 552304, 552401, 552402, 553700, 553801, 553803, 553804, 553901, 554001, 554002, 554103, 554104, 554201, 554202, 554301, 554302, 554404, 554405, 554406, 554407, 554408, 554409, 554410, 554501, 554502, 554600, 554701, 554702, 554803, 554804, 554805, 554806, 554807, 554808, 554809, 554902, 554904, 554905, 554906, 554907, 554908, 555304, 555401, 555403, 555404, 555501, 555503, 555504, 555505, 555600, 555701, 555703, 555704 and 556100; and that part of Harris County tract 411100 included in block group 2 and blocks 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3010 and 3011; and that part of Harris County tract 411200 included in block group 2 and blocks 1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016 and 1017; and that part of Harris County tract 411400 included in block groups 1 and 2 and blocks 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008 and 3009; and that part of Harris County tract 411505 included in block 2004; and that part of Harris County tract 431101 included in block group 1; and that part of Harris County tract 431804 included in block groups 2 and 3 and blocks 1000 and 1001; and that part of Harris County tract 432600 included in block group 1 and blocks 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006 and 2025; and that part of Harris County tract 450402 included in block group 2 and blocks 1000, 1003, 1004 and 1007; and that part of Harris County tract 450600 included in block groups 1, 2 and 3; and that part of Harris County tract 451301 included in blocks 4000, 4001, 4002, 4006 and 4007; and that part of Harris County tract 451302 included in block group 2 and blocks 1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1010, 1011, 1012 and 1013; and that part of Harris County tract 510802 included in blocks 1003, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1056, 1057 and 1061; and that part of Harris County tract 521202 included in blocks 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014 and 1015; and that part of Harris County tract 521300 included in blocks 1003, 1007, 1008, 5001, 5002, 5003, 5004, 5005, 5006, 5007, 5008, 5009, 5010 and 5011; and that part of Harris County tract 521402 included in block 1008; and that part of Harris County tract 521502 included in block group 1 and blocks 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2023, 2024 and 2025; and that part of Harris County tract 521800 included in block group 2 and blocks 1019, 1020, 1021, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1033, 1034, 1035 and 1036; and that part of Harris County tract 540602 included in blocks 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3008 and 3009; and that part of Harris County tract 541204 included in blocks 2000, 2001 and 3000; and that part of Harris County tract 541206 included in blocks 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010 and 2017; and that part of Harris County tract 543005 included in blocks 1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1057, 1061, 1062 and 1063; and that part of Harris County tract 543006 included in blocks 1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1049, 1067, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016 and 2035; and that part of Harris County tract 543202 included in block group 1 and blocks 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2010, 2012, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2036, 2042, 2043, 2044, 2045 and 2046; and that part of Harris County tract 551800 included in block groups 1 and 3 and blocks 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018 and 2019; and that part of Harris County tract 555200 included in blocks 1007, 1010, 1011, 1012 and 1017; and that part of Harris County tract 555301 included in blocks 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023 and 1024; and that part of Harris County tract 555303 included in block groups 2 and 4 and blocks 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021 and 1022; and that part of Harris County tract 555305 included in block group 1 and block 3053; and that part of Harris County tract 556000 included in block groups 2, 3 and 4. ARTICLE III SECTION 1.  In this Act, "tract," "block group," and "block" mean the geographic areas identified by those terms on the 2020 Census TIGER/Line Shapefiles, prepared by the federal Bureau of the Census for the Twenty-fourth Decennial Census of the United States, enumerated as of April 1, 2020. SECTION 2.  It is the intention of the Texas Legislature that, if any county, tract, block group, block, or other geographic area has erroneously been left out of this Act, a court reviewing this Act should include that area in the appropriate district in accordance with the intent of the legislature, using any available evidence of that intent, including evidence such as that used by the Supreme Court of Texas in Smith v. Patterson, 111 Tex. 535, 242 S.W. 749 (1922). SECTION 3.  (a) This Act supersedes all previous enactments or orders adopting congressional districts for the State of Texas. All previous acts of the legislature adopting congressional districts for the State of Texas are repealed. (b)  Chapter 7 (S.B. 6), Acts of the 87th Legislature, 3rd Called Session, 2021, is repealed. SECTION 4.  The districts described by Article II of this Act apply to the election of the members of the United States House of Representatives from the State of Texas beginning with the primary and general elections in 2026 for members of the 120th Congress. This Act does not affect the membership or congressional districts of the 119th Congress. SECTION 5.  This Act takes effect immediately if it receives a vote of two-thirds of all the members elected to each house, as provided by Section 39, Article III, Texas Constitution. If this Act does not receive the vote necessary for immediate effect, this Act takes effect on the 91st day after the last day of the legislative session. ______________________________ ______________________________ President of the Senate Speaker of the House I certify that H.B. No. 4 was passed by the House on August 20, 2025, by the following vote:  Yeas 88, Nays 52, 0 present, not voting. ______________________________ Chief Clerk of the House I certify that H.B. No. 4 was passed by the Senate on August 23, 2025, by the following vote:  Yeas 18, Nays 11. ______________________________ Secretary of the Senate APPROVED:  _____________________ Date _____________________ Governor